{"Hemophilia A": {"description": "Hemophilia A is a hereditary bleeding disorder caused by a lack of blood clotting factor VIII. Without enough factor VIII, the blood cannot clot properly to stop bleeding.", "Possible Complications": "Complications can include:Long-term joint problems, which may require a joint replacement, Bleeding in the brain (intracerebral hemorrhage), Thrombosis due to treatment. ", "Symptoms": ["Bleeding into joints with associated pain and swelling", "Blood in the urine or stool", "Bruising", "Gastrointestinal tract and urinary tract hemorrhage", "Nosebleeds", "Prolonged bleeding from cuts, tooth extraction, and surgery", "Spontaneous bleeding"], "Exams and Tests": "If you are the first person in the family to have a suspected bleeding disorder, your doctor will order a series of tests called a coagulation study. Once the specific defect has been identified, other people in your family will need tests to diagnose the disorder.Tests to diagnose hemophilia A include:Prothrombin time, Bleeding time, Fibrinogen level, Partial thromboplastin time (PTT), Serum factor VIII activity. ", "Treatment": "Treatment includes replacing the missing clotting factor. You will receive factor IX concentrates. How much you get depends on: Severity of bleeding, Site of bleeding, Your weight and height. Mild hemophilia may be treated with desmopressin (DDAVP), which helps the body release factor VIII that is stored within the lining of blood vessels.To prevent a bleeding crisis, people with hemophilia and their families can be taught to give factor VIII concentrates at home at the first signs of bleeding. People with severe forms of the disease may need regular preventive treatment.Depending on the severity of the disease, DDAVP or factor VIII concentrate may be given before having dental extractions or surgery in order to prevent bleeding.You should get the hepatitis B vaccine. People with hemophilia are more likely to get hepatitis because they may receive blood products. Patients who develop an inhibitor to factor VIII may require treatment with other clotting factors such as factor VIIa, which can help with clotting, even without any factor VIII.", "Prevention": "Genetic counseling may be recommended. Testing can identify women and girls who carry the hemophilia gene. , Testing can be done during pregancy on a baby that is in the mother's womb. . ", "Causes": "Hemophilia A is caused by an inherited X-linked recessive trait, with the defective gene located on the X chromosome. Females have two copies of the X chromosome. So if the factor VIII gene on one chromosome does not work, the gene on the other chromosome can do the job of making enough factor VIII. Males have only one X chromosome. If the factor VIII gene is missing on a boy's X chromosome, he will have hemophilia A. For this reason, most people with hemophilia A are male.If a woman has a defective factor VIII gene, she is considered a carrier. This means the defective gene can be passed down to her children. Boys born to such women have a 50% chance of having hemophilia A. Their daughters have a 50% chance of being a carrier. All female children of men with hemophilia carry the defective gene. Risk factors for hemophilia A include: Family history of bleeding, Being male. "}, "Hemophilia B": {"description": "Hemophilia B is a hereditary bleeding disorder caused by a lack of blood clotting factor IX. Without enough factor IX, the blood cannot clot properly to control bleeding.", "Possible Complications": "Complications can include:Long-term joint problems, which may require a joint replacement, Bleeding in the brain (intracerebral hemorrhage), Thrombosis due to treatment . ", "Symptoms": ["Bleeding into joints with associated pain and swelling", "Blood in the urine or stool", "Bruising", "Gastrointestinal tract and urinary tract hemorrhage", "Nosebleeds", "Prolonged bleeding from cuts, tooth extraction, and surgery", "Spontaneous bleeding"], "Exams and Tests": "If you are the first person in the family to have a suspected bleeding disorder, your doctor will order a series of tests called a coagulation study. Once the specific defect has been identified, other people in your family will need tests to diagnose the disorder.Tests to diagnose hemophilia B include:Partial thromboplastin time\u00a0(PTT), Prothrombin time, Bleeding time, Fibrinogen level, Serum factor IX activity. ", "Treatment": "Treatment includes replacing the missing clotting factor. You will receive factor IX concentrates. How much you get depends on: Severity of bleeding, Site of bleeding, Your weight and height . To prevent a bleeding crisis, people with hemophilia and their families can be taught to give factor IX concentrates at home at the first signs of bleeding. People with severe forms of the disease may need regular, preventive infusions.If you have severe hemophilia, you may also need to take factor IX concentrate before surgery or certain types of dental work. You should get the hepatitis B vaccine. People with hemophilia are more likely to get hepatitis because they may receive blood products.", "Prevention": "Genetic counseling may be recommended. Testing can identify women and girls who carry the hemophilia gene. Testing can be done during pregancy on a baby that is in the mother's womb. ", "Causes": "Hemophilia B is caused by an inherited X-linked recessive trait, with the defective gene located on the X chromosome.Females have two copies of the X chromosome. If the factor IX gene on one chromosome does not work, the gene on the other chromosome can do the job of making enough factor IX.Males have only one X chromosome. If the factor IX gene is missing on a boy's X chromosome, he will have Hemophilia B. For this reason, most people with hemophilia B are male.If a woman has a defective factor IX gene, she is considered a carrier. This means the defective gene can be passed down to her children. Boys born to such women\u00a0have a 50% chance of having hemophilia B. Their daughters have a 50% chance of being a carrier.All female children of men with hemophilia carry the defective gene.Risk factors for hemophilia B include:Family history of bleeding, Being male . "}, "Head circumference": {"description": "Head circumference is a measurement of a child\u2019s head around its largest area. It measures the distance from above the eyebrows and ears and around the back of the head."}, "Hemolytic disease of the newborn": {"description": "This article provides a general overview. For more detailed information, see the specific disorder:", "Symptoms": ["Edema (swelling under the surface of the skin)", "Newborn jaundice"], "Exams and Tests": "Signs of HDN include:Anemia or low blood count, Enlarged liver or spleen, Hydrops (fluid throughout the body's tissues, including in the spaces containing the lungs, heart, and abdominal organs), which can lead to heart failure from too much fluid. Which tests are done depends on the type of blood group\u00a0incompatibility and the severity of symptoms, but may include:Complete blood count and immature red blood cell (reticulocyte) count, Bilirubin level, Blood typing. ", "Causes": "HDN may develop when\u00a0a mother and her unborn\u00a0baby have different blood types (called \"incompatibility\"). The mother produces substances called antibodies that attack the developing baby's red blood cells.The most common form of HDN is ABO incompatibility, which is usually not very severe. Other, less common types may cause more severe problems.The least common form is\u00a0Rh incompatibility, which can almost always be prevented. When\u00a0this form\u00a0does occur, it can\u00a0cause very severe anemia in the baby.", "Prevention": "The most severe form of this disease, which is caused by Rh incompatibility, can be prevented if the mother\u00a0is given a shot of\u00a0a medicine called RhoGAM at certain times during and after her pregnancy. If you have had a baby with this disease,\u00a0talk with your doctor if you plan to have another baby.", "Treatment": "After birth, a transfusion may need to be performed.Infants with mild HDN\u00a0may be treated with:Drugs used to treat allergic reactions (antihistamines), Drugs used to treat swelling and allergies (steroids), Feeding and fluids (hydration), Fluids given through a vein (intravenously), Light therapy using bilirubin lights, Medicines to raise blood pressure if it drops too low \r\n . "}, "Heart failure - palliative care": {"description": "Advance care directives are documents that state the type of care you would like to have if you are unable to speak for yourself."}, "Hemorrhoid surgery": {"description": "Often hemorrhoids do not cause problems. However, if hemorrhoids bleed a lot or cause pain, hemorrhoid surgery can remove them."}, "Hydromorphone overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Bluish-colored fingernails and lips", "Breathing problems -- slow and labored breathing, shallow breathing, or no breathing", "Cold, clammy skin", "Coma", "Confusion", "Dizziness", "Drowsiness", "Fatigue", "Lightheadedness", "Loss of consciousness", "Low blood pressure", "Muscle twitches", "Pinpoint pupils", "Spasms of the stomach and intestines", "Weakness", "Weak pulse"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Health risks of obesity": {"description": "Three things can be used to determine if a person's body fat gives them a higher chance of developing obesity-related diseases:"}, "Hypervitaminosis D": {"description": "Hypervitaminosis D is a condition that occurs after taking\u00a0very high\u00a0doses of vitamin D.", "Possible Complications": "Dehydration, Hypercalcemia, Kidney damage, Kidney stones. ", "Symptoms": ["Constipation", "Decreased appetite (anorexia)", "Dehydration", "Fatigue", "Irritability", "Muscle weakness", "Vomiting"], "Exams and Tests": "Excess calcium in the blood (hypercalcemia), Excess calcium in the urine (hypercalciuria), Excessive thirst (polydipsia), High blood pressure, Passing large amounts of urine (polyuria). Tests to confirm the diagnosis:1,25-dihydroxy vitamin D levels, 25-hydroxy vitamin D levels, Serum calcium, Serum phosphorus, X-ray of the bone. ", "Treatment": "Stop taking\u00a0vitamin D. Talk to your health care provider. In severe cases, other treatment may be needed.", "Prevention": "To prevent this condition, pay careful attention to the correct vitamin D dose.", "Causes": "The cause is excess intake of Vitamin D. The doses need to be very high, far above what a medical provider would normally prescribe.There has been a lot of confusion caused by internet articles about Vitamin D supplementation. It is extremely unusual for anybody to need more than 2000 IU of Vitamin D a day.For most people, Vitamin D toxicity only occurs with Vitamin D doses above 10,000 IU per day."}, "Heterochromia": {"description": "Heterochromia is\u00a0different colored eyes in the same person.", "Causes": "Most cases of heterochromia are hereditary, caused by a disease or syndrome, or due to an injury. Sometimes one eye may change color following certain diseases or injuries.Specific causes of eye color changes include:Bleeding (hemorrhage), Familial heterochromia, Foreign object in the eye, Glaucoma, or some medications used to treat it, Injury, Mild inflammation affecting only one eye, Neurofibromatosis, Waardenburg syndrome. "}, "Ham test": {"description": "The Ham test is a blood test done to diagnose paroxysmal nocturnal hemoglobinuria (PNH). The test checks whether red blood cells become more fragile when they are placed in mild acid."}, "Hypervitaminosis A": {"description": "Hypervitaminosis A is having too much vitamin A in the body.", "Possible Complications": "Excessively high calcium levels, Failure to thrive in infants, Kidney damage due to high calcium, Liver damage . Taking too much vitamin A during pregnancy may cause abnormal development in the growing baby. Talk to your health care provider about eating a proper diet while you are pregnant.", "Symptoms": ["Abnormal softening of the skull bone (craniotabes -- in infants and children)", "Blurred vision", "Bone pain or swelling", "Bulging fontanelle (the soft spot in an infant's skull)", "Changes in consciousness", "Decreased appetite", "Dizziness", "Double vision (in young children)", "Drowsiness", "Hair changes, such as hair loss and oily hair", "Headache", "Increased pressure in the skull", "Irritability", "Liver damage", "Nausea", "Poor weight gain (in infants and children)", "Skin changes, such as cracking at corners of the mouth, higher sensitivity to sunlight, oily skin, peeling, itching, and yellow color to the skin", "Vision changes", "Vomiting "], "Exams and Tests": "Bone x-rays, Blood calcium test, Cholesterol test, Liver function test, Blood test to check vitamin A levels. ", "Treatment": "Treatment involves simply stopping supplements (or rarely, foods) that contain vitamin A.", "Prevention": "To avoid hypervitaminosis A, avoid taking more than the recommended daily allowance of this vitamin. Recent emphasis on vitamin A and beta carotene as anticancer vitamins may contribute to chronic hypervitaminosis A, if people take more than is recommended.", "Causes": "There are two types of hypervitaminosis A:Acute -- when the vitamin A level in the body suddenly increases over a short period of time, Chronic -- when too much vitamin A is present in the body over a longer period of time. "}, "How to give a heparin shot": {"description": "\r\n\r\n \r\nBefore you can give a heparin shot, you need to fill the syringe with the right amount of medicine, decide where to give the shot, and know how to give the shot.\r\n"}, "How to use an inhaler - with spacer": {"description": "Metered-dose inhaler (MDI) administration - with spacer"}, "Hydrochloric acid poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain - severe", "Breathing difficulty due to swelling of throat", "Chest pain - severe", "Drooling ", "Fever", "Mouth pain - severe", "Rapid drop in blood pressure", "Throat pain - severe", "Vomiting blood", "Bluish color to lips and fingernails", "Chest tightness", "Choking", "Coughing", "Coughing up blood", "Dizziness", "Low blood pressure", "Rapid pulse", "Shortness of breath", "Weakness", "Blisters", "Burns", "Pain", "Vision loss"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or a local poison control center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Hepatitis B vaccine - what you need to know": {"description": "Content source: National Center for Immunization and Respiratory Diseases"}, "H2 receptor antagonists overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Abnormal heartbeat", "Confusion", "Diarrhea", "Difficulty breathing", "Dilated pupils", "Drowsiness", "Flushing", "Low blood pressure", "Nausea", "Rapid heartbeat or slow heartbeat", "Slurred speech", "Sweating", "Vomiting"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222.", "Prevention": "Keep all medications in child-proof bottles and out of the reach of children."}, "Hereditary amyloidosis": {"description": "Hereditary amyloidosis is a condition in which abnormal protein deposits (called amyloid) form in almost every tissue in the body, usually the heart, kidneys, and nervous system. These protein deposits damage the tissues and interfere with how organs work.", "Causes": "Hereditary amyloidosis is passed down from parents to their children (inherited). For more information see: Primary amyloidosis.Other types of amyloidosis are not inherited. They include:Senile systemic, seen in patients older than 70, Spontaneous, which means it occurs without a known cause, Secondary, which means it results from diseases such as cancer of the blood cells (myeloma). For further information, see the specific type:Cardiac amyloidosis, Cerebral amyloidosis, Secondary systemic amyloidosis. ", "Treatment": "A liver transplant may be helpful. Talk to your doctor or nurse about your treatment options."}, "Horner syndrome": {"description": "Horner syndrome is a rare condition that affects the nerves to the eye and face.", "Possible Complications": "There are no direct complications of Horner syndrome itself. However, there may be complications from the disease that caused Horner syndrome or from its treatment.", "Symptoms": ["Decreased sweating on the affected side of the face", "Drooping eyelid (ptosis)", "Sinking of the eyeball into the face", "Small (constricted) pupil (the black part in the center of the eye) "], "Exams and Tests": "An eye examination may show:Changes in how the pupil opens or closes, Eyelid drooping, Red eye . Your health care provider will do a complete examination to determine the possible effect on other parts of the nervous system. Depending on the suspected cause, you may need:Blood tests, Blood vessel tests (cerebral angiogram, CT angiogram, or MR angiogram, Chest x-ray or chest CT scan, MRI or CT scan of the brain, Spinal tap (lumbar puncture) . You may need to be referred to a doctor who specializes in vision problems related to the nervous system (neuro-ophthalmologist).", "Treatment": "Treatment depends on the cause of the problem. There is no treatment for Horner syndrome itself.", "Causes": "Horner syndrome can be caused by any interruption in a set of nerve fibers that start in the part of the brain called the hypothalamus and travel to the face and eyes.Sympathetic nerve fiber injuries can result from:Injury to one of the main arteries to the brain (carotid artery), Injury to nerves at the base of\u00a0the neck called the brachial plexus, Migraine or cluster headaches, Stroke, tumor, or other damage to a part of the brain called the brainstem, Tumor in the top of the lung, Injections or surgery done to interrupt the nerve fibers and relieve pain (sympathectomy) . In rare cases, Horner syndrome is present at birth (congenital). The condition may occur with a lack of color (pigmentation) of the iris (colored part of the eye)."}, "High blood pressure - what to ask your doctor ": {"description": "Below are some questions you may want to ask your doctor or nurse to help you take care of your blood pressure."}, "Hand or foot spasms": {"description": "Spasms are contractions of the muscles of the hands, thumbs, feet, or toes. Spasms are usually brief, but they can be severe and painful.", "Causes": "Cramps or spasms in the muscles often have no clear cause.Possible causes of hand or foot spasms include:\r\n Abnormal levels of electrolytes or minerals in the body\r\n , \r\n Brain disorders, such as Parkinson disease, multiple sclerosis, dystonia, and Huntington disease, \r\n Chronic kidney disease and dialysis\r\n , \r\n Damage to a single nerve or nerve group (mononeuropathy) or multiple nerves (polyneuropathy) that are connected to muscles\r\n , \r\n Dehydration (not having enough fluids in your body)\r\n , Hyperventilation (overbreathing), which is rapid or deep breathing that can occur with anxiety or panic\r\n , Muscle cramps, usually caused by overuse during sports or work activity, Pregnancy, more often during the third trimester, Thyroid disorders, Too little vitamin D, Use of certain medications . "}, "Herbal remedies and supplements for weight loss ": {"description": "Note for women: Pregnant or nursing women should never take diet medicines of any kind. This includes prescription, herbal, and other over-the-counter remedies. Over-the-counter refers to medicines, herbs, or supplements you can buy without a prescription."}, "Hypnotics": {"description": "Hypnotics are medications that cause sleep or partial loss of consciousness."}, "Histrionic personality disorder": {"description": "Histrionic personality disorder is a mental health condition in which people act in a very emotional and dramatic way that draws attention to themselves.", "Possible Complications": "Histrionic personality disorder may affect\u00a0a person's\u00a0social or romantic relationships. The person may be unable to cope with losses or failures. The person may change jobs often because of boredom and not being able to deal with frustration. A person with this disorder craves new things and excitement, which leads to risky situations. All of these factors may lead to a\u00a0higher chance\u00a0of depression.", "Symptoms": ["Acting or looking overly seductive", "Being easily influenced by other people", "Being overly concerned with their looks", "Being overly dramatic and emotional", "Being overly sensitive to criticism or disapproval", "Believing that relationships are more intimate than they actually are", "Blaming failure or disappointment on others", "Constantly seeking reassurance or approval", "Having a low tolerance for frustration or delayed gratification", "Needing to be the center of attention (self-centeredness)", "Quickly changing emotions, which may seem shallow to others"], "Exams and Tests": "Histrionic personality disorder is diagnosed based on a psychological evaluation\u00a0that assesses\u00a0the history and severity of the symptoms.The health care provider can diagnose histrionic personality disorder by looking at the person's:Behavior, History, Overall appearance, Psychological evaluation. ", "Treatment": "People with this condition often seek treatment when they experience depression or anxiety from failed romantic relationships or other conflicts with people. Medicine may help the symptoms. Talk therapy is the best treatment for the condition itself.", "Causes": "Cause of\u00a0histrionic personality\u00a0disorder is unknown. Genes and early childhood events may be responsible. It\u00a0is diagnosed\u00a0more often in women than in men. Doctors believe that more men may have the disorder than are diagnosed.Histrionic personality disorder usually begins by late teens or early 20s."}, "Hepatic": {"description": "The term \"hepatic\" refers to the liver. For example, the hepatic duct drains bile from the liver."}, "Handling sharps and needles": {"description": "Sharps are medical devices like needles, scalpels, and other tools that cut or go into the skin. Learning how to safely handle sharps is important to prevent accidental needle sticks and cuts."}, "Histoplasma skin test": {"description": "Histoplasma skin test is a method to check if you have been exposed to a fungus called Histoplasma capsulatum. The fungus causes an infection called histoplasmosis."}, "Hammer toe": {"description": "Hammer toe is a deformity of the toe, in which the end of the toe is bent downward.", "Symptoms": [], "Exams and Tests": "A physical examination of the foot confirms that you have hammer toe. The health care provider may find decreased and painful movement in the toes.", "Causes": "Hammer toe usually affects the second toe. However, it may also affect the other toes. The toe moves into a claw-like position.The most common cause of hammer toe is wearing short, narrow shoes that are too tight. The toe is forced into a bent position. Muscles and tendons in the toe tighten and become shorter.Hammer toe is more likely to occur in:Women who wear shoes that do not fit well or have high heels, Children who keep wearing shoes they have outgrown. The condition may be present at birth (congenital) or develop over time.In rare cases, all of the toes are affected. This may be caused by a problem with the nerves or spinal cord.", "Prevention": "Avoid wearing shoes that are too short or narrow. Check children's shoe sizes often, especially during periods of fast growth.", "Treatment": "Mild hammer toe in children can be treated by manipulating and splinting the affected toe.The following changes in footwear may help relieve symptoms:Wear the right size shoes or shoes with wide toe boxes for comfort, and to avoid making hammer toe worse., Avoid high heels as much as possible., Wear soft insoles to relieve pressure on the toe., Protect the joint that is sticking out with corn pads or felt pads. A foot doctor can make foot devices called hammer toe regulators or straighteners for you, or you can buy them at the store.Exercises may be helpful. You can try gentle stretching exercises if the toe is not already in a fixed position. PIcking up a towel with your toes can help stretch and straighten the small muscles in the foot.For severe hammer toe, you will need an operation to straighten the joint.The surgery often involves cutting or moving tendons and ligaments., Sometimes the bones on each side of the joint need to be connected (fused) together.. Most of the time, you will go home on the same day as the surgery. The toe may still be stiff afterward, and it may be shorter."}, "Hemoglobin derivatives": {"description": "This article discusses the test used to detect and measure the amount of hemoglobin derivatives in your blood."}, "Hip joint injection": {"description": "A hip injection is a shot of medicine into the hip joint. The medicine helps relieve pain and inflammation. It can also help diagnose the source of hip pain."}, "Hamstring strain - aftercare": {"description": "Pulled hamstring muscle"}, "Home apnea monitor use - infants": {"description": "The home apnea monitor is small and portable."}, "Hoarseness ": {"description": "Hoarseness refers to a difficulty making sounds when trying to speak. Vocal sounds may be weak, breathy, scratchy, or husky, and the pitch or quality of the voice may change.", "Causes": "Acid reflux (gastroesophageal reflux), Allergies, Breathing in irritating substances, Cancer of the throat or larynx, Chronic coughing, Colds or upper respiratory infections, Heavy smoking or drinking, especially together, Overuse or abuse of the voice (as in shouting or singing), which may cause swelling or growths on the vocal cords . Less common causes include:\u00a0Injury or irritation from a breathing tube or bronchoscopy, Damage to the nerves and muscles around the voice box (from trauma or surgery, Foreign object in the esophagus or trachea, Swallowing a harsh chemical liquid, Changes in the larynx during puberty, Thyroid or lung cancer, Underactive thyroid gland. \u00a0\u00a0\u00a0\u00a0\u00a0\u00a0\u00a0\u00a0\u00a0\u00a0 "}, "Hip pain": {"description": "Hip pain involves any pain in or around the hip joint. You may not feel pain from your hip directly over the hip area. You may feel it in your groin or pain in your thigh or knee. ", "Causes": "Hip pain may be caused by problems in the bones or cartilage of your hipHip fractures can cause of sudden hip pain. These injuries can be a serious and lead to major problems. Hip fractures are more common as people get older because falls are more likely and your bones become weaker., Infection in the bones or joints, Osteonecrosis of the hip, Arthritis\u00a0 -- often felt in the front part of your thigh or in your groin, Labral tear of the hip. Pain in or around the hip may also be caused by problems:Bursitis -- it hurts when you get up from a chair, walk, climb stairs, and drive, Hamstring, Iliotibial band syndrome, Hip flexor strain, Hip impingement syndrome, Groin strain, Snapping hip syndrome. Pain you feel in the hip may reflect a problem in your back, rather than your hip itself."}, "Hartnup disorder": {"description": "Hartnup disorder is an inherited metabolic condition that involves the transport of certain amino acids (for example, tryptophan and histidine) in the small intestine and kidneys.", "Possible Complications": "There are usually no complications. When they occur, complications may include:Changes in skin color that are permanent, Mental health problems, Rash, Uncoordinated movements. Nervous system symptoms can usually be reversed. However, in rare cases they can be severe or life threatening.", "Symptoms": ["Diarrhea", "Mood changes", "Nervous system (neurologic) problems, such as abnormal muscle tone", "Red, scaly skin rash, usually when skin is exposed to sunlight", "Sensitivity to light (photosensitivity)", "Short stature", "Uncoordinated movements"], "Exams and Tests": "A urine test that checks for high levels of \"neutral\" amino acids and normal levels of other amino acids may be done for this disorder.Health care providers can test for the gene\u00a0that causes\u00a0Hartnup disease, SLC6A19. Biochemical tests are also available.", "Treatment": "Treatments include:Avoiding sun exposure by wearing protective clothing and using a sunscreen with a protection factor of\u00a015 or higher, Eating a high-protein diet, Taking supplements containing nicotinamide, Undergoing mental health treatment, such as taking antidepressants or mood stabilizers, if mood swings or other mental health problems occur . ", "Prevention": "Genetic counseling may help prevent some cases. Eating a high-protein diet may prevent amino acid deficiencies that cause symptoms.", "Causes": "Hartnup disorder is possibly the most common metabolic condition involving amino acids. It is an inherited condition. A child must inherit a copy of the defective gene from both parents in order to be seriously affected.The condition usually starts between ages 3 - 5 years."}, "Heart-respiratory monitor - infants": {"description": "See also: Home apnea monitoring"}, "Herpangina": {"description": "See also: Hand, foot, and mouth disease", "Possible Complications": "Dehydration is the most common complication, but it can be treated by your doctor.", "Symptoms": ["Fever", "Headache", "Loss of appetite", "Sore throat, or painful swallowing", "Ulcers in the mouth and throat, and similar sores on the feet, hands, and buttocks"], "Exams and Tests": "Tests are not normally necessary.Your doctor can usually diagnose this condition by performing a physical exam and asking questions about the child's symptoms and medical history.", "Treatment": "The symptoms are treated as necessary:Take acetaminophen (Tylenol) or ibuprofen (Motrin) by mouth for fever and discomfort as the doctor recommends., Increase fluid intake, especially cold milk products. Gargle with cool water or try eating popsicles. Avoid hot beverages and citrus fruits., Eat a non-irritating diet. (Cold milk products, including ice cream, are often the best choices during herpangina infection. Fruit juices are too acidic and tend to irritate the mouth sores.) Avoid spicy, fried, or hot foods., Use topical anesthetics for the mouth (these may contain benzocaine or xylocaine and are usually not required).. ", "Prevention": "Good handwashing practices can help prevent the spread of the viruses that lead to this infection.", "Causes": "Herpangina is a common childhood infection. It is most often seen in children ages 3 - 10, but it can occur in any age group.It is typically caused by Coxsackie group A viruses. These viruses are contagious. Your child is at risk for herpangina if someone at school or home has the illness."}, "Hemophilia": {"Symptoms": [], "Exams and Tests": "Most often, hemophilia is diagnosed after a person has an abnormal bleeding episode Tests can also be done to detect the problem when other family members have the condition.", "description": "Some types of disorder include:", "Causes": "When you bleed, the body sends out a special protein to help the blood clot. There is a higher risk of bleeding when one or more of these clotting factors are missing.Hemophilia is caused by a lack of clotting factor VIII or IX in the blood. In most cases, hemophilia is passed down through families (inherited). Most of the time, it is passed to male children.", "Treatment": "The most common treatment is to replace the missing clotting factor in the blood through a vein (intravenous infusions).You will need extra care during surgery if you have a bleeding disorder. Therefore, it is important to get a diagnosis. It will also help you to warn family members who might be affected."}, "How to take statins": {"description": "Statins block how your liver makes cholesterol. Cholesterol can stick to the walls of your arteries and narrow or block them."}, "How to read food labels": {"description": "Food labels tell you the nutrition facts about the foods you buy. Use the food labels to help you choose healthier foods."}, "How to use an inhaler - no spacer": {"description": "Metered-dose inhaler (MDI) administration - no spacer"}, "Hydrogen peroxide poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain and cramping", "Breathing difficulty (if large concentrations were swallowed)", "Body aches", "Burns in the mouth and throat", "Chest pain", "Eye burns", "Seizures (rare)", "Stomach swelling", "Temporary white color to the skin", "Vomiting (sometimes with blood)"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Hantavirus": {"description": "Hantavirus is a life-threatening disease spread to humans by rodents. It has symptoms similar to influenza.", "Possible Complications": "Complications of hantavirus may include:Kidney failure, Heart and lung failure. These complications can lead to death.", "Symptoms": ["Chills", "Fever", "Muscle aches", "Dry cough", "General ill feeling (malaise)", "Headache", "Nausea and vomiting", "Shortness of breath "], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a physical exam. This may reveal:Acute respiratory distress syndrome (ARDS), Kidney failure, Low blood pressure (hypotension), Low blood oxygen levels, which cause the skin to turn a blue color . The following tests may be done:Blood tests to check for signs of hantavirus, Complete blood count (CBC), Complete metabolic panel, Kidney and liver function tests, X-ray of the chest\u00a0\u00a0, CT scan of the chest. ", "Treatment": "People with hantavirus are admitted to the hospital, often to the intensive care unit (ICU).Treatments will include:Oxygen, Breathing tube or breathing machine in severe cases, A medication called ribavirin to treat kidney-related problems and reduce the risk of death, Using special machines to oxygenate the blood outside of the body (Extracorporeal membrane oxygenation (ECMO). There is no effective treatment for hantavirus infection involving the lungs.", "Prevention": "Avoid exposure to rodent urine and droppings.When hiking and camping, pitch tents in areas where there are no rodent droppings., Avoid rodent dens., Drink disinfected water., Sleep on a ground cover and pad., Keep your home clean. Clear out potential nesting sites and clean your kitchen.. If you must work in an area where contact with rodent urine or feces is possible, follow these recommendations from the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC):When opening an unused cabin, shed, or other building, open all the doors and windows, leave the building, and allow the space to air out for 30 minutes., Return to the building and spray the surfaces, carpet, and other areas with a disinfectant. Leave the building for another 30 minutes., Spray mouse nests and droppings with a 10% solution of chlorine bleach or similar disinfectant. Allow it to sit for 30 minutes. Using rubber gloves, place the materials in plastic bags. Seal the bags and throw them in the trash or an incinerator. Dispose of gloves and cleaning materials in the same way., Wash all potentially contaminated hard surfaces with a bleach or disinfectant solution. Avoid vacuuming until the area has been thoroughly decontaminated. Then, vacuum the first few times with enough ventilation. Surgical masks may provide some protection.. ", "Causes": "Hantavirus is carried by rodents, especially deer mice. The virus is found in their urine and feces, but it does not make the animal sick.It is believed that humans can get sick with this virus if they come in contact with contaminated dust from mice nests or droppings. You may come in contact with such dust when cleaning homes, sheds, or other enclosed areas that have been empty for a long time.Hantavirus does not spread between humans.Rodents carrying the hantavirus have been found in many U.S. national parks. As of November 1, 2012, the National Park Service (NPS) has announced a total of 10 confirmed cases of hantavirus infection in people who recently visited Yosemite National Parks. Campers and hikers may be more likely to catch the disease than most people. This is because they pitch tents on the forest floor and lay their sleeping bags down in musty cabins.However, only a couple of cases have been directly linked to camping or hiking. Most people who are exposed to the virus have come in contact with rodent droppings in their own homes."}, "H1N1 influenza (Swine flu)": {"description": "The H1N1 virus (swine flu)\u00a0is an infection of the nose, throat, and lungs. It is caused by the H1N1 influenza virus.", "Causes": "Earlier forms of the H1N1 virus were found in pigs (swine). Over time, the virus changed (mutated) and infected humans. H1N1\u00a0is a new\u00a0virus first detected in humans in 2009. It spread quickly around the world.During the 2010-2010 flu season, the H1N1 virus has not caused widespread infections.\u00a0A separate vaccine\u00a0has not been needed, though the H1N1 virus is still one of the three viruses included in the regular (seasonal) vaccine.\u00a0You cannot get H1N1 flu virus from eating pork or any other food, drinking water, swimming in pools, or using hot tubs or saunas.Any flu virus can spread from person to person when:Someone with the flu coughs or sneezes into air that others breathe in., Someone touches a doorknob, desk, computer, or counter with the\u00a0flu virus\u00a0on it and then touches their mouth, eyes, or nose., Someone touches mucus while taking care of a child or adult who is ill with the flu.. "}, "High blood pressure and eye disease": {"Symptoms": ["Double vision, dim vision, or vision loss", "Headaches"], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will use an ophthalmoscope to look for narrowing of the blood vessels and signs that fluid has leaked from blood vessels.The degree of damage to the retina (retinopathy) is graded on a scale of 1 to 4:Grade 1: You may not have symptoms., Grades 2-3: There are a number of changes in the blood vessels, leaking from blood vessels, and swelling in other parts of the retina., Grade 4: You will have swelling of the optic nerve and of the visual center of the retina (macula). This swelling can cause decreased vision.. Fluorescein angiography may be used to examine the blood vessels.", "description": "Hypertensive retinopathy is damage to the retina from high blood pressure. The retina is the layer of tissue at the back part of the eye. It changes light and images that enter the eye into nerve signals that are sent to the brain.\r\n ", "Causes": "High blood pressure can damage blood vessels in the retina. The higher the blood pressure and the longer it has been high, the more severe the damage is likely to be.You have a higher risk of damage and vision loss when you have diabetes, high cholesterol level, or you smoke.Rarely, blood pressure readings suddenly become very high, but when they do, it can cause severe changes in the eye.Other problems with the retina are also more likely, such as: Damage to the nerves in the eye (ischemic optic neuropathy), due to poor blood flow, Blockage of the blood supply in the arteries to the retina (retinal artery occlusion), Blockage of the veins that carry blood away from the retina (retinal vein occlusion) . ", "Treatment": "The only treatment for hypertensive retinopathy is to control high blood pressure. "}, "Hearing loss": {"description": "Hearing loss is being partly or totally unable to hear sound in one or both ears.", "Causes": "Conductive hearing loss (CHL) occurs because of a mechanical problem in the outer or middle ear. This may be because:The three tiny bones of the ear (ossicles) are not conducting sound properly., The eardrum is\u00a0not vibrating in response to sound.. Causes of conductive hearing loss can often be treated. They include:Buildup of wax in the ear canal, Damage to the very small bones (ossicles) that are right behind the eardrum, Fluid remaining in the ear after an ear infection, Foreign object that is stuck in the ear canal, Hole in the eardrum, Scar on the eardrum from repeat infections . Sensorineural hearing loss (SNHL) occurs when the tiny hair cells (nerve endings) that detect sound in the ear are injured, diseased, do not work correctly, or have died. This type of hearing loss often cannot be reversed.Sensorineural hearing loss is commonly caused by:Acoustic neuroma, Age-related hearing loss, Childhood infections, such as meningitis, mumps, scarlet fever, and measles, M\u00e9ni\u00e8re's disease, Regular exposure to loud noises (such as from work or recreation), Use of certain medicines . Hearing loss may be present at birth (congenital) and can be due to:Birth defects that cause changes in the ear structures, Genetic conditions (more than 400 are known), Infections the mother passes to her baby in the womb (such as toxoplasmosis, rubella, or herpes)\u00a0 . The ear can also be injured by:Pressure differences between the inside and outside of the eardrum, often from scuba diving, Skull fractures (can damage the structures or nerves of the ear), Trauma from explosions, fireworks, gunfire, rock concerts, and earphones. "}, "Hip or knee replacement - in the hospital after ": {"description": "Hip replacement surgery - after - self-care; Knee replacement surgery - after - self-care"}, "Hyperventilation": {"description": "Hyperventilation is rapid or deep breathing that can occur with anxiety or panic. It is also called overbreathing, and it may leave you feeling breathless.", "Causes": "Anxiety and nervousness, Bleeding, Cardiac disease, such as congestive heart failure or heart attack, Drugs (such as an aspirin overdose), Infection such as pneumonia or sepsis, Ketoacidosis and similar medical conditions , Lung disease such as asthma, chronic obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD), or pulmonary embolism, Panic attack, Pregnancy, Severe pain, Situations where there is a psychological advantage in having a sudden, dramatic illness (for example, somatization disorder), Stimulant use, Stress. "}, "Hepatitis A vaccine - what you need to know": {"description": "Content source: National Center for Immunization and Respiratory Diseases"}, "Hydrops fetalis": {"description": "Hydrops fetalis is a serious condition. It occurs when abnormal amounts of fluid buildup in two or more body areas of a fetus or newborn. It is a symptom of underlying problems.\r\n", "Possible Complications": "Brain damage called kernicterus may occur.", "Symptoms": ["Liver swelling", "Change in skin color (pallor)", "Breathing problems", "Bruising or purplish bruise-like spots on the skin", "Heart failure", "Severe anemia", "Severe jaundice", "Total body swelling"], "Exams and Tests": "An ultrasound done during pregnancy may show:High amounts of amniotic fluid, Abnormally large placenta, Fluid that leads to swelling in the unborn baby's belly area and organs, including the liver, spleen, heart, or lung area. An amniocentesis and frequent ultrasounds will be done to determine the severity of the condition.", "Treatment": "Treatment depends on the cause. During pregnancy, treatment may include:Medicine to cause early labor and delivery of the baby, Early cesarean delivery if condition gets worse, Giving blood to the baby while still in the womb (intrauterine fetal blood transfusion). Treatment for a newborn may include:Direct transfusion of red blood cells that match the infant\u2019s blood type. An exchange transfusion to rid the baby's body of the substances that are destroying the red blood cells is also done., Removing extra fluid from around the lungs and belly area with a needle, Medicines to control heart failure and help the kidneys remove extra fluids, Methods to help the baby breathe, such as a breathing machine . ", "Prevention": "Rh incompatibility can be prevented if the mother takes a medicine called RhoGAM during and after pregnancy.", "Causes": "There are two types of hydrops fetalis -- immune and nonimmune. The type depends on the cause of the abnormal fluid. Immune hydrops fetalis is a complication of a severe form of Rh incompatibility. This is a condition in which mother who has Rh negative blood type makes antibodies to her baby\u2019s Rh positive blood cells, and the antibodies cross the placenta. Rh incompatibility causes a large number of red blood cells in the fetus to be destroyed. This leads to problems including total body swelling. Severe swelling can interfere with how the body organs work., Nonimmune hydrops fetalis occurs when a disease or medical condition upsets the body's ability to manage fluid. There are three main causes for this type: heart or lung problems, severe anemia (e.g. from thalassemia or infections), and genetic or developmental problems, including Turner syndrome.. The number of babies who develop immune hydrops fetalis has dropped due to a medicine called RhoGAM. This drug is used to treat pregnant mothers at risk for Rh incompatibility.\r\n"}, "Hernia": {"description": "Which type of hernia you have depends on where it is:", "Possible Complications": "In rare cases, inguinal hernia repair can damage structures involved in the function of a man's testicles.Another risk of hernia surgery is nerve damage, which can lead to numbness in the groin area.If a part of the bowel was trapped or strangulated before surgery, bowel perforation or dead bowel may result.", "Symptoms": [], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider can usually see or feel a hernia when you are examined. You may be asked to cough, bend, push, or lift. The hernia may get bigger when you do this. The hernia (bulge) may not be easily seen in infants and children, except when the child is crying or coughing. Ultrasound or CT scan may be done to look for a hernia.If there is a blockage in the bowel, an x-ray of the abdomen will likely be done. ", "Treatment": "Surgery is the only treatment that can permanently fix a hernia. Surgery may be more risky for patients with serious medical problems. Surgery secures the weakened abdominal wall tissue (fascia) and closes any holes. Most hernias are closed with cloth patches to plug the hole.An umbilical hernia that does not heal on its own by the time a child is 5 years old will likely be repaired.", "Prevention": "Use proper lifting techniques., Lose weight if you are overweight., Relieve or avoid constipation by eating plenty of fiber, drinking lots of fluid, going to the bathroom as soon as you have the urge, and exercising regularly., Men should see their health care provider if they strain with urination. This may be a symptom of an enlarged prostate.. ", "Causes": "Usually, there is no clear cause of a hernia. Sometimes, hernias occur with heavy lifting, straining while using the toilet, or any activity that raises the pressure inside the belly. Hernias may be present at birth, but the bulge may not be noticeable until later in life. Some persons have a family history of hernias.Babies and children can get hernias. It happens when there is weakness in the belly wall. About 5 out of 100 children have inguinal hernias. They are more common in boys. Some children do not have symptoms until they are adults.Any activity or medical problem that increases pressure on the tissue in the belly wall and muscles may lead to a hernia, including:Chronic constipation and pushing hard (straining) to have a bowel movement, Chronic cough, Cystic fibrosis, Enlarged prostate, straining to urinate, Extra weight, Fluid in the abdomen (ascites), Heavy lifting, Peritoneal dialysis, Poor nutrition, Smoking, Overexertion, Undescended testicles. "}, "Hysterectomy - laparoscopic - discharge": {"description": "You probably spent 1 day in the hospital."}, "Hypocalcemia - infants": {"Symptoms": [], "Exams and Tests": "Diagnosis is usually made when a blood test shows that the infant's calcium level\u00a0is low.", "description": "Hypocalcemia is an abnormally low blood calcium level. This article discusses low blood calcium level in infants.", "Causes": "Calcium is a salt that helps the heart and muscles work. A healthy baby usually has very careful control of blood calcium level.Hypocalcemia is more likely to occur in newborns, especially in those who were born too early (preemies). Common causes of hypocalcemia in a newborn include:Certain medications, Diabetes in the birth mother, Episodes of very low oxygen levels, Infection, Stress caused by serious illness. There are also some rare illnesses that can lead to low calcium level, such as DiGeorge syndrome and congenital hypoparathyroidism.", "Treatment": "The baby may get extra calcium, if needed."}, "Head and face reconstruction": {"description": "Head and face reconstruction is surgery to repair or reshape deformities of the head and face (craniofacial)."}, "Hand-foot-mouth disease": {"description": "Hand-foot-mouth disease is a common viral infection that\u00a0most often\u00a0begins in the throat.", "Possible Complications": "Loss of body fluids (dehydration), Seizures due to high fever (febrile seizures) . ", "Symptoms": ["Fever", "Headache", "Loss of appetite", "Rash with very small blisters on the\u00a0hands, feet, and diaper area that\u00a0may be tender or painful\u00a0when pressed", "Sore throat", "Ulcers in the throat (including tonsils), mouth, and tongue "], "Exams and Tests": "A history of recent illness and a\u00a0physical examination, demonstrating the characteristic vesicles on the hands and feet, are usually sufficient to diagnose the disease.", "Treatment": "There is no specific treatment for the infection other than relief of symptoms.Antibiotics do not work\u00a0because the infection is caused by a virus. (Antibiotics treat infections caused by bacteria, not viruses.) To relieve symptoms, the following home care can be used:Over-the-counter medicines, such as acetaminophen (such as Tylenol) or ibuprofen can be used to treat fever. Aspirin should not be used in viral illnesses in children under age 18., Salt water mouth rinses (1/2 teaspoon of salt to 1 glass of warm water) may be soothing. , Drink plenty of fluids. Extra fluid is needed when there is a fever. The best fluids are cold milk products.\u00a0Do not drink juice or soda because their acid content causes burning pain in the ulcers.. ", "Prevention": "Avoid contact with people with HFMD. Wash your hands well and often, especially if you\u00a0are in contact with people who are sick. Also teach children to wash their hands well and often.", "Causes": "Hand-foot-and-mouth disease (HFMD) is most commonly caused by a virus called\u00a0coxsackievirus A16.Children under age 10 are most often affected. Teens and adults can sometimes get the infection. HFMD usually occurs in the summer and early fall.The virus\u00a0can spread from person-to-person through tiny, air droplets that are released when the sick person sneezes, coughs, or blows their nose. You can catch hand-foot-and-mouth disease if:A person with the infection sneezes, coughs, or blows their nose near you, You touch your nose, eyes, or mouth after you have touched something contaminated by the virus, such as a toy or doorknob, You touch the stools or the fluid from blisters of an infected person. The virus is most easily spread the first week\u00a0a person has the disease."}, "Heart disease and women": {"description": "Good nutrition is important to your heart health, and it will help control some of your heart disease risk factors."}, "Healthy habits for weight loss": {"description": "These healthy eating habits can help you lose weight and keep it off."}, "Heart failure - discharge": {"description": "While you were in the hospital:"}, "Home blood sugar testing": {"description": "Not everyone with diabetes needs to check their blood sugar every day. And some people need to check it many times a day."}, "Hyperactivity": {"description": "Hyperactivity means having increased movement, impulsive actions, and a shorter attention span, and being easily distracted.", "Causes": "Attention deficit hyperactivity\u00a0disorder (ADHD), Brain or central nervous system disorders, Emotional disorders, Hyperthyroidism. "}, "Hypoventilation": {"description": "If a person hypoventilates, the body's carbon dioxide level rises. This causes a buildup of acid and too little oxygen in the blood."}, "Health screening - men age 65 and older": {"description": "You\u00a0should visit\u00a0your health care provider regularly, even if\u00a0you feel healthy. The purpose of these visits is to:"}, "Herpes viral culture of lesion": {"description": "Herpes viral culture of a lesion is a laboratory test to check if a skin sore is infected with the herpes simplex virus.\r\n"}, "Heartburn - what to ask your doctor ": {"description": "Below are some questions you may want to ask your doctor or nurse to help you take care of your heartburn and reflux."}, "Heart palpitations": {"Prevention": "Adopting a healthy lifestyle, including a heart healthy diet and regular exercise, may help prevent palpitations.", "description": "The heart's rhythm may be normal or abnormal when you have palpitations.", "Causes": "Heart palpitations can be due to:\r\n Anxiety, stress, panic attack, or fear\r\n , \r\n Caffeine\u00a0intake, Nicotine intake\r\n , \r\n Cocaine or other illegal drugs\r\n , \r\n Diet pills\r\n , \r\n Exercise\r\n , \r\n Fever\r\n . However, some palpitations are due to an abnormal heart rhythm, which may be caused by:Heart disease, Abnormal heart valve, such as mitral valve prolapse, Abnormal blood level of potassium, Certain medicines, including those used to treat asthma, high blood pressure, or heart problems, Overactive thyroid, Low level of oxygen in your blood . "}, "Heart failure - fluids and diuretics": {"description": "Your\u00a0health care provider\u00a0may ask you to lower the amount of fluids you drink:"}, "Humidifiers and health": {"description": "Humidifier tips:"}, "Human bites": {"Symptoms": ["Skin breaks or major cuts with or without bleeding", "Puncture wounds", "Bruising", "Crushing injuries"], "description": "In a fight, for example, one person's knuckles may come into contact with another person's teeth, and if the impact breaks the skin, the injury would be considered a bite.", "Prevention": "Teach young children not to bite others., Never put your hand near or in the mouth of someone who is having a seizure.. "}, "Hysterosalpingography": {"description": "Hysterosalpingography is a special x-ray using dye to look at the womb (uterus) and fallopian tubes."}, "Hypothyroidism": {"description": "Hypothyroidism is a condition in which the thyroid gland does not make enough thyroid hormone. This condition is often called underactive thyroid.", "Possible Complications": "Myxedema coma, the most severe form of hypothyroidism, is rare. It occurs when thyroid hormone levels get very low. It\u00a0can be caused by an infection, illness, exposure to cold, or certain medicines in people with untreated hypothyroidism.Myxedema coma is a medical emergency that must be treated in the hospital. Some patients may need oxygen, breathing assistance (ventilator), fluid replacement, and intensive-care nursing. Symptoms and signs of myxedema coma include:Below normal temperature, Decreased breathing, Low blood pressure, Low blood sugar, Unresponsiveness, Inappropriate or uncharacteristic moods . People with untreated hypothyroidism are at increased risk of:Infection, Infertility, miscarriage, giving birth to a baby with birth defects, Heart disease because of higher levels of LDL (\"bad\") cholesterol, Heart failure . ", "Symptoms": ["Hard stools or constipation", "Increased sensitivity to cold temperature", "Fatigue or feeling slowed down\u00a0", "Heavier and irregular menstrual periods", "Joint or muscle pain", "Paleness or dry skin", "Sadness or depression", "Thin, brittle hair or fingernails", "Weakness", "Weight gain", "Decreased taste and smell", "Hoarseness", "Puffy face, hands, and feet", "Slow speech", "Thickening of the skin", "Thinning of eyebrows"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will do a physical exam and find that your thyroid gland is enlarged.\u00a0Sometimes, the gland is normal size or smaller-than-normal. The exam may also reveal:Brittle nails, Coarse features of the face, Pale or dry skin, which may be cool to the touch, Reflexes that are abnormal, Swelling of the arms and legs, Thin and brittle hair. Blood tests are also ordered to measure your thyroid hormones TSH and T4.\u00a0\u00a0\u00a0 You may also have tests to check:Cholesterol levels, Complete blood count (CBC), Liver enzymes, Prolactin, Sodium. ", "Treatment": "Treatment is aimed at replacing the thyroid hormone you are\u00a0lacking. Levothyroxine is the most commonly used medicine: You will be prescribed the lowest dose possible that relieves your symptoms and brings your blood hormone levels back to normal., If you have heart disease or you are older, your doctor may start\u00a0you on\u00a0a very small dose., Most people with an underactive thyroid will need to take this medicine for life. . When starting you on your medicine, your doctor may check your hormone levels every 2\u00a0to 3 months. After that, your thyroid hormone levels should be monitored at least\u00a0once\u00a0every\u00a0year.When you are taking thyroid medicine, be aware of the following:Do\u00a0not stop taking the medicine even when you feel better. Continue taking\u00a0it exactly as your doctor prescribed., If you change brands of thyroid medicine, let your doctor know. Your levels may need to be checked., What you eat can change the way your body absorbs thyroid medicine. Talk with your doctor if you are eating a lot of soy products or are on a high-fiber diet., Thyroid medicine works best on an empty stomach and when taken 1 hour before any other medications. Ask your doctor if you should take your medicine at bedtime. Studies have found that taking it at bedtime may allow your body to absorb the medicine better than taking it in the daytime., Wait at least 4 hours after taking thyroid hormone before you\u00a0take fiber supplements, calcium, iron, multivitamins, aluminum hydroxide antacids, colestipol, or medicines that bind bile acids. . While you are taking thyroid replacement therapy, tell your doctor if you have any symptoms\u00a0that suggest your dose is too high,\u00a0such as:Palpitations, Rapid weight loss, Restlessness or shakiness, Sweating. ", "Causes": "The thyroid gland is an important organ of the endocrine system. It is located\u00a0at\u00a0the front of the neck, just above where your collarbones meet. The thyroid makes hormones that control the way every cell in the body uses energy. This process is called metabolism.Hypothyroidism is more common in women and people over age 50.The most common cause of hypothyroidism is thyroiditis. Swelling and inflammation\u00a0damage the thyroid gland's cells. Causes of this problem include: The immune system\u00a0attacking\u00a0the thyroid gland, Viral infections (common cold) or other respiratory infections, Pregnancy (often called postpartum thyroiditis). Other causes of hypothyroidism include:Certain medicines, such as lithium and amiodarone, Congenital (birth) defects, Radiation treatments to the neck or brain to treat different cancers, Radioactive iodine used to treat an overactive thyroid gland, Surgical removal of part or all of the thyroid gland, Sheehan syndrome, a condition that may occur in a woman who bleeds severely during pregnancy or childbirth and causes the destruction of the pituitary gland, Pituitary tumor or pituitary surgery. "}, "Hepatic ischemia": {"description": "Hepatic ischemia is a condition in which the liver does not get enough blood or oxygen, causing injury to liver cells.", "Possible Complications": "Liver failure is a rare but life-threatening complication.", "Symptoms": [], "Exams and Tests": "The following tests will be done:Blood tests to check liver function (AST and ALT ), Doppler ultrasound of the liver's blood vessels. ", "Treatment": "Treatment depends on the cause. Low blood pressure and blood clots must be properly treated.", "Prevention": "Quickly treating the causes of low blood pressure may prevent hepatic ischemia.", "Causes": "Low blood pressure from any condition can lead to hepatic ischemia. Such conditions may include:Abnormal heart rhythms, Dehydration, Heart failure, Infection, Severe bleeding. Other causes may include:Blood clots in the main artery to the liver (hepatic artery) after a liver transplant, Swelling of blood vessels leading to reduced blood flow (vasculitis). "}, "Histoplasmosis": {"description": "Histoplasmosis is an infection that occurs from breathing in the spores of the fungus Histoplasma capsulatum.", "Possible Complications": "Scarring in the chest cavity may put pressure on the: Major blood vessels carrying blood to and from the heart, Heart, Esophagus (food pipe), Lymph nodes . Enlarged lymph nodes in the chest may press on body parts such as the esophagus and blood vessels of the lungs.", "Symptoms": ["Fever and chills", "Cough and chest pain that gets worse when breathing in", "Joint pain", "Mouth sores", "Red skin bumps, most often on the lower legs ", "Chest pain and shortness of breath", "Cough, possibly coughing up blood", "Fever and sweating ", "Chest pain from swelling in the lining around the heart", "Headache and neck stiffness from swelling in the covering of the brain (meninges) and spinal cord", "High fever "], "Exams and Tests": "Histoplasmosis is diagnosed by:Biopsy of the lung, skin, liver, or bone marrow, Blood or urine tests to detect histoplasmosis proteins or antibodies, Cultures of the blood, urine, or sputum (this test provides the clearest diagnosis of histoplasmosis, but results can take 6 weeks) . To help diagnose this condition, your health care provider may do a:Bronchoscopy, Chest CT scan, Chest x-ray, Spinal tap to look for signs of infection in cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) . ", "Treatment": "Most of the time, this infection goes away without treatment. If you are sick for more than 1 month or are having trouble breathing, your provider may prescribe medicine. The main treatment for histoplasmosis is antifungal drugs. Antifungals may need to be given through a vein, depending on the form or stage of disease., Some of these medicines can have side effects. . Sometimes, long-term treatment with antifungal drugs may be needed. You may need to take these medicines for up to 1 to 2 years.", "Prevention": "Histoplasmosis may be prevented by reducing exposure to dust in chicken coops, bat caves, and other high-risk locations. Wear masks and other protective equipment if you work in or go into these environments.", "Causes": "Histoplasmosis is a fungal infection. It occurs throughout the world. In the United States, it is most common in the southeastern, mid-Atlantic, and central states.Histoplasma fungus grows as a mold in the soil. You may get sick when you breathe in spores produced by the fungus. Soil that contains bird or bat droppings may have larger amounts of this fungus. The threat is greatest after an old building is torn down, or in caves.This infection can occur in people with a normal immune system, but having a weakened immune system increases the risk of getting or reactivating this disease. Very young or very old people, or those with AIDS, cancer, or an organ transplant have more severe symptoms.People with chronic (long-term) lung disease (such as emphysema and bronchiectasis) are also at higher risk for a more severe infection."}, "Hemolytic crisis": {"description": "Hemolytic crisis is the rapid destruction of large numbers of red blood cells (hemolysis). The destruction occurs much faster than the body can produce new red blood cells.", "Causes": "Causes of hemolysis include:A lack of certain proteins\u00a0inside red blood cells, Autoimmune diseases, Certain infections, Defects in the hemoglobin molecules inside red blood cells, Defects of the proteins that make up the internal framework of red blood cells, Medication side effects, Reactions to blood transfusions. "}, "Heart bypass surgery": {"description": "Heart bypass surgery creates a new route, called a bypass, for blood and oxygen to reach your heart. "}, "Hematocrit": {"description": "Hematocrit is a blood test that measures the percentage of the volume of whole blood that is made up of red blood cells. This measurement depends on the number of red blood cells and the size of red blood cells."}, "Hereditary urea cycle abnormality": {"description": "Hereditary urea cycle abnormality is an inherited condition that can cause problems with the removal of waste from the body in the urine.", "Possible Complications": "Coma, Confusion and eventually disorientation, Death, Increases in blood ammonia level, Swelling of the brain. ", "Symptoms": ["Confusion", "Decreased food intake", "Dislike of\u00a0foods that contain protein\u00a0", "Increased sleepiness, difficulty waking up", "Nausea, vomiting "], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will often diagnose these disorders when the child is still an infant.Signs may include:Abnormal amino acids in blood and urine, Abnormal level of orotic acid in blood or urine, High blood ammonia level, Normal level of acid in blood. Tests may include:Genetic tests, Liver biopsy, MRI or CT scan \r\n . ", "Treatment": "Limiting protein in the diet can help treat these disorders by reducing the amount of nitrogen wastes the body produces. Special low-protein infant and toddler formulas are available.It is important that a health care provider guide protein intake. The health care provider can balance the amount of protein so that the baby has enough to grow, but not enough to cause symptoms.It is extremely important for people with these disorders to avoid fasting.People with urea cycle abnormalities must also be very careful under times of stress, such as when they have infections. Stress, such as a fever, can cause the body to break down its own proteins. These extra proteins can make it difficult for the abnormal urea cycle to remove the byproducts.Develop a plan with your doctor for when you are sick to avoid all protein, drink high carbohydrate drinks, and get enough fluids.Most patients with urea cycle disorders will need to stay in the hospital at some point. During such times, they may be treated with medicines that help the body remove nitrogen-containing wastes. Dialysis may help rid the body of excess ammonia during extreme illness.", "Prevention": "As with most inherited diseases, there is no way to prevent these disorders. Prenatal testing is available. Genetic testing before an embryo is implanted may be available for those using in vitro fertilization.Teamwork between parents, the affected child, and doctors can help prevent severe illness.", "Causes": "The urea cycle is a process in which waste (ammonia) is removed from the body. When you eat proteins, the body breaks them down into amino acids. Ammonia is produced from leftover amino acids, and it must be removed from the body.The liver produces several chemicals (enzymes) that change ammonia into a form called urea, which the body can remove in the urine. If this process is disturbed, ammonia levels begin to rise.Several inherited conditions can cause problems with this waste-removal process. People with a urea cycle disorder are missing a gene that makes the enzymes needed to break down ammonia in the body.These diseases include:Argininosuccinic aciduria, Arginase deficiency, Carbamyl phosphate synthetase (CPS) deficiency, Citrullinemia, N-acetyl glutamate synthetase deficiency (NAGS), Ornithine transcarbamylase deficiency (OTC). As a group, these disorders occur in 1 in 30,000 newborns. Ornithine transcarbamylase deficiency is the most common of these disorders.Boys are more often affected by ornithine transcarbamylase deficiency than girls. Girls are rarely affected. Those girls who are affected have milder symptoms and develop the disease later in life.To get the other types of disorders, you need to receive a non-working copy of the gene from both parents. Sometimes parents don't know they carry the gene until their child gets the disorder."}, "Hair transplant": {"description": "A hair transplant is a surgical procedure to improve baldness."}, "Hepatic vein obstruction (Budd-Chiari)": {"description": "Hepatic vein obstruction is a blockage of the hepatic vein, which carries blood away from the liver.", "Possible Complications": "Hepatic vein obstruction can get worse and lead to liver failure, which can be life threatening.", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal swelling or stretching", "Pain in the right upper abdomen", "Vomiting blood", "Yellowing of the skin (jaundice)"], "Exams and Tests": "One of the signs is swelling of the abdomen from fluid buildup (ascites). The liver is often swollen and tender.Tests include:CT scan or MRI of the abdomen, Doppler ultrasound of the liver veins, Liver biopsy, Liver function tests, Ultrasound of the liver. ", "Treatment": "Treatment varies, depending on the cause of the blockage.Your doctor may recommend the following medicines:Blood thinners (anticoagulants) , Clot-busting drugs (thrombolytic treatment), Medicines to treat the liver disease, including ascites. Surgery may be recommended. This may involve:Angioplasty and stent placement, Liver transplant, Transjugular intrahepatic portosystemic shunt (TIPS), Venous shunt surgery . ", "Causes": "Hepatic vein obstruction prevents blood from flowing out of the liver and back to the heart. This blockage can cause liver damage. Obstruction of this vein can be caused by a tumor or growth pressing on the vessel, or by a clot in the vessel (hepatic vein thrombosis).Most often, it is caused by conditions that make blood clots more likely to form, including:Abnormal growth of cells in the bone marrow (myeloproliferative disorders), Cancers, Chronic inflammatory or autoimmune diseases, Infections, Inherited (hereditary) or acquired problems with blood clotting, Oral contraceptives, Pregnancy. Hepatic vein obstruction is the most common cause of Budd-Chiari syndrome."}, "Hepatomegaly": {"description": "If both the liver and spleen are enlarged, it is called hepatosplenomegaly.", "Causes": "The liver is involved in many of the body's functions. It is affected by many conditions that can cause hepatomegaly, including:Alcohol use, Cancer metastases (spread of cancer to the liver), Congestive heart failure, Glycogen storage disease, Hepatitis A, Hepatitis B, Hepatitis C, Hepatocellular carcinoma, Hereditary fructose intolerance, Infectious mononucleosis, Leukemia, Niemann-Pick disease, Primary biliary cirrhosis, Reye syndrome, Sarcoidosis, Sclerosing cholangitis, Steatosis (fat in the liver from metabolic problems such as diabetes, obesity, and high triglycerides, also called nonalcoholic steatohepatitis, or NASH). "}, "Headache - what to ask your doctor ": {"description": "Below are some questions you may want to ask your doctor or nurse about your headaches."}, "HPV DNA test": {"description": "HPV\u00a0infection around the genitals is common. It can be spread during sex. "}, "Hair straightener poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Loss of vision", "Severe pain in the throat", "Severe pain or burning in the nose, eyes, ears, lips, or tongue", "Blood in the stool", "Burns of the food pipe (esophagus)", "Severe abdominal pain", "Vomiting", "Vomiting blood", "Collapse", "Low blood pressure that develops rapidly", "Severe change in blood acid levels -- leads to organ damage", "Breathing difficulty", "Throat swelling (may cause breathing difficulty)", "Burn", "Holes (necrosis) in the skin or tissues underneath", "Irritation"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Hepatitis": {"description": "Hepatitis is swelling and inflammation of the liver.", "Possible Complications": "Permanent liver damage, called cirrhosis\r\n  , Liver failure\r\n  , Liver cancer\r\n  . ", "Symptoms": ["Pain or bloating in the belly area\r\n ", "Dark urine and pale or clay-colored stools\r\n ", "Fatigue\r\n ", "Low fever\r\n ", "Itching\r\n ", "Jaundice (yellowing of the skin or eyes)\r\n ", "Loss of appetite\r\n ", "Nausea and vomiting\r\n ", "Weight loss\r\n "], "Exams and Tests": "You will have a physical exam to look for:\r\nEnlarged and tender liver\r\n , Fluid in the abdomen (ascites)\r\n , Yellowing of the skin\r\n . Your doctor may order lab tests to diagnose and monitor your condition, including:\r\nUltrasound of the abdomen\r\n , Autoimmune blood markers\r\n , Tests to diagnose Hepatitis A, B, or C\r\n , Liver function tests\r\n , Liver biopsy to check for liver damage\r\n , Paracentesis (if fluid is in your abdomen)\r\n . ", "Treatment": "Your doctor will talk to you about\u00a0treatment options. Treatments will vary, depending on the cause of your liver disease. You may need to eat a high-calorie diet if you are losing weight.", "Prevention": "Talk to your doctor about receiving a vaccine to prevent hepatitis A and hepatitis B.\r\nSteps for preventing the spread of hepatitis B and C from one person to another include:Avoid sharing personal items, such as razors or toothbrushes.\r\n  , Do not share drug needles or other drug equipment (such as straws for snorting drugs).\r\n  , Clean blood spills with a mixture of 1 part household bleach to 9 parts water.\r\n  , Do not get tattoos or body piercings with instruments that have not been cleaned properly.\r\n  . To reduce your risk of spreading or catching hepatitis A:\r\nAlways wash your hands well after using the restroom, and when you come in contact with an infected person's blood, stools, or other bodily fluid.\r\n  , Avoid unclean food and water.\r\n  . ", "Causes": "Hepatitis can be caused by:\r\nImmune cells in the body attacking the liver, Infections from viruses (such as hepatitis A, hepatitis B, or hepatitis C), bacteria, or parasites\r\n , Liver damage from alcohol or poison\r\n , Medicines, such as an overdose of acetaminophen\r\n . Liver disease can also be caused by inherited disorders such as cystic fibrosis or hemochromatosis, a condition that involves having too much iron in your body.\r\nOther causes include Wilson's disease, a\u00a0disorder in which\u00a0the body to retains\u00a0too much\u00a0copper."}, "Hysterectomy - abdominal - discharge": {"description": "Most people spend 2 to 5 days in the hospital after this surgery."}, "Hip or knee replacement - after - what to ask your doctor ": {"description": "Below are some questions you may want to ask your doctor or nurse to help you take care of your new joint."}, "Hypoplastic left heart syndrome": {"description": "Hypoplastic left heart syndrome occurs when parts of the left side of the heart (mitral valve, left ventricle, aortic valve, and aorta) do not develop completely. The condition is present at birth (congenital).", "Possible Complications": "Complications include:Blockage of the artificial shunt, Chronic diarrhea (from a disease called protein-losing enteropathy), Fluid in the abdomen (ascites) and in the lungs (pleural effusion), Heart failure, Irregular, fast heart rhythms (arrhythmias), Strokes and other\u00a0nervous system\u00a0complications, Sudden death. ", "Symptoms": ["Bluish (cyanosis) or poor skin color", "Cold hands and feet (extremities)", "Lethargy", "Poor pulse", "Poor suckling and feeding", "Pounding heart", "Rapid breathing", "Shortness of breath"], "Exams and Tests": "A physical exam may show signs of heart failure:Faster than normal heart rate, Lethargy, Liver enlargement, Rapid breathing. Also, the pulse at various locations (wrist, groin, and others) may be very weak. There are usually (but not always) abnormal heart sounds when listening to the chest.Tests may include:Cardiac catheterization, ECG, Echocardiogram, X-ray of the chest. ", "Treatment": "Once the diagnosis of hypoplastic left heart is made, the baby will be admitted to the neonatal intensive care unit. A breathing machine (ventilator) may be needed to help the baby breathe. A medicine called prostaglandin E1 is used to keep blood circulating to the body by keeping the ductus arteriosus open.These measures do not solve the problem. The condition always requires surgery.The first surgery, called the Norwood operation, occurs within the baby's first few days of life. The Norwood procedure consists of building a new aorta by:Using the pulmonary valve and artery, Connecting the hypoplastic old aorta and coronary arteries to the new aorta, Removing the wall between the atria (atrial septum), Making an artificial connection from either the right ventricle or a body-wide artery to the pulmonary artery to maintain blood flow to the lungs (called a shunt). Afterward, the baby usually goes home. The child will need to take daily medicines and be closely followed by a pediatric cardiologist, who will determine when the second stage of surgery should be done.Stage II of the operation is called the Glenn shunt or hemi-Fontan procedure. This procedure connects the major vein carrying blue blood from the top half of the body (the superior vena cava) directly to blood vessels to the lungs (pulmonary arteries) to get oxygen. The surgery is usually done when the child is 4 to 6 months of age.During stages I and II, the child may still appear somewhat blue (cyanotic).Stage III, the final step, is called the Fontan procedure. The rest of the veins that carry blue blood from the body (the inferior vena cava) are connected directly to the blood vessels to the lungs. The right ventricle now serves only as the pumping chamber for the body (no longer the lungs and the body). This surgery is usually performed when the baby is 18 months\u00a0to\u00a04 years old. After this final step, the\u00a0child is no longer\u00a0cyanotic and has a normal oxygen level in the blood.Some patients may need more surgeries in their 20s or 30s if they develop hard to control arrhythmias or other complications of the Fontan procedure.Some doctors consider heart transplantation\u00a0an alternative to\u00a0the three-step surgery.\u00a0But there are few donated hearts available for small infants.", "Prevention": "There is no known prevention for hypoplastic left heart syndrome. As with many congenital diseases, the causes of hypoplastic left heart syndrome are uncertain and have not been linked to a mother's disease or behavior.", "Causes": "Hypoplastic left heart is a rare type of congenital heart disease. It is more common in males than in females.As with most congenital heart defects, there is no known cause.\u00a0About 10% of patients with hypoplastic left heart syndrome also have other birth defects.The problem develops before birth when the left ventricle and other structures do not grow properly, including the:Aorta -- the blood vessel that carries oxygen-rich blood from the left ventricle to the entire body, Entrance and exit of the ventricle, Mitral and aortic valves. This causes the left ventricle and aorta to be\u00a0poorly developed, or hypoplastic. In most cases, the left ventricle and aorta are much smaller than normal.In patients with this condition, the left side of the heart is unable to send enough blood to the body. As a result, the right side of the heart must maintain the circulation for both the lungs and the body. The right ventricle can support the circulation to both the lungs and the body for a while, but this extra workload eventually causes the right side of the heart to fail.The only possibility of survival is a connection between the right and the left side of the heart, or between the arteries and pulmonary arteries (the blood vessels that carry blood to the lungs). Babies are normally born with two of these connections:Foramen ovale (a hole between the right and left atrium), Ductus arteriosus (a small blood vessel that connects the aorta to the pulmonary artery). Both of these connections normally close on their own a few days after birth.In babies with hypoplastic left heart syndrome, blood\u00a0leaving the right side of the heart through the pulmonary artery travels through the ductus arteriosus to the aorta. This is the only way for blood to get to the body. If the ductus arteriosus is allowed to close in a baby with hypoplastic left heart syndrome, the\u00a0baby may quickly die because no blood will be pumped to the body. Babies with known hypoplastic left heart syndrome are usually started on a medicine to keep the ductus arteriosus open.Because there is little or no flow out of the left heart, blood returning to the heart from the lungs needs to pass through the foramen ovale or an atrial septal defect (a hole connecting the collecting chambers on the left and right sides of the heart) back to the right side of the heart. If there is no foramen ovale, or if it is too small, the baby could die. Patients with this problem have the hole between their atria opened, either with surgery or using a thin, flexible tube (heart catheterization)."}, "HIV/AIDS": {"description": "Human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) causes HIV infection and AIDS. The virus attacks the immune system. As the immune system weakens, the body is at risk of getting life-threatening infections and cancers. Once a person has the virus, it stays inside the body for life. ", "Symptoms": ["Diarrhea", "Fever", "Headache", "Mouth sores, including yeast infection (thrush)", "Muscle stiffness or aching", "Night sweats", "Rashes of different types", "Sore throat", "Swollen lymph glands ", "Chills", "Fever", "Rash", "Sweats (particularly at night)", "Swollen lymph glands", "Weakness", "Weight loss "], "Exams and Tests": "The HIV ELISA and HIV Western blot tests detect antibodies to the HIV virus in the blood. Antibodies are proteins the body's immune system makes when it detects harmful substances, such as the HIV virus., Both tests must be positive to confirm an HIV infection. . A complete blood count (CBC) and white blood cell differential may also show abnormalities.People with AIDS usually have regular blood tests to check their CD4 cell count: CD4 cells are a type of T cell. T cells are one kind of immune system cell. They are also called \"helper cells.\", A lower than normal CD4 cell count may be a sign that the virus is damaging the immune system. (A normal CD4 count is from 500 to 1,500 cells/mm3 of blood.), When the CD4 count gets too low, the risk of infections and some types of cancer increase. . Other tests that may be done include:HIV RNA level, or viral load, to check how much HIV is in the blood, Pap smear to check for cervical cancer, Anal pap smear to check for cancer of the anus . ", "Causes": "The virus is spread (transmitted) person-to-person in any of the following ways:Through sexual contact -- including oral, vaginal, and anal sex, Through blood -- by blood transfusions (now extremely rare in the U.S.) or more often by needle sharing, From mother to child -- a pregnant woman can spread the virus to her fetus through their shared blood circulation, or a nursing mother can pass it to her baby through her breast milk . The virus is NOT spread by: Casual contact such as hugging, Mosquitoes, Participating in sports, Touching items that were touched by a person infected with the virus . HIV and blood or organ donation:HIV is not spread to a person who donates blood or organs. People who donate organs are never in direct contact with people who receive them. Likewise, a person who donates blood is never in contact with the person receiving it. In all these procedures, sterile needles and instruments are used., But HIV can be spread to a person receiving blood or organs from an infected donor. To reduce this risk, blood banks and organ donor programs check (screen) donors, blood, and tissues thoroughly. . People at high risk of getting HIV include: Drug users who inject and then share needles, Infants born to mothers with HIV who did not receive HIV treatment during pregnancy, People who have unprotected sex, especially with people who have other high-risk behaviors, are HIV-positive, or have AIDS, People who received blood transfusions or clotting products between 1977 and 1985, before screening for the virus became standard practice, Sexual partners of those who engage in high-risk activities (such as injection drug use or anal sex) . After HIV infects the body, the virus has been found in many different fluids and tissues in the body.Only blood, semen, fluids from the vagina, and breast milk have been shown to transmit infection to others., The virus may also be found in saliva, tears, nervous system tissue, spinal fluid, and blood.. ", "Prevention": "Preventing HIV/AIDS:Do not use illegal drugs and do not share needles or syringes. Many communities now have needle exchange programs, where you can get rid of used syringes and get new, sterile ones. Staff at these programs can also refer you for addiction treatment., Avoid contact with another person's blood. If possible, wear protective clothing, masks, and goggles when caring for people who are injured., If you test positive for HIV, you can pass the virus to others. You should not donate blood, plasma, body organs, or sperm., HIV-positive women who plan to get pregnant should talk to their health care provider about the risk to their unborn child. They should also discuss methods to prevent their baby from becoming infected, such as taking medicines during pregnancy., Breastfeeding should be avoided to prevent passing HIV to infants through breast milk. . Safer sex practices, such as using latex condoms, are effective in preventing the spread of HIV. But there is a risk of getting the infection, even with the use of condoms. Abstinence is the only sure way to prevent sexual transmission of HIV.HIV-positive patients who are taking antiretroviral medicines are less likely to transmit the virus.The U.S. blood supply is among the safest in the world. Nearly all people infected with HIV through blood transfusions received those transfusions before 1985, the year HIV testing began for all donated blood.If you believe you have been exposed to HIV, seek medical attention right away. Do not delay. Starting antiviral medicines can reduce the chance that you will be infected. This is called post-exposure prophylaxis (PEP). It has been used to prevent transmission in health care workers injured by needle sticks.", "Treatment": "There is no cure for HIV infection at this time. But treatments are available to manage symptoms and reduce how much the virus copies itself (replicates). Treatment can also improve the quality and length of life for those who have already developed symptoms.Antiretroviral therapy suppresses the replication of the HIV virus in the body. A combination of antiretroviral drugs, called antiretroviral therapy (ART) or highly active antiretroviral therapy (HAART), is very effective in reducing the amount of HIV in the bloodstream. This effect is measured by the viral load (how much free virus is found in the blood). Preventing the virus from reproducing (replicating) can improve T-cell counts and help the immune system recover from HIV infection.People on ART with suppressed levels of HIV can still transmit the virus to others through sex or by sharing needles. ART can prolong and improve life if the level of HIV remains suppressed and the CD4 count remains high (above 200 cells/mm3).HIV can become resistant to one combination of ART. This is most true in patients who do not take their medications on schedule every day. Tests can check whether an HIV strain is resistant to a certain drug. This information can help the health care provider find the best drug combination and adjust the drug combination when it starts to fail. When HIV becomes resistant to ART, other drug combinations must be used to try to suppress the resistant strain of HIV. A variety of new drugs on the market treat drug-resistant HIV.ART treatment can have complications. Each drug has its own side effects. Common side effects are:Collection of fat on the back (buffalo hump) and abdomen, Diarrhea, General sick feeling (malaise), Headache, Nausea, Weakness . When used for a long time, these drugs increase the risk of heart attack, perhaps by increasing the levels of cholesterol and glucose (sugar) in the blood.People on ART are monitored by their health care provider for possible side effects. Blood tests measuring CD4 counts and HIV viral load will likely be done every 3 months. The goal is to get the CD4 count close to normal and to suppress the amount of HIV virus in the blood to a level where it cannot be detected.Medicines may be prescribed to treat problems related to AIDS, such as anemia and low white blood cell count, and to prevent opportunistic infections."}, "Healthy food trends -- quinoa": {"description": "Quinoa is gluten-free, and the flour is a good substitute for wheat flour. Mild and nutty flavored, quinoa can be enjoyed in many ways."}, "Hunter syndrome": {"description": "Hunter syndrome is an inherited disease in which long chains of sugar molecules (mucopolysaccharides) are not broken down correctly and build up in the body.", "Possible Complications": "Airway obstruction, Carpal tunnel syndrome, Hearing loss that gets worse over time, Loss of ability to complete daily living activities, Joint stiffness that leads to contractures, Mental function that gets worse over time. ", "Symptoms": ["Aggressive behavior", "Hyperactivity", "Mental function gets worse over time", "Severe intellectual disability", "Spasticity", "Mild to no mental deficiency", "Carpal tunnel syndrome", "Coarse features of the face", "Deafness (gets worse over time)", "Increased hair (hypertrichosis)", "Joint stiffness", "Large head (macrocephaly)"], "Exams and Tests": "Signs of the disorder include:Abnormal retina (back of the eye), Decreased iduronate sulfatase enzyme in blood serum or cells, Heart murmur and leaky heart valves, Enlarged liver (hepatomegaly), Enlarged spleen (splenomegaly), Inguinal hernia, Joint contractures, Spasticity. Tests may include:Enzyme study, Genetic testing for a change (mutation) in the iduronate sulfatase gene, Urine test for heparan sulfate and dermatan sulfate. ", "Treatment": "The U.S. Food and Drug Administration has approved the first treatment for Hunter syndrome. The medicine, called idursulfase (Elaprase), is given through a vein (intravenously). Talk to your doctor for more information.Bone marrow transplant has been tried for the early-onset form, but the results can vary.Each health problem should be treated separately.", "Prevention": "Genetic counseling is recommended for couples who want to have children and who have a family history of Hunter syndrome. Prenatal testing is available. Carrier testing for female relatives of affected males is available at a few centers.", "Causes": "Hunter syndrome is an inherited condition, where the affected gene is on the X chromosome. Therefore, boys are most often affected.The condition is caused by a lack of the enzyme iduronate sulfatase. Without this enzyme, mucopolysaccharides build up in various body tissues, causing damage.The early-onset, severe form of the disease begins shortly after age 2. A late-onset, mild form causes less severe symptoms to appear later in life. "}, "How to use a nebulizer": {"description": "The basic steps to set up and use your nebulizer are as follows:"}, "Health screening - women - over age 65": {"description": "You should visit\u00a0your health care provider from time to time, even if\u00a0you are healthy. The purpose of these visits is to:"}, "Healthy food trends -- microgreens": {"description": "Many people enjoy the tiny leaves of microgreens for their fresh taste, crisp crunch, and bright colors."}, "HCG blood test - qualitative": {"description": "Other HCG tests include:"}, "Headache": {"description": "A headache is pain or discomfort in the head, scalp, or neck. Serious causes of headaches are rare. Most people with headaches can feel much better by making lifestyle changes, learning ways to relax, and sometimes by taking medications. ", "Causes": "The most common type of headache is likely caused by tight muscles in your shoulders, neck, scalp, and jaw. This type of headache is called tension headache: It may be related to stress, depression, anxiety, a head injury, or holding your head and neck in an abnormal position., It tends to be on both sides of your head. It often starts at the back of the head and spreads forward. The pain may feel dull or squeezing, like a tight band or vice. Your shoulders, neck, or jaw may feel tight or sore. . A migraine headache involves severe pain. It usually occurs with other symptoms, such as vision changes, sensitivity to sound or light, or nausea. With a migraine: The pain may be throbbing, pounding, or pulsating. It tends to begin on one side of your head. It may spread to both sides., You may have an aura. This is a group of warning symptoms that start before your headache. The pain usually gets worse as you try to move around., Migraines may be triggered by foods such as chocolate, certain cheeses, or monosodium glutamate (MSG). Caffeine withdrawal, lack of sleep, and alcohol may also be triggers. . Rebound headaches are headaches that keep coming back. They often occur from overuse of pain medicines. For this reason, these headaches are also called medication overuse headaches. Persons who take pain medicine more than 3 days a week on a regular basis can develop this type of headache.Other types of headaches:Cluster headache is a sharp, very painful headache that occurs up to several times a day for months. It then goes away for a similar period of time. The headache usually lasts less than an hour. It tends to occur at the same times every day., Sinus headache causes pain in the front of the head and face. It is due to swelling in the sinus passages behind the cheeks, nose, and eyes. The pain is worse when you bend forward and when you first wake up in the morning., Headaches may occur if you have a cold, the flu, a fever, or premenstrual syndrome., Headache due to a disorder called temporal arteritis. This is a swollen, inflamed artery that supplies blood to part of the head, temple, and neck area. . In rare cases, a headache can be a sign of something more serious such as:Bleeding in the area between the brain and the thin tissue that covers the brain (subarachnoid hemorrhage), Blood pressure that is very high , Brain infection such as meningitis or encephalitis, or abscess, Brain tumor, Buildup of fluid inside the skull that leads to brain swelling (hydrocephalus), Buildup of pressure inside the skull that appears to be, but is not a tumor (pseudomotor cerebri), Carbon monoxide poisoning, Lack of oxygen during sleep (sleep apnea), Problems with the blood vessels and bleeding in the brain, such as arteriovenous malformation (AVM), brain aneurysm, or stroke. "}, "Hump behind the shoulders (Dorsocervical fat pad)": {"description": "Hump behind the shoulders is an area of fat accumulation on the back of the neck. The medical name of this condition is dorsocervical fat pad.", "Causes": "Cause of dorsocervical fat pad includes any of the following:Certain medicines used to treat HIV or AIDS, Long-term use of certain glucocorticoid medicines, including prednisone, cortisone, and hydrocortisone, Obesity, Hypercortisolism (caused by Cushing syndrome) , Certain genetic disorders that cause unusual fat accumulation. Osteoporosis may cause a curvature of the spine in the neck called kyphoscoliosis. This causes an abnormal shape but does not by itself cause excessive fat in the back of the neck."}, "Hospital-acquired pneumonia": {"description": "Hospital-acquired pneumonia is an infection of the lungs that occurs during a hospital stay. This type of pneumonia can be very severe. Sometimes it can be fatal.", "Symptoms": ["In an elderly person, the first sign of hospital-acquired pneumonia may be mental changes or confusion", "A cough\u00a0with greenish or pus-like phlegm (sputum)", "Fever and chills", "General discomfort, uneasiness, or ill feeling (malaise)", "Loss of appetite", "Nausea and vomiting", "Sharp chest pain that gets worse with deep breathing or coughing", "Shortness of breath", "Decreased blood pressure and high heart rate"], "Exams and Tests": "Tests to check for hospital-acquired pneumonia may include:Arterial blood gases, to measure oxygen levels in the blood, Blood cultures, to see if the infection has spread to the blood, Chest x-ray or CT scan, to check the lungs\u00a0, Complete blood count (CBC), Pulse oximetry, to measure oxygen levels in the blood, Sputum culture or sputum gram stain, to check for what germs are causing the pneumonia . ", "Causes": "Pneumonia is a common illness. It is caused by many different germs. Pneumonia that\u00a0starts in the hospital\u00a0tends to be more serious than other lung infections because:Patients in the hospital are often very sick and cannot fight off germs., The types of germs present in a hospital are often more dangerous than those outside in the community.. Pneumonia occurs more often in patients who are using a breathing machine (respirator). This\u00a0machine helps them breathe. Hospital-acquired pneumonia can also be spread by health care workers, who can pass germs from their hands or clothes from one patient to another. This is why hand-washing, wearing gowns, and using other safety measures is so important in the hospital.Patients who are more prone to getting pneumonia while in the hospital:Are alcoholic, Have had chest surgery or other major surgery, Have a weak immune system from cancer treatment, certain medicines, or severe wounds, Have long-term (chronic) lung disease, Breathe saliva or food into their lungs as a result of not being fully alert or having swallowing\u00a0problems, Are older . ", "Prevention": "Persons visiting loved ones in the hospital need to take steps to prevent spreading germs. The best way to stop the spread of germs is to wash your hands often. Stay home if you are sick. Keep your immunizations up to date.After any surgery, you will be asked to take deep breaths to help keep your lungs open. Follow the advice of your doctor and nurse to help prevent pneumonia.Most hospitals have programs to prevent hospital-acquired infections.", "Treatment": "You will receive antibiotics through your veins (IV) to treat your lung infection. The antibiotic you are given will fight the germs that are in your sputum culture., You may also receive oxygen to help you breathe better and lung treatments to loosen and remove thick mucus from your lungs., You may need a ventilator (breathing machine) to support your breathing.. "}, "Hemovac drain": {"description": "Your nurse will tell you how often you need to empty the drain. You will also be shown how to empty and take care of your drain. The following instructions will help you at home. If you have questions, ask your doctor or nurse."}, "Hysterectomy": {"description": "Hysterectomy is surgery to remove a woman's womb (uterus). The uterus is a hollow muscular organ that nourishes the developing baby during pregnancy."}, "Heart failure - what to ask your doctor ": {"description": "Below are some questions you may want to ask your doctor or nurse to help you take care of your heart failure."}, "Hospice care": {"description": "Palliative care; End-of-life care"}, "Herniated disk": {"description": "A herniated (slipped) disk occurs when all or part of a disk is forced through a weakened part of the disk. This may place pressure on nearby nerves or the spinal cord.\r\n", "Possible Complications": "In rare cases, the following problems can occur:Long-term back pain or leg pain, Loss of movement or feeling in the legs or feet, Loss of bowel and bladder function, Permanent spinal cord injury (very rare). ", "Symptoms": ["With a slipped disk in your lower back, you may have sharp pain in one part of the leg, hip, or buttocks and numbness in other parts. You may also feel pain or numbness on the back of the calf or sole of the foot. The same leg may also feel weak.", "With a slipped disk in your neck, you may have pain when moving your neck, deep pain near or over the shoulder blade, or pain that moves to the upper arm, forearm,\u00a0and fingers. You can also have numbness along your shoulder, elbow, forearm, and fingers.", "After standing or sitting", "At night", "When sneezing, coughing, or laughing", "When bending backward or walking more than a few yards"], "Exams and Tests": "A careful physical exam and history is almost always the first step. Depending on where you have symptoms, your doctor examines your neck, shoulder, arms, and hands, or your lower back, hips, legs, and feet.Your doctor will check:For numbness or loss of feeling, Your muscle reflexes, which may be slower or missing, Your muscle strength, which may be weaker, Your posture, or the way your spine curves. Your doctor may also ask you to:Sit, stand, and walk. While you walk, your doctor may ask you to try walking on your toes and then your heels., Bend forward, backward, and sideways, Move your neck forward, backward, and sideways, Raise your shoulders, elbow, wrist, and hand and check your strength during these tasks. Leg pain that occurs when you sit down on an exam table and lift your leg straight up usually suggests a slipped disk in your lower back.In another test, you will bend your head forward and to the sides while the health care provider puts slight downward pressure on the top of your head. Increased pain or numbness during this test is usually a sign of pressure on a nerve in your neck.DIAGNOSTIC TESTSElectromyography (EMG) may be done to determine the exact nerve root that is involved., Myelogram may be done to determine the size and location of disk herniation., Nerve conduction velocity test may also be done., Spine MRI or spine CT will show\u00a0where the herniated disk is pressing on the spinal canal. , Spine x-ray may be done to rule out other causes of back or neck pain. However, it is not possible to diagnose a herniated disk by a spine x-ray alone.. ", "Treatment": "The first treatment for a slipped disk is a short period of rest with medicines for the pain. This is\u00a0followed by physical therapy. Most people who follow these treatments recover and return to normal activities.\u00a0Some\u00a0people\u00a0will need to have more treatment. This may include steroid injections or surgery.MEDICINESMedicines can help with your pain. Your doctor may prescribe any of the following:Nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drugs\u00a0(NSAIDs) for long-term pain control, Narcotics if\u00a0the pain is severe and does not respond to NSAIDs, Medicines to calm the nerves, Muscle relaxants to relieve back spasms. LIFESTYLE CHANGESIf you are overweight, diet and exercise are\u00a0very important for improving back pain.Physical therapy is important for nearly everyone with disk disease. Therapists will teach you how to properly lift, dress, walk, and perform other activities. They teach you how to strengthen muscles that help support the spine. You will also learn how to increase flexibility in your spine and legs.Take care of your back at home: Reduce activity for the first few days. Slowly restart your usual activities., Avoid heavy lifting or twisting your back for the first 6 weeks after the pain starts., After 2 to 3 weeks, gradually start exercising again.. INJECTIONSSteroid medicine injections into the back in the area of the herniated disk may help control pain for several months. These injections reduce swelling around the disk and relieve many symptoms. Spinal injections are usually done in your doctor's office.SURGERYSurgery may be an option\u00a0if your\u00a0symptoms do not go away with other treatments and time.Diskectomy\u00a0is surgery to remove all or part of a disk.Discuss with your doctor which treatment options are best for you.", "Prevention": "Being safe at work and play, using proper lifting techniques, and controlling weight may help prevent back injury.Your health care provider may\u00a0recommend a\u00a0back brace to help support the spine.\u00a0A brace can help prevent injuries in people who lift heavy objects at work. But using these devices too much can weaken the muscles that support your spine and make the problem worse.", "Causes": "The bones (vertebrae) of the spinal column protect nerves that come out of the brain and travel down your back to form the spinal cord. Nerve roots are large nerves that branch out from the spinal cord and leave your spinal column between each vertebra.The spinal bones are separated by disks. These disks cushion the spinal column and put space between your vertebrae. The disks allow movement between the vertebrae, which lets you bend and reach.With herniated disk:The disk may move out of place (herniate) or break open (rupture) from injury or strain. When this happens, there may be pressure on the spinal nerves. This can lead to pain, numbness, or weakness., The lower back (lumbar area) of the spine is the most common area affected by\u00a0a slipped disk. The neck (cervical) disks are\u00a0the second most\u00a0commonly\u00a0affected area. The upper-to-mid-back (thoracic) disks are rarely involved.. A herniated disk is one cause of radiculopathy. This is any disease that affects the spinal nerve roots.Slipped disks occur more often in middle-aged and older men, usually after strenuous activity. Other risk factors include conditions present at birth (congenital) that affect the size of the lumbar spinal canal."}, "Hysteroscopy": {"description": "This procedure may\u00a0be done to diagnose or treat a health problem.\u00a0\u00a0\r\n "}, "Hirschsprung's disease": {"description": "Hirschsprung's disease is a blockage of the large intestine. It occurs due to poor muscle movement in the bowel. It is a congenital condition, which means it is present from birth.", "Possible Complications": "Inflammation and infection of the intestines (enterocolitis) may occur before surgery, and sometimes during the first 1\u00a0-\u00a02 years afterwards. Symptoms are severe, including swelling of the abdomen, foul-smelling watery diarrhea, lethargy, and poor feeding., Perforation or rupture of the intestine, Short bowel syndrome, a condition that can lead to malnourishment and dehydration. ", "Symptoms": ["Difficulty with bowel movements", "Failure to pass meconium shortly after birth", "Failure to pass a first stool within 24 - 48 hours after birth", "Infrequent but explosive stools", "Jaundice", "Poor feeding", "Poor weight gain", "Vomiting", "Watery diarrhea (in the newborn)", "Constipation that gradually gets worse", "Fecal impaction", "Malnutrition", "Slow growth", "Swollen belly"], "Exams and Tests": "Milder cases may not be diagnosed until the baby is older.During a physical exam, the doctor may be able to feel loops of bowel in the swollen belly. A rectal exam may reveal\u00a0tight muscle tone in the rectal muscles.Tests used to help diagnose Hirschsprung's disease may include:Abdominal x-ray, Anal manometry (a balloon is inflated in the rectum to measure pressure in the area), Barium enema, Rectal biopsy . ", "Treatment": "A procedure called serial rectal irrigation helps relieve pressure in (decompress) the bowel. The abnormal section of colon must be taken out with surgery. Most commonly, the rectum and abnormal part of the colon are removed. The healthy part of the colon is then pulled down and attached to the anus.Sometimes this can be done in one operation. However, it is often done in two parts. A colostomy is performed first. The other part of the procedure is done later in the child's first year of life.", "Causes": "Muscle contractions in the gut help digested foods and liquids move through the intestine. This is called peristalsis. Nerves between the muscle layers trigger the contractions.In Hirschsprung's disease, the nerves are missing from a part of the bowel. Areas without these nerves cannot push material through. This causes a blockage. Intestinal contents build up behind the blockage. The bowel and abdomen swell as a result.Hirschsprung's disease causes about 25% of all newborn intestinal blockages. It occurs five times more often in males than in females. Hirschsprung's disease is sometimes linked to other inherited or congenital conditions, such as Down syndrome."}, "Hand x-ray": {"description": "This test is an x-ray of one or both hands."}, "Hepatitis virus panel": {"description": "Note: Hepatitis D only causes disease in people who also have hepatitis B. It is not routinely checked on a hepatitis antibody panel."}, "Hypercalcemia - discharge": {"description": "When you were in the hospital, you were given fluids through an IV and drugs to help lower the calcium level in your blood. If you have cancer, you may have had treatment for that, as well. If your hypercalcemia is caused by a gland problem, you may have had surgery to remove that gland."}, "High blood pressure medications": {"description": "Always ask your health care provider whether you need to avoid any foods, drinks, vitamins or supplements, or any other medicines while you are taking blood pressure medicine."}, "Home vision tests": {"description": "Home vision tests measure the ability to see fine detail."}, "HPV (Human Papillomavirus) Gardasil-9 vaccine - what you need to know ": {"description": "Content source: National Center for Immunization and Respiratory Diseases"}, "Hazardous materials": {"description": "HazCom; Hazard communication; Material Safety Data Sheet; MSDS"}, "Hydrocele repair": {"description": "Baby boys sometimes have a hydrocele at birth. Hydroceles also occur in older boys and men. Sometimes they form when there is also a hernia (an abnormal bulging of tissue) present. Hydroceles are fairly common."}, "Hair spray poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Blurred vision", "Breathing difficulty", "Burning pain in the throat", "Burns to the eye", "Coma (decreased level of consciousness and lack of responsiveness, if extreme amounts are inhaled)", "Low blood pressure", "Rash", "Stupor"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Hallucinations": {"description": "Hallucinations involve sensing things while awake that appear to be real, but instead have been created by the mind.", "Causes": "There are many causes of hallucinations, including:\r\n  Being drunk or high, or coming down from such drugs as marijuana, LSD, cocaine (including crack), PCP, amphetamines, heroin, ketamine, and alcohol\r\n  , Delirium or dementia (visual hallucinations are most common)\r\n  , Epilepsy that involves a part of the brain called the temporal lobe (odor hallucinations are most common)\r\n  , Fever, especially in children and the elderly, Narcolepsy, Mental disorders, such as schizophrenia and psychotic depression, Sensory problem, such as blindness or deafness, Severe illness, including liver failure, kidney failure, HIV/AIDS, and brain cancer . "}, "Hepatocerebral degeneration": {"description": "Hepatocerebral degeneration is a brain disorder that occurs in people with liver damage.", "Possible Complications": "Complications include:Hepatic coma, Severe brain damage . ", "Symptoms": ["Difficulty walking", "Impaired intellectual function", "Jaundice", "Muscle spasm (myoclonus)", "Rigidity", "Shaking of arms, head (tremor)", "Twitching", "Uncontrolled body movements (chorea)", "Unsteady walking (ataxia) "], "Exams and Tests": "Signs include:Coma, Fluid in the abdomen that causes swelling (ascites), Gastrointestinal bleeding from enlarged veins in the food pipe (esophageal varices) . A nervous system (neurological) examination may show signs of:Dementia, Involuntary movements, Walking instability . Laboratory tests may show a high ammonia level in the bloodstream and abnormal liver function.Other tests may include:MRI of the head, EEG (may show general slowing of brain waves), CT scan of the head. ", "Treatment": "Treatment helps reduce the toxic chemicals that build up from liver failure. It may include antibiotics or medicines such as lactulose, which lowers the level of ammonia in the blood.A treatment called branched-chain amino acid therapy may also:Improve symptoms, Reverse brain damage . There is no specific treatment for the neurologic syndrome, because it is caused by irreversible liver damage. A liver transplant may cure the liver disease. However, this operation may not reverse the symptoms of brain damage.", "Prevention": "It is not possible to prevent all forms of liver disease. However, alcoholic and viral hepatitis may be prevented.To reduce your risk of getting alcoholic or viral hepatitis:Avoid risky behaviors, such as IV drug use or unprotected sex., Don't drink, or drink only in moderation. . ", "Causes": "This condition may occur in any case of acquired liver failure, including severe hepatitis.Liver damage can lead to the buildup of ammonia and other toxic materials in the body. This happens when the liver does not work properly to break down and eliminate these chemicals. The toxic materials can damage brain tissue.Specific areas of the brain, such as the basal ganglia, are more likely to be injured from liver failure. The basal ganglia help control movement. This condition is the \"Non-Wilsonian\" type. This means that the liver damage is not caused by copper deposits in the liver, which is a key feature of Wilson's disease."}, "Hemodialysis access - self care": {"description": "Taking good care of your access helps make it last longer."}, "Hepatic hemangioma": {"description": "A hepatic hemangioma is a liver tumor made of widened (dilated) blood vessels. It is not cancerous.", "Possible Complications": "Pregnancy and estrogen-based medications can cause\u00a0these tumors\u00a0to grow.", "Symptoms": [], "Exams and Tests": "Hepatic hemangioma is usually not\u00a0found until medical pictures are taken of the liver for some other reason. If the hemangioma ruptures, the only sign may be an enlarged liver.Babies with benign infantile hemangioendothelioma may have: A growth in the abdomen, Anemia, Signs of heart failure. The following tests may be performed:Blood tests, CT scan of the liver, Hepatic angiogram, MRI, Single-photon emission computed tomography (SPECT), Ultrasound of the abdomen. ", "Treatment": "Most\u00a0of these tumors\u00a0are treated only if there is\u00a0ongoing pain.Treatment for infantile hemangioendothelioma depends on the child's growth and development. The following treatments may be needed:Inserting a material in a blood vessel of the liver to block it (embolization), Tying off (ligation) a liver artery, Medications for heart failure, Surgery to remove the tumor . ", "Causes": "A hepatic hemangioma is the most common type of\u00a0liver tumor that is not caused by cancer. It may be a birth defect.Hepatic hemangiomas can occur at any time. They are most common in people in their 30s\u00a0to 50s. Women get these tumors more often than men and the tumors are often bigger.Babies may develop a type of hepatic hemangioma called benign infantile hemangioendothelioma. This is also called multinodular hepatic hemangiomatosis. This is a\u00a0rare, noncancerous tumor that has been linked to high rates of heart failure and death in infants. Infants are usually diagnosed by the time they are 6 months old."}, "Hair tonic poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Coma (decreased level of consciousness and lack of responsiveness)", "Diarrhea", "Inability to walk in a normal manner", "Increased urination", "Lack of alertness (stupor)", "Painful urination", "Slowed respirations", "Slurred speech", "Unsteady walk", "Vomiting"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Head injury - first aid": {"Symptoms": [], "Prevention": "Although no child is injury-proof, parents can take some simple steps to keep their children from getting head injuries.Not all head injuries can be prevented. But the following simple steps can help keep you and your child safe:Always use safety equipment during activities that could cause a head injury. These include seat belts, bicycle or motorcycle helmets, and hard hats., Learn and follow bicycle safety recommendations., Do not drink and drive, and do not allow yourself to be driven by someone who you know or suspect has been drinking alcohol or is impaired in another way. . ", "description": "Head injury is a common reason for an emergency room visit. A large number of people who suffer head injuries are children. TBI (traumatic brain injury) accounts for over 1 in 6 injury-related hospital admissions each year. ", "Causes": "Common causes of head injury include: Accidents at home, work, outdoors, or while playing sports, Falls, Physical assault, Traffic accidents. Most of these injuries are minor because the skull protects the brain. Some injuries are severe enough to require a stay in the hospital."}, "Hypospadias": {"Symptoms": ["Abnormal spraying of urine", "Having to sit down to urinate", "Foreskin that makes the penis looks like it has a \"hood\""], "Exams and Tests": "This problem is almost always diagnosed soon after birth during\u00a0a physical exam.\u00a0Imaging tests may be done to look for other congenital defects.", "description": "Hypospadias is a birth (congenital) defect in which the opening of the urethra is on the underside of the penis.\u00a0The urethra is the tube that drains urine from the bladder. In males, the opening of the urethra is normally at the end of the penis.", "Causes": "Hypospadias occurs in up to 4 in 1,000 newborn boys. The cause is often unknown. Sometimes, the condition is\u00a0passed down through families. ", "Treatment": "Infants with hypospadias should not be circumcised. The foreskin should be kept for use in later surgical repair.Surgery is usually done before the child starts school. Today, most urologists recommend repair before the child is 18 months old. Surgery can be done as young as 4 months old. During the surgery, the penis is straightened and the opening is corrected using tissue grafts from the foreskin. The repair may require multiple surgeries."}, "Healthy food trends -- Brussels sprouts": {"description": "Brussels sprouts need to be cooked so they are tender for eating. They are full of nutrients and can be included in many meals."}, "HCG blood test - quantitative": {"description": "Other HCG tests include:"}, "Hyperimmunoglobulin E syndrome": {"description": "Hyperimmunoglobulin E syndrome is a rare, inherited disease that causes problems with the skin, sinuses, lungs, bones, and teeth.", "Possible Complications": "Repeated infections, Sepsis. ", "Symptoms": ["Bone and tooth defects, including fractures and losing the baby teeth late", "Eczema", "Skin abscesses and infection", "Repeated sinus infections", "Repeated lung infections\r\n "], "Exams and Tests": "An eye exam may reveal signs of dry eye syndrome. A physical exam may also show:Curving of the spine (kyphoscoliosis), Osteomyelitis, Repeat sinus infections. A chest x-ray may reveal lung abscesses.Tests used to confirm the diagnosis include:Absolute eosinophil count, CBC with blood differential, Serum globulin electrophoresis to look for high blood IgE levels. Other tests that may be done:CT scan of the chest, Cultures of the infected site, Special blood tests to check parts of the immune system, X-ray of the bones,  \r\nCT scan\u00a0of the sinuses \r\n . A scoring system that combines the different problems of Job syndrome is used to help make the diagnosis.", "Treatment": "There is no known cure for this condition. The goal of treatment is to control the infections. Medications include:Antibiotics, Antifungal and antiviral medications (when appropriate). Sometimes, surgery is needed to drain abscesses.Gamma globulin given through a vein (IV) may help build up the immune system if you have severe infections.", "Prevention": "There is no proven way to prevent Job syndrome. Good general hygiene is helpful.Some doctors may recommend preventive antibiotics for people who many infections, especially with Staphylococcus aureus. This treatment does not change the condition, but it can lessen its complications.", "Causes": "Hyperimmunoglobulin E syndrome is also called Job syndrome, after the biblical character Job whose faithfulness was tested by an affliction with draining skin sores and pustules. People with this condition have long-term, severe skin infections.The symptoms are usually present in childhood, but because the disease is so rare, it often takes years before a correct diagnosis is made.Recent research suggests that the disease is often caused by a genetic change (mutation) -- a change in the STAT3 gene on chromosome 4. How this gene abnormality causes the symptoms of the disease is not well understood. However, people with the disease have higher-than-normal levels of an antibody called IgE."}, "Hypopituitarism": {"description": "Hypopituitarism is a condition in which the pituitary gland does not produce normal amounts of some or all of its hormones.", "Possible Complications": "Side effects of medicines can develop.\u00a0Stopping corticosteroid and thyroid supplementation\u00a0can be life-threatening.", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain", "Decreased appetite", "Decreased sexual interest (in men)", "Dizziness or fainting", "Excessive urination\u00a0and thirst", "Failure to release milk (in women)", "Fatigue", "Headache", "Infertility (in women)", "Lack of sex drive (in women)", "Loss of armpit or pubic hair", "Loss of body or facial hair (in men)", "Low blood pressure", "Low blood sugar", "Sensitivity to cold", "Short\u00a0height (less than 5 feet) if onset is during a growth period", "Slowed growth and sexual development (in children)", "Stopping\u00a0of menstrual periods (in women)", "Vision\u00a0problems", "Weakness", "Weight loss", "The number of hormones that are missing and the organs they affect", "The severity of the disorder ", "Face swelling", "Hair loss", "Hoarseness or changing voice", "Joint stiffness", "Weight gain (unintentional)"], "Exams and Tests": "To diagnose hypopituitarism, there must be low hormone levels due to a problem with the pituitary gland. The diagnosis must also rule out diseases of the organ that is affected by this hormone.Tests may\u00a0include:Brain CT scan, Pituitary MRI, Serum ACTH, Serum cortisol, Serum estradiol (estrogen), Serum follicle stimulating hormone (FSH), Serum insulin-like growth factor 1 (IGF-1), Serum luteinizing hormone (LH), Serum testosterone level, Serum thyroid stimulating hormone (TSH), Thyroid hormone (T4) . Levels of a pituitary hormone may be high in the bloodstream if you have a pituitary tumor that is producing too much of that hormone. The tumor may crush other cells of the pituitary, leading to low levels of other hormones.", "Treatment": "If hypopituitarism is caused by a tumor, you may need surgery to remove the tumor. Radiation therapy may also be needed.\u00a0You will need lifelong hormone\u00a0medicines to replace hormones that are no longer made by organs under the control of the pituitary gland. These may include:Corticosteroids (cortisol), Growth hormone, Sex hormones (testosterone for men and estrogen for women), Thyroid hormone. Drugs are also available to treat related infertility in men and women.", "Prevention": "In most cases, the disorder is not preventable. Awareness of risk may allow early diagnosis and treatment.", "Causes": "The pituitary gland is a small structure that is located just below the brain. It is attached by a stalk to the hypothalamus. This is\u00a0the area of the brain that controls\u00a0the pituitary gland's\u00a0function.The hormones released by the pituitary gland (and their functions) are:Adrenocorticotropic hormone (ACTH) -- stimulates the adrenal gland to release cortisol; cortisol helps to maintain blood pressure and blood sugar, Antidiuretic hormone (ADH) -- controls water loss by the kidneys, Follicle stimulating hormone (FSH) -- controls sexual function and fertility in males and females, Growth hormone (GH) -- stimulates growth of tissues and bone, Luteinizing hormone (LH) -- controls sexual function and fertility in males and females, Oxytocin -- stimulates the uterus to contract during labor and the breasts to release milk, Prolactin -- stimulates female breast development and milk production, Thyroid stimulating hormone (TSH) -- stimulates the thyroid gland to release hormones that affect the body's metabolism. Watch this video about:Pituitary glandIn hypopituitarism, there is a lack of one or more pituitary hormones. Lack of a hormone leads to loss of function in the gland or organ the hormone controls. For example, lack of TSH leads to loss of normal function of the thyroid gland.Hypopituitarism may be caused by:Brain surgery, Brain tumor, Head trauma, Infections or inflammation of the brain and the tissues that support the brain, Radiation therapy, Stroke, Subarachnoid hemorrhage (from a burst aneurysm), Tumors of the pituitary gland or hypothalamus . Occasionally, hypopituitarism is due to uncommon immune system or metabolic diseases, such as:Hemochromatosis, Histiocytosis X, Lymphocytic hypophysitis, Sarcoidosis. Hypopituitarism is also a rare complication after pregnancy, a condition called Sheehan's syndrome."}, "Hereditary ovalocytosis": {"description": "Hereditary ovalocytosis is a rare condition passed down through families (inherited). The blood cells are oval-shaped instead of round. It is a form of hereditary elliptocytosis.", "Possible Complications": "The condition may be associated with gallstones or kidney problems.", "Symptoms": [], "Exams and Tests": "An examination by your health care provider may show an enlarged spleen.This condition is diagnosed by looking at the shape of blood cells under a microscope. The following tests may also be done:Complete blood count (CBC) to check for anemia or red blood cell destruction, Blood smear to determine cell shape, Bilirubin level (may be high), Lactate dehydrogenase level (may be high), Ultrasound of the abdomen (may show gallstones) . ", "Treatment": "In severe cases, the disease may be treated by removal of the spleen (splenectomy).", "Causes": "Ovalocytosis is mainly found in Southeast Asian populations."}, "Hydrocephalus": {"description": "Hydrocephalus means \"water on the brain.\"", "Possible Complications": "The shunt may become blocked. Symptoms of such a blockage include headache and vomiting. Surgeons may be able to help the shunt open without having to replace it.There may be other problems with the shunt, such as kinking, tube separation, or infection in the area of the shunt.Other complications may include:Complications of surgery, Infections such as meningitis or encephalitis, Intellectual impairment, Nerve damage (decrease in movement, sensation, function), Physical disabilities. ", "Symptoms": ["Age", "Amount of brain damage", "What is causing the buildup of CSF fluid ", "Eyes that appear to gaze downward", "Irritability", "Seizures", "Separated sutures", "Sleepiness", "Vomiting ", "Brief, shrill, high-pitched cry", "Changes in personality, memory, or the ability to reason or think", "Changes in facial appearance and eye spacing", "Crossed eyes or uncontrolled eye movements", "Difficulty feeding", "Excessive sleepiness", "Headache", "Irritability, poor temper control", "Loss of bladder control (urinary incontinence)", "Loss of coordination and trouble walking", "Muscle spasticity (spasm)", "Slow growth (child 0 - 5 years)", "Slow or restricted movement", "Vomiting "], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor or nurse will examine the baby. This may show:Stretched or swollen veins on the baby's scalp, Abnormal sounds when the health care provider taps lightly on the skull, suggesting a problem with the skull bones, All or part of the head may be larger than normal, usually the front part, Eyes that look \"sunken in\", White part of the eye appears over the colored area, making it look like a \"setting sun\", Reflexes may be normal . Repeated head circumference measurements over time may show that the head is getting bigger.A head CT scan is one of the best tests for identifying hydrocephalus. Other tests that may be done include:Arteriography, Brain scan using radioisotopes, Cranial ultrasound (an ultrasound of the brain), Lumbar puncture and examination of the cerebrospinal fluid (rarely done), Skull x-rays . ", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to reduce or prevent brain damage by improving the flow of CSF.Surgery may be done to remove a blockage, if possible.If not, a flexible tube called a shunt may be placed in the brain to reroute the flow of CSF. The shunt sends CSF to another part of the body, such as the belly area, where it can be absorbed.Other treatments may include:Antibiotics if there are signs of infection. Severe infections may require the shunt to be removed., A procedure called endoscopic third ventriculostomy (ETV), which relieves pressure without replacing the shunt., Removing or burning away (cauterizing) the parts of the brain that produce CSF. . The child will need regular check-ups to make sure there are no further problems. Tests will be done regularly\u00a0to check the child's development, and to look\u00a0for intellectual, neurological, or physical problems.Visiting nurses, social services, support groups, and local agencies can provide emotional support and help with the care of a child with hydrocephalus who has serious brain damage.", "Prevention": "Protect the head of an infant or child from injury. Prompt treatment of infections and other disorders associated with hydrocephalus may reduce the risk of developing the disorder.", "Causes": "Hydrocephalus is due to a problem with the flow of the fluid that surrounds the brain. This fluid is called the cerebrospinal fluid, or CSF. The fluid surrounds the brain and spinal cord, and helps cushion the brain. CSF normally moves through the brain and the spinal cord, and is soaked into the bloodstream. CSF levels in the brain can rise if: The flow of CSF is blocked., The fluid does not get absorbed into the blood properly., The brain makes too much of the fluid. . Too much CSF puts pressure on the brain. This pushes the brain up against the skull and damages brain tissue.Hydrocephalus may begin while the baby is growing in the womb. It is common in babies who have a myelomeningocele, a birth defect in which the spinal column does not close properly. Hydrocephalus may also be due to:Genetic defects, Certain infections during pregnancy . In young children, hydrocephalus may be due to:Infections that affect the central nervous system (such as meningitis or encephalitis), especially in infants, Bleeding in the brain during or soon after delivery (especially in premature babies), Injury before, during, or after childbirth, including subarachnoid hemorrhage, Tumors of the central nervous system, including the brain or spinal cord, Injury or trauma. Hydrocephalus most often occurs in children. Another type, called normal pressure hydrocephalus, may occur in adults and the elderly. "}, "Hodgkin lymphoma": {"description": "Hodgkin lymphoma is a cancer of lymph tissue. Lymph tissue is found in the lymph nodes, spleen, liver, bone marrow, and other sites.", "Possible Complications": "Treatments for Hodgkin lymphoma can have complications. Long-term complications of chemotherapy or radiation therapy include:Bone marrow diseases (such as leukemia), Heart disease, Inability to have children (infertility), Lung problems, Other cancers, Thyroid problems . Keep following up with a doctor who knows about monitoring and preventing these complications. ", "Symptoms": ["Fatigue", "Fever and chills that come and go", "Itching all over the body that cannot be explained", "Loss of appetite", "Soaking night sweats", "Painless swelling of the lymph nodes in the neck, armpits, or groin (swollen glands)", "Weight loss that cannot be explained ", "Coughing, chest pains, or breathing problems if there are swollen lymph nodes in the chest", "Excessive sweating", "Pain or feeling of fullness below the ribs due to swollen spleen or liver", "Pain in lymph nodes after drinking alcohol", "Skin blushing or flushing "], "Exams and Tests": "The first sign of Hodgkin lymphoma is often a swollen lymph node that appears without a known cause. The disease can spread to nearby lymph nodes. Later it may spread to the spleen, liver, bone marrow, or other organs.The disease is usually diagnosed after a biopsy of suspected tissue, usually a lymph node.If the biopsy and other tests show that you have Hodgkin lymphoma, more tests will be done to see how far the cancer has spread. This is called staging. Staging helps guide treatment and follow-up.The following procedures will usually be done:Blood chemistry tests including protein levels, liver function tests, kidney function tests, and uric acid level, Bone marrow biopsy (in certain cases), CT scans of the chest, abdomen, and pelvis, Complete blood count (CBC) to check for anemia and white blood count, PET scan. In rare cases, abdominal surgery is needed to take out a piece of the liver and remove the spleen.", "Treatment": "Treatment depends on the following:\r\n  The type of Hodgkin lymphoma (most people have classic Hodgkin lymphoma)\r\n  , \r\n  The stage (where the disease has spread)\r\n  , \r\n  Whether the tumor is more than 4 inches (10 cm) wide\r\n  , \r\n  Your age and other medical issues\r\n  , \r\n  Other factors, including weight loss, night sweats, and fever\r\n  . You may receive chemotherapy or radiation therapy, or both. Your doctor can tell you more about your specific treatment.High-dose chemotherapy may be given when Hodgkin lymphoma returns after treatment or does not respond to the first treatment. This is followed by an autologous stem cell transplant (using your own stem cells).", "Causes": "The cause of Hodgkin lymphoma is not known. Hodgkin lymphoma is most common among people ages 15 to 35 and 50 to 70. Past infection with the Epstein-Barr virus (EBV) is thought to contribute to some cases. Persons with HIV infection are at increased risk compared to the general population."}, "Hemothorax": {"description": "Hemothorax is a collection of blood in the space between the chest wall and the lung (the pleural cavity).", "Possible Complications": "Collapsed lung, leading to respiratory failure, Death, Fibrosis or scarring of the pleural membranes, Infection of the pleural fluid (empyema), Pneumothorax, Shock. ", "Symptoms": ["Anxiety", "Chest pain", "Low blood pressure", "Pale, cool and clammy skin", "Rapid heart rate", "Rapid, shallow breathing", "Restlessness", "Shortness of breath"], "Exams and Tests": "Your doctor may note decreased or absent breath sounds on the affected side. Signs of hemothorax may be seen on the following tests:Chest x-ray, CT scan, Pleural fluid analysis, Thoracentesis. ", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to get the patient stable, stop the bleeding, and remove the blood and air in the pleural space. A chest tube is inserted through the chest wall to drain the blood and air. It is left in place for several days to re-expand the lung.When a hemothorax is severe and a chest tube alone does not control the bleeding, surgery (thoracotomy) may be needed to stop the bleeding.The cause of the hemothorax should be also treated. In people who have had an injury, chest tube drainage is often all that is needed. Surgery is often not needed.", "Prevention": "Use safety measures (such as seat belts) to avoid injury. Depending on the cause, a hemothorax may not be preventable.", "Causes": "The most common cause of hemothorax is chest trauma. It can also occur in patients who have:Blood clotting defect, Chest (thoracic) or heart surgery, Death of lung tissue (pulmonary infarction), Lung or pleural cancer, Tear\u00a0in a blood vessel when placing a central venous catheter, Tuberculosis. "}, "Hip arthroscopy": {"description": "Hip arthroscopy is surgery that is done by making small cuts around your hip and looking inside using a tiny camera. Other medical instruments may also be inserted to examine or treat your hip joint. "}, "High blood cholesterol levels": {"Exams and Tests": "\r\n\r\nA cholesterol test is done to diagnose a lipid disorder. Some guidelines recommend having your first screening cholesterol test at age 20. Everyone should have their first screening test by age 35 in men, and age 45 in women. (Note: Different experts recommend different starting ages.)It is important to work with your health care provider to set your cholesterol goals. General targets are:LDL: 70-130 mg/dL (lower numbers are better), HDL: more than 50 mg/dL (high numbers are better), Total cholesterol: less than 200 mg/dL (lower numbers are better), Triglycerides: 10-150 mg/dL (lower numbers are better). If your cholesterol results are abnormal, your doctor may also do:Blood sugar (glucose) test to look for diabetes, Kidney function tests, Thyroid function tests to look for an underactive thyroid gland . ", "description": "The medical term for high blood cholesterol is lipid disorder, hyperlipidemia, or hypercholesterolemia.", "Causes": "There are many types of cholesterol. The ones talked about most are:Total cholesterol - all the cholesterols combined, High density lipoprotein (HDL) cholesterol - often called \"good\" cholesterol, Low density lipoprotein (LDL) cholesterol - often called \"bad\" cholesterol. For many people, abnormal cholesterol levels are partly due to an unhealthy lifestyle. This often includes eating a diet that is high in fat. Other lifestyle factors are:Being overweight, Lack of exercise. Some health conditions can also lead to abnormal cholesterol, including: Diabetes, Kidney disease, Polycystic ovary syndrome, Pregnancy and other conditions that increase levels of female hormones, Underactive thyroid gland. Medicines such as certain birth control pills, diuretics (water pills), beta-blockers, and some medicines used to treat depression may also raise cholesterol levels. Several disorders that are passed down through families lead to abnormal cholesterol and triglyceride levels. They include: Familial combined hyperlipidemia, Familial dysbetalipoproteinemia, Familial hypercholesterolemia, Familial hypertriglyceridemia. Smoking does not cause higher cholesterol levels, but it can reduce your HDL (\"good\") cholesterol.", "Treatment": "Steps you can take to improve their cholesterol levels, and help prevent heart disease and a heart attack include:Quit smoking. This is the single biggest change you can make to reduce your risk of heart attack and stroke.Eat foods that are naturally low in fat. These include whole grains, fruits, and vegetables., Use low-fat toppings, sauces, and dressings., Avoid foods that are high in saturated fat., Exercise regularly, Lose weight if you are overweight. Your doctor may want you to take medicine for your cholesterol if lifestyle changes do not work. This will depend on:Your age, Whether or not you have heart disease, diabetes, or other blood flow problems, Whether you smoke or are overweight, Whether you have high blood pressure or diabetes. You are more likely to need medicine to lower your cholesterol: If you have heart disease or diabetes, your LDL cholesterol should stay below 100 mg/dL, If you are at risk for heart disease (even if you do not yet have any heart problems), your LDL cholesterol should be below 130 mg/dL, Almost everyone else may get health benefits from LDL cholesterol that is lower than 160 mg/dL to 190 mg/dL. There are several types of drugs to help lower blood cholesterol levels. The drugs work in different ways. Statins are one kind of drug that lower cholesterol and are the most effective at reducing the chance of heart disease.\r\n"}, "Hypomagnesemia": {"description": "Hypomagnesemia\u00a0is a condition in which\u00a0the amount of magnesium in the blood is lower than normal.", "Possible Complications": "Cardiac arrest, Respiratory arrest, Death\r\n . ", "Symptoms": ["Abnormal eye movements (nystagmus)", "Convulsions", "Fatigue", "Muscle spasms or cramps", "Muscle weakness", "Numbness"], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will do a physical exam to help determine the cause of your symptoms.Tests that may be ordered include anElectrocardiogram (ECG) . Blood and urine tests\u00a0that may be done include: Calcium blood test\u00a0 , Comprehensive metabolic panel, Magnesium blood test, Potassium blood test, Urine magnesium test. ", "Treatment": "Treatment depends on the type of hypomagnesemia and may include:Fluids given through a vein (IV), Magnesium by mouth or through a vein, Medication to relieve symptoms. ", "Prevention": "Treating the condition that is causing hypomagnesemia can help. If you play sports, drink fluids such as sports drinks,\u00a0which contain electrolytes. Drinking only water while you\u00a0are active\u00a0can lead to hypomagnesemia.", "Causes": "Hypomagnesemia can be caused by:Alcoholism, Burns that affect a large area of\u00a0the body\u00a0\r\n , Chronic diarrhea, Excessive urination (polyuria), such as in uncontrolled diabetes and during recovery from acute kidney failure\u00a0\r\n , High blood calcium levels (hypercalcemia), Hyperaldosteronism, Malabsorption syndromes, such as celiac disease and inflammatory bowel disease, Malnutrition, Medications including amphotericin, cisplatin, cyclosporine, diuretics, proton pump inhibitors, and aminoglycoside antibiotics, Sweating. "}, "HLA-B27 antigen": {"description": "Human leukocyte antigens (HLAs) are proteins that help the body's immune system tell the difference between its own cells and foreign, harmful substances."}, "Heart attack first aid": {"Symptoms": ["Changes in mental status, especially in older adults", "Chest pain that feels like pressure, squeezing, or fullness. The pain is usually in the center of the chest. It may also be felt in the jaw, shoulder, arms, back, and stomach. It can last for more than a few minutes, or come and go.", "Cold sweat", "Light-headedness", "Nausea (more common in women)", "Numbness, aching, or tingling in the arm (usually the left arm, but the right arm may be affected alone, or along with the left)", "Shortness of breath", "Weakness or fatigue, especially in older adults and in women"], "Prevention": "Adults should take steps to control heart disease risk factors whenever possible.If you smoke, quit. Smoking more than doubles the chance of developing heart disease., Keep blood pressure, cholesterol, and diabetes in good control and follow your doctor's orders., Lose weight if obese or overweight., Get regular exercise to improve heart health. (Talk to your doctor before starting any new fitness program.), Eat a heart-healthy diet. Limit saturated fats, red meat, and sugars. Increase your intake of chicken, fish, fresh fruits and vegetables, and whole grains. Your health care provider can help you tailor a diet specific to your needs., Limit the amount of alcohol you drink. One drink a day is associated with reducing the rate of heart attacks, but two or more drinks a day can damage the heart and cause other medical problems.. ", "description": "This article discusses what to do if you think someone may be having a heart attack.", "Causes": "A heart attack occurs when the blood flow that carries oxygen to the heart is blocked. The heart muscle becomes starved for oxygen and begins to die. "}, "Heat intolerance": {"description": "Heat intolerance usually comes on slowly and lasts for a long time, but it may also occur quickly and be a serious illness.", "Causes": "Heat intolerance may be caused by:Amphetamines or other stimulants, such as those found in drugs that suppress your appetite, Anxiety, Caffeine, Menopause, Too much\u00a0thyroid hormone (thyrotoxicosis). "}, "High-fiber foods": {"description": "Fiber is a substance found in plants. Dietary fiber -- the kind you eat -- is found in fruits, vegetables, and grains. Your body cannot digest fiber, so it passes through your intestines quickly."}, "Herpetic stomatitis": {"description": "Herpetic stomatitis is a viral infection of the mouth that causes sores and ulcers. These mouth ulcers are not the same as canker sores, which are not caused by a virus.", "Symptoms": ["Blisters in the mouth, often on the tongue, cheeks, roof of the mouth, gums, and on the border between the inside of the lip and the skin next to it", "After blisters pop, they form ulcers in the mouth, often on the tongue or cheeks", "Difficulty swallowing", "Drooling", "Fever (often as high as 104 \u00b0Fahrenheit), which may occur 1 - 2 days before blisters and ulcers appear", "Irritability", "Mouth pain", "Swollen gums "], "Exams and Tests": "Your child's doctor can usually diagnose this condition by looking at your child's mouth sores. Sometimes, special laboratory tests can help confirm the diagnosis.", "Causes": "Herpetic stomatitis is an infection caused by the herpes simplex virus (HSV), or oral herpes. Young children commonly get it when they are first exposed to HSV. The first outbreak is usually the most severe. HSV can easily be spread from one child to another.If you or another adult in the family has a cold sore, it could have spread to your child and caused herpetic stomatitis. More likely, you won't know how your child became infected. ", "Prevention": "About 90% of the population carries HSV. There's little you can do to prevent your child from picking up the virus sometime during childhood.Your child should avoid all close contact with people who have cold sores. So if you get a cold sore, explain why you can't kiss your child until the sore is gone. Your child should also avoid other children with herpetic stomatitis. If your child has herpetic stomatitis, avoid spreading the virus to other children. While your child has symptoms:Have your child wash her hands often, Keep toys clean and don't share them with other children, Don't allow children to share dishes, cups, or eating utensils, Don't let your child kiss other children . ", "Treatment": "Your child's doctor may prescribe:Acyclovir, a medicine your child takes that fights the virus causing the infection, Numbing medicine (viscous lidocaine) which you can apply to your child's mouth to ease severe pain . Use lidocaine with care, because it can kill all feeling in your child's mouth. This can make it hard for your child to swallow, and may lead to burns in the mouth or throat from eating hot foods, or cause choking. There are several things you can do at home to help your child feel better:Give your child cool, noncarbonated, nonacidic drinks, such as water, milk shakes, or diluted apple juice. Dehydration can occur quickly in children, so make sure your child is getting enough fluids., Offer cool, bland, easy-to-swallow foods such as frozen pops, ice cream, mashed potatoes, gelatin, or applesauce., Give your child acetaminophen or ibuprofen for pain. (Never give a child under age 20 aspirin. It can cause Reye's syndrome, a rare but serious illness.), Bad breath and a coated tongue are common side effects. Gently brush your child's teeth every day., Make sure your child gets plenty of sleep and rests as much as possible. . "}, "Hemorrhoids": {"description": "Hemorrhoids are swollen cushions of tissue in the anus or lower part of the rectum. They contain many arteries and veins. ", "Possible Complications": "The blood in the hemorrhoid may form clots. This can cause tissue around it to die. Surgery is often needed to remove hemorrhoids with clots.Rarely, severe bleeding may also occur. Iron deficiency anemia can result from long-term blood loss.", "Symptoms": ["Painless bright red blood from the rectum", "Anal itching ", "Anal ache or pain, especially while sitting ", "Pain during bowel movements ", "One or more hard tender lumps near the anus"], "Exams and Tests": "Most of the time, a doctor can often diagnose hemorrhoids simply looking at the rectal area. External hemorrhoids can often be detected this way. Tests that may help diagnose the problem include:Stool guaiac (shows the presence of blood), Sigmoidoscopy, Anoscopy. ", "Treatment": "Treatments for hemorrhoids include:Over-the-counter corticosteroid (for example, cortisone) creams to help reduce pain and swelling, Hemorrhoid creams with lidocaine to help reduce pain, Stool softeners help reduce straining and constipation . Things you can do to reduce itching include:Apply witch hazel to the area with a cotton swab., Wear cotton underwear., Avoid toilet tissue with perfumes or colors. Use baby wipes instead., Try not to scratch the area. . Sitz baths can help you to feel better. Sit in warm water for 10 to 15 minutes.If your hemorrhoids do not get better with home treatments, you may need some type of office treatment, such as heat treatment, to shrink the hemorrhoids. This is called infrared coagulation. This may help avoid surgery. Another type of office treatment that may help is rubber band ligation. If these treatments are not enough, some type of surgery may be necessary, such as removal of the hemorrhoids (hemorrhoidectomy). These procedures are generally used for patients with severe bleeding or prolapse who have not responded to other therapy.", "Prevention": "Constipation, straining during bowel movements, and sitting on the toilet too long raise your risk for hemorrhoids. To prevent constipation and hemorrhoids, you should:Drink at least eight glasses of water a day. , Eat a high-fiber diet of fruits, vegetables, and whole grains., Consider using fiber supplements., Use stool softeners to prevent straining.. ", "Causes": "Hemorrhoids are very common. They result from increased pressure on the anus. This can occur during pregnancy, childbirth, and due to constipation. The pressure causes the normal anal cushions to swell. This tissue can bleed, often during bowel movements.Hemorrhoids may be caused by:Straining during bowel movements, Constipation, Sitting for long periods of time, especially on the toilet, Certain diseases, such as liver cirrhosis. Hemorrhoids may be inside or outside the body.Internal hemorrhoids occur just inside the anus, at the beginning of the rectum. When they are large they may fall outside (prolapse). The most common problem with internal hemorrhoids is bleeding during bowel movements., External hemorrhoids occur outside the anus. They can result in difficulty cleaning the area after a bowel movement. If a blood clot forms in an external hemorrhoid, it can be very painful (thrombosed external hemorrhoid).. "}, "Heart bypass surgery - minimally invasive - discharge": {"description": "You had minimally invasive coronary artery bypass surgery on one or more of your coronary arteries. Your surgeon used an artery from your chest to create a detour, or bypass, around arteries that were blocked and could not bring blood to your heart. A 3- to 5-inch-long incision (cut) was made in the left part of your chest between your ribs. This allowed your doctor to reach your heart."}, "Hypospadias repair": {"description": "Hypospadias repair is surgery to correct a defect in the opening of the penis that is present at birth. The urethra (the tube that carries urine from the bladder to outside the body) does not end at the tip of the penis. Instead, it ends on the underside of the penis. In more severe cases, the urethra opens at the middle or bottom of the penis, or in or behind the scrotum."}, "Hair dye poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain", "Blurred vision", "Breathing difficulty", "Burning pain in the throat", "Burns to the eye", "Collapse", "Coma (decreased level of consciousness and lack of responsiveness)", "Diarrhea (watery, bloody)", "Low blood pressure", "Inability to walk in a normal manner", "No urine output", "Rash", "Slurred speech", "Stupor", "Vomiting"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Hypothermia": {"Symptoms": ["Drowsiness", "Weakness and loss of coordination", "Pale and cold skin", "Confusion", "Uncontrollable shivering (although at extremely low body temperatures, shivering may stop)", "Slowed breathing or heart rate"], "Prevention": "Before you spend time outside in the cold, do NOT drink alcohol or smoke. Drink plenty of fluids and get enough food and rest.Wear proper clothing in cold temperatures to protect your body. These include:Mittens (not gloves), Wind-proof, water-resistant, many-layered clothing, Two pairs of socks (avoid cotton), Scarf and hat that cover the ears (to avoid major heat loss through the top of your head) . Avoid:Extremely cold temperature, especially with high winds, Wet clothes, Poor circulation, which is more likely from age, tight clothing or boots, cramped positions, fatigue, certain medications, smoking, and alcohol. ", "description": "Hypothermia is dangerously low body temperature, below 95 \u00b0F (35 \u00b0C).", "Causes": "Hypothermia occurs when more heat is lost than the body can make. In most cases, it occurs after long periods in the cold. Common causes include:Being outside without enough protective clothing in winter, Falling into cold water of a lake,\u00a0river, or other body of water, Wearing wet clothing in windy or cold weather, Heavy exertion, not drinking enough fluids, or not eating enough in cold weather . "}, "Hormone therapy": {"description": "Symptoms of menopause include hot flashes, vaginal dryness, mood swings, sleep disorders, and decreased sexual desire. Hormone therapy comes as a pill, patch, injection, vaginal cream, tablet, or ring."}, "Hypophosphatemia": {"Symptoms": ["Bone pain", "Confusion", "Muscle weakness "], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will examine you. The following tests may be done: Kidney function tests, Vitamin K blood test . Exam and testing may show: Anemia due to too many red blood cells being destroyed (hemolytic anemia), Heart muscle damage (cardiomyopathy) . ", "description": "Hypophosphatemia is a low level of phosphorus in the blood.", "Causes": "The following may cause hypophosphatemia:Alcoholism, Antacids, Certain medicines, including acetazolamide, foscarnet, imatinib, pentamidine, and sorafenib, Fanconi syndrome, Starvation, Too little vitamin D, Overactive parathyroid gland (hyperparathyroidism) . ", "Treatment": "Treatment depends on the cause. Phosphate can be given by mouth or through a vein (IV)."}, "Histoplasmosis - acute (primary) pulmonary": {"description": "Acute pulmonary histoplasmosis is a respiratory infection that is caused by inhaling the spores of the fungus Histoplasma capsulatum.", "Possible Complications": "Acute pulmonary histoplasmosis can get worse over time, or can become chronic pulmonary histoplasmosis (which doesn't go away).Histoplasmosis can spread to other organs through the bloodstream (dissemination). This is usually seen in infants, young children, and patients with a suppressed immune system.", "Symptoms": ["Chest pain", "Chills", "Cough", "Fever", "Joint pain and stiffness", "Muscle aches and stiffness", "Rash (usually small sores on the lower legs)", "Shortness of breath\r\n", "Have HIV/AIDS", "Have had bone marrow or solid organ transplants", "Take medications to suppress their immune system", "Inflammation around the heart (called pericarditis)", "Serious lung infections", "Severe joint pain"], "Exams and Tests": "To diagnose histoplasmosis, the doctor needs to find the fungus or signs of the fungus in the body, or evidence that your immune system is reacting to the fungus.Tests include: Antibody tests for histoplasmosis, Biopsy of infection site, Bronchoscopy (usually only done if symptoms are severe or you have an abnormal immune system), Complete blood count (CBC) with differential, Chest CT scan, Chest x-ray (might show a lung infection or pneumonia), Sputum culture (this test often does not show the fungus, even if you are infected), Urine test for Histoplasma capsulatum antigen. ", "Treatment": "Most cases of histoplasmosis clear up without specific treatment. Patients are advised to rest and take medication to control fever.Your doctor may prescribe medication if you are sick for more than\u00a04 weeks, have a weakened immune system,\u00a0or are having breathing problems.", "Prevention": "Avoid contact with bird or bat droppings if you are in an area where the spore is common, especially if you have a weakened immune system.", "Causes": "Histoplasma capsulatum, the fungus that causes histoplasmosis, is found in the central and eastern United States, eastern Canada, Mexico, Central America, South America, Africa, and Southeast Asia. It is commonly found in the soil in river valleys. It gets into the soil mostly from bird and bat droppings.You can get sick when you breathe in spores that the fungus produces. Every year, thousands of people worldwide are infected, but most do not become seriously sick. Most have no symptoms or have only a mild flu-like illness and recover without any treatment.Acute pulmonary histoplasmosis may happen as an epidemic, with many people in one region becoming sick at the same time. People with weakened immune systems (see Symptoms section below) are more likely to:Get the disease, if exposed to the fungus spores, Have the disease come back, Have more symptoms, and more serious symptoms, than others who get the disease. Risk factors include traveling to or living in the central or eastern United States near the Ohio and Mississippi river valleys, and being exposed to the droppings of birds and bats. This threat is greatest after an old building is torn down, or when exploring caves."}, "Hand fracture - aftercare": {"description": "Boxer's fracture - aftercare; Metacarpal fracture - aftercare"}, "Hyperelastic skin": {"description": "Hyperelastic skin is skin that can be stretched beyond what is considered normal. Skin then returns to normal.", "Causes": "Hyperelastic skin is most often seen in the Ehlers-Danlos syndrome. People with this disorder have very elastic skin and joints that can be bent more than is normally possible. For this reason, they are sometimes referred to as rubber men or women.Other diseases that may cause\u00a0skin that is easily stretched include:Marfan syndrome, Osteogenesis imperfecta, Pseudoxanthoma elasticum, Subcutaneous T-cell lymphoma, Sun-related changes of older skin. "}, "Hearing or speech impairment - resources": {"description": "The following organizations are good resources for information on hearing impairment or speech impairment:"}, "Health screening - women - ages 40 - 64": {"description": "You should visit your health care provider from time to time, even if you are healthy. The purpose of these visits is to:"}, "Herpes - oral": {"description": "Oral herpes is an infection of the lips, mouth, or gums due to the herpes simplex virus. It causes small, painful blisters commonly called cold sores or fever blisters. Oral herpes is also called herpes labialis.", "Possible Complications": "Herpes infection of the eye is a leading cause of blindness in the United States. It causes scarring of the cornea.Other complications of oral herpes may include:Return of mouth sores and blisters, Spread of the virus to other skin areas, Bacterial skin infection, Widespread body infection, which may be life threatening in people who have a weakened immune system due to atopic dermatitis, cancer, or HIV infection. ", "Symptoms": ["Itching of the lips or skin around mouth", "Burning near the lips or mouth area", "Tingling near the lips or mouth area ", "Sore throat", "Fever", "Swollen glands", "Painful swallowing ", "Gums", "Lips", "Mouth", "Throat ", "Red blisters that break open and leak", "Small blisters filled with clear yellowish fluid", "Several smaller blisters that may grow together into a large blister", "Yellow and crusty blister as it heals, which eventually turns into pink skin ", "Menstruation or hormone changes", "Being out in the sun", "Fever", "Stress "], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider can diagnose oral herpes by looking at your mouth area. Sometimes, a sample of the sore is taken and sent to a laboratory for closer examination. Tests may include:Viral culture, Viral DNA test, Tzanck test to check for HSV . ", "Treatment": "Symptoms may go away on their own without treatment in 1 to 2 weeks. Your health care provider can prescribe medicines to fight the virus. This is called antiviral medicine. It can help reduce pain and make your symptoms go away sooner. Medicines used to treat mouth sores include: Acyclovir, Famciclovir, Valacyclovir . These medicines work best if you take them when you have warning signs of a mouth sore, before any blisters develop. If you get mouth sores frequently, you may need to take these medicines all the time. Antiviral skin creams may also be used. However, they are expensive and often only shorten the outbreak by a few hours to a day. . The following steps can also help make you feel better: Apply ice or a warm washcloth to the sores to help ease pain., Wash the blisters gently with germ-fighting (antiseptic) soap and water. This helps prevent spreading the virus to other body areas., Avoid hot beverages, spicy and salty foods, and citrus., Gargle with cool water or eat popsicles., Rinse with salt water., Take a pain reliever such as acetaminophen (Tylenol). . ", "Prevention": "Here are some tips to prevent mouth sores:Apply sunblock or lip balm containing zinc oxide to your lips before you go outside., Apply a moisturizing balm to prevent the lips from becoming too dry., Avoid direct contact with herpes sores., Wash items such as towels and linens in boiling hot water after each use., Do not share utensils, straws, glasses, or other items if someone has oral herpes. . Do not have oral sex if you have oral herpes, especially if you have blisters. You can spread the virus to the genitals. Both oral and genital herpes viruses can sometimes be spread, even when you do not have mouth sores or blisters. ", "Causes": "Oral herpes is a common infection of the mouth area. It is caused by the herpes simplex virus type 1 (HSV-1). Most people in the United States are infected with this virus by age 20.After the first infection, the virus goes to sleep (becomes dormant) in the nerve tissues in the face. Sometimes, the virus later wakes up (reactivates), causing cold sores. Herpes virus type 2 (HSV-2) most often causes genital herpes. However, sometimes HSV-2 is spread to the mouth during oral sex, causing oral herpes. Herpes viruses spread\u00a0most easily from individuals with an active outbreak or sore.\u00a0You can catch this virus if you:Have intimate or personal contact with someone who is infected, Touch an open herpes sore or something\u00a0that has been\u00a0in contact\u00a0with the herpes virus, such as infected razors, towels, dishes, and other shared items. . Parents may spread the virus to their children during regular daily activities. "}, "Household glue poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Anxiety", "Convulsions (from breathing in large amounts)", "Drunk, dazed, or dizzy appearance", "Excitability", "Headache", "Irritability", "Loss of appetite", "Nausea", "Red, runny nose ", "Gastric outlet obstruction (blockage of the passage from the stomach to the first part of the small intestine) with abdominal pain, nausea and vomiting", "Intestinal obstruction (small and large bowel) with abdominal pain , nausea and vomiting"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Heart MRI": {"description": "The test may be done as part of a chest MRI."}, "Healthy living": {"description": "Good dental care can help you keep your teeth and gums healthy for a lifetime. It is important for children to start young with good dental habits. Proper hygiene should include:"}, "Hypoparathyroidism": {"description": "Hypoparathyroidism is a disorder\u00a0in which the parathyroid glands in the neck do not produce enough parathyroid hormone (PTH).", "Possible Complications": "Hypoparathyroidism in children may lead to\u00a0poor growth, abnormal teeth, and slow mental development.Too much treatment with vitamin D and calcium can cause high blood calcium (hypercalcemia) or high urine calcium\u00a0(hypercalciuria). Excess treatment may sometimes interfere with kidney function, or even cause kidney failure.Hypoparathyroidism increases\u00a0the risk of: Addison disease, Cataracts, Parkinson disease, Pernicious anemia. ", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain", "Brittle nails", "Cataracts", "Decreased consciousness", "Dry hair", "Dry, scaly skin", "Muscle cramps", "Muscle spasms called tetany (can affect the larynx, causing breathing difficulties)", "Pain in the face, legs, and feet", "Painful menstruation", "Seizures", "Teeth that do not grow in on time, or at all", "Tingling lips, fingers, and toes", "Weakened tooth enamel (in children) "], "Exams and Tests": "Blood tests will be done to check calcium, phosphorus, magnesium, and PTH levels. An ECG may show abnormal heart rhythms.A urine test may be done to determine how much calcium is being removed from the body.", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to reduce symptoms and\u00a0restore the calcium and mineral balance in the body.Treatment involves calcium carbonate and vitamin D supplements. These usually must be taken for life. Blood levels are measured regularly to make sure that the dose is correct. A high-calcium, low-phosphorous diet is recommended.Persons who have life-threatening attacks of low calcium levels or prolonged muscle contractions are given calcium through a vein (IV). Precautions are taken to prevent seizures or larynx spasms. The heart is monitored for abnormal rhythms until the person is stable. When the life-threatening attack has been controlled, treatment continues with medicine taken by mouth.", "Causes": "There are four tiny parathyroid glands in the neck, near or attached to the back side of the thyroid gland.The parathyroid glands help control calcium use and removal by the body. They do this by producing parathyroid hormone (PTH). PTH helps control calcium, phosphorus, and vitamin D levels in the blood and bone.Hypoparathyroidism occurs when the glands produce too little PTH. The blood calcium level falls, and the phosphorus level rises.The most common cause of hypoparathyroidism is injury to the parathyroid glands during thyroid or neck surgery. It may also be caused by any of the following:Radioactive iodine treatment for hyperthyroidism, Very low magnesium level in the blood, Autoimmune attack on the parathyroid glands . DiGeorge syndrome is a childhood disease in which hypoparathyroidism occurs because all the parathyroid glands are missing at birth. Familial hypoparathyroidism occurs with other endocrine diseases, such as adrenal insufficiency, in a syndrome called type I polyglandular autoimmune syndrome (PGA I)."}, "How wounds heal": {"description": "Minor wounds often heal easily, but all wounds need care to prevent infection."}, "Hookworm": {"description": "Hookworm infection is a condition caused by roundworms that affects the small intestine and lungs.", "Possible Complications": "Iron deficiency anemia caused by loss of blood, Nutritional deficiencies, Severe protein loss with fluid buildup in the abdomen (ascites). ", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal discomfort", "Cough", "Diarrhea", "Fatigue", "Fever", "Gas", "Itchy rash", "Loss of appetite", "Nausea, vomiting", "Pale skin"], "Exams and Tests": "Tests that can help diagnose the infection include:Complete blood count (CBC) with differential, Stool ova and parasites exam. This disease may also affect the results of a D-xylose absorption test.", "Treatment": "The goals of treatment are to:Cure the infection, Treat complications of anemia, Improve nutrition. Parasite-killing medications such as albendazole, mebendazole, or pyrantel pamoate are usually prescribed. Ivermectin, used for other worm infections, does not work for hookworm infections.Symptoms and complications of anemia are treated as they arise. The doctor will likely recommend increasing the amount of protein in your diet.", "Prevention": "Handwashing and wearing shoes will reduce the likelihood of infection.", "Causes": "The disorder is caused by infestation with the following roundworms:Necator americanus, Ancylostoma duodenale, Ancylostoma ceylanicum, Ancylostoma braziliense. The first two roundworms affect humans only. The last two types also occur in animals.Hookworm disease is common in the moist tropics and subtropics. It affects about 1 billion people worldwide. In developing nations, the disease leads to the death of many children by increasing their risk for infections that their bodies would normally fight off.There is very little risk of getting the disease in the United States because of advances in sanitation and waste control. The important factor in getting the disease is walking where people who have hookworm have made feces.The larvae (immature form of the worm) get into the skin. The larvae move to the lungs via the bloodstream and enter the airways. The worms are about 1/2 inch long.After traveling up the windpipe, the larva are swallowed. After the larvae are swallowed, they infect the small intestine. They develop into adult worms and live there for 1 or more years. Adult worms and larvae are released in the feces."}, "Hearing loss - infants": {"description": "Hearing loss is not being able to hear sound in one or both ears. Infants may lose all of their hearing or just part of it. ", "Symptoms": ["A newborn baby with hearing loss may not startle when there is a loud noise nearby.", "Older infants, who should respond to familiar voices, may show no reaction when spoken to.", "Children should be using single words by 15 months, and simple 2-word sentences by age 2. If they do not reach these milestones, the cause may be hearing loss."], "Exams and Tests": "Hearing loss makes a baby unable to hear sounds below a certain level. A baby with normal hearing will hear sounds below that level.The health care provider will examine your child. The exam may show bone problems or signs of genetic changes that may cause hearing loss.The doctor will use an instrument called an otoscope to see inside the baby's ear canal. This allows the doctor to see the eardrum and find problems that may cause hearing loss.Two common tests are used to screen newborn infants for hearing loss:Auditory brain stem response (ABR) test. This test uses patches, called electrodes, to\u00a0see how the auditory nerve reacts to sound., Otoacoustic emissions (OAE) test. Microphones placed into the baby's ears detect nearby sounds. The sounds should echo in the ear canal. If there is no echo, it is a sign of hearing loss.. Older babies and young children can be taught to respond to sounds through play. These tests, known as visual response audiometry and play audiometry, can better determine the child's range of hearing.", "Causes": "Although it is not common, some infants may have some hearing loss at birth. Hearing loss can also develop in children who had normal hearing as infants. The loss can occur in one or both ears. It may be mild, moderate, severe, or profound. Profound hearing loss is what most people call deafness., Sometimes, hearing loss gets worse over time. Other times, it stays stable and does not get worse. . Risk factors for infant hearing loss include:Family history of hearing loss, Low birth weight . Hearing loss may occur when there is a problem in the outer or middle ear. These problems may slow or prevent sound waves from passing through. They include:Birth defects that cause changes in the structure of the ear canal or middle ear, Buildup of ear wax, Buildup of fluid behind the eardrum, Injury to or rupture of the eardrum, Objects stuck in the ear canal, Scar on the eardrum from many infections . Another type of hearing loss is due to a problem with the inner ear. It may occur when the tiny hair cells (nerve endings) that move sound through the ear are damaged. This type of hearing loss can be caused by:Exposure to certain toxic chemicals or medicines while in the womb or after birth, Genetic disorders, Infections the mother passes to her baby in the womb (such as toxoplasmosis, measles, or herpes), Infections that can damage the brain after birth, such as meningitis or measles, Problems with the structure of the inner ear, Tumors . Central hearing loss results from damage to the auditory nerve itself, or the brain pathways that lead to the nerve. Central hearing loss is rare in infants and children.", "Prevention": "It is not possible to prevent all cases of hearing loss in infants.Women who are planning to become pregnant should make sure they are current on all vaccinations.Pregnant women should check with their doctor before taking any medications. If you are pregnant, avoid activities that can expose your baby to dangerous infections, such as toxoplasmosis.If you or your partner has a family history of hearing loss, you may want to get genetic counseling before becoming pregnant.", "Treatment": "Over 30 states in the United States require newborn hearing screenings. Treating hearing loss early can allow many infants to develop normal language skills without delay. In infants born with hearing loss, treatments should start as early as age 6 months.Treatment depends on the baby's overall health and the cause of hearing loss. Treatment may include:\r\n  Speech therapy\r\n  , \r\n  Learning sign language\r\n  , \r\n  Cochlear implant (for those with profound sensorineural hearing loss)\r\n  . Treating the cause of hearing loss may include:Medications for infections, Ear tubes for repeated ear infections, \r\n  Surgery to correct structural problems\r\n  . "}, "Hypokalemic periodic paralysis": {"description": "It is one of a group of genetic disorders that includes hyperkalemic periodic paralysis and thyrotoxic periodic paralysis.", "Possible Complications": "Kidney stones (a side effect of acetazolamide), Irregular heart beat during attacks, Difficulty breathing, speaking, or swallowing during attacks (rare), Muscle weakness that worsens over time. ", "Symptoms": ["Most commonly occurs at the shoulders and hips", "May also affect the arms, legs, muscles of the eyes, and muscles that help\u00a0with breathing and swallowing", "Occurs off and on", "Most commonly occurs on awakening or after sleep or rest", "Is rare during exercise, but may be triggered by resting after exercise", "May be triggered by high-carbohydrate, high-salt meals or drinking alcohol", "Usually lasts 3 to 24 hours ", "Eyelid myotonia (a condition in which after opening and closing the eyes, they cannot be opened for a short time) "], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider may suspect hypokalemic periodic paralysis based on a family history of the disorder. Other clues to the disorder are muscle weakness symptoms that come and go with normal or low results of a potassium test.Between attacks, a physical examination shows nothing abnormal. Before an attack, there may be leg stiffness or heaviness in the legs.During an attack of muscle weakness, blood potassium level is low. This confirms the diagnosis. There is no decrease in total body potassium. Blood potassium level is normal between attacks.During an attack, muscle reflexes are decreased or absent. And muscles go limp rather than staying stiff. Muscle groups near the body, such as the shoulders and hips, are involved more often than the arms and legs.Tests that may be done include:ECG, which may be abnormal during attacks, EMG, which is usually normal between attacks and abnormal during attacks, Muscle biopsy, which\u00a0may show abnormalities . Other tests may be ordered to rule out other causes.", "Treatment": "The goals of treatment are relief of symptoms and prevention of further attacks.Muscle weakness that involves the breathing or swallowing muscles is an emergency situation. Dangerous heart arrhythmias may also occur during attacks. Any of these must be treated right away.Potassium given during an attack may stop the attack. Potassium can be taken by mouth. But if weakness is severe, potassium may need to be given through a vein (IV). Taking potassium supplements will not prevent attacks.Avoiding alcohol and eating a low-carbohydrate diet may help.A medicine called acetazolamide may be prescribed to prevent attacks. Your doctor may tell you to also take potassium supplements because acetazolamide may cause your body to lose potassium.If acetazolamide does not work for you, other medicines may be prescribed.", "Prevention": "Hypokalemic periodic paralysis cannot be prevented. Because it can be inherited, genetic counseling may be advised for couples at risk of the disorder.Treatment prevents attacks of weakness. Before an attack, there may be leg stiffness or heaviness in the legs. Doing mild exercise when these symptoms start may help prevent a full-blown attack.", "Causes": "Hypokalemic periodic paralysis is congenital. This means it is present at birth. In most cases, it is passed down through families (inherited) as an autosomal dominant disorder. In other words only one parent needs to pass the gene related to this condition on to you in order for you to be affected. Occasionally, the condition may be the result of a genetic problem that is not inherited.Unlike other forms of periodic paralysis, persons with congenital hypokalemic periodic paralysis have normal thyroid function. But they have a very low blood level of potassium during episodes of weakness. This results from potassium moving from the blood into muscle cells in an abnormal way.Risk factors include having other family members with periodic paralysis. The risk is slightly higher in Asian men who also have thyroid disorders."}, "Hydrocodone and acetaminophen overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Bluish-colored fingernails and lips", "Breathing problems, including slow and labored breathing, shallow breathing, or no breathing", "Cold, clammy skin", "Coma", "Confusion", "Dizziness", "Drowsiness", "Fatigue", "Lightheadedness", "Liver failure from acetaminophen overdose", "Loss of consciousness", "Low blood pressure", "Muscle twitches", "Pinpoint pupils", "Seizures", "Spasms of the stomach and intestines", "Weakness", "Weak pulse "], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Heart Failure Overview": {"description": "Heart failure is a condition in which the heart is no longer able to pump out enough oxygen-rich blood. This causes symptoms to occur throughout the body.", "Symptoms": ["Cough\r\n  ", "Fatigue, weakness, faintness\r\n  ", "Loss of appetite\r\n  ", "Need to urinate at night\r\n  ", "Pulse that feels fast or irregular, or a sensation of feeling the heart beat (palpitations)\r\n  ", "Shortness of breath when you are active or after you lie down\r\n  ", "Swollen (enlarged) liver or abdomen\r\n  ", "Swollen feet and ankles\r\n  ", "Waking up from sleep after a couple of hours due to shortness of breath\r\n  ", "Weight gain\r\n  "], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will examine you for signs of heart failure:Fast or difficult breathing, Leg swelling (edema), Neck veins that stick out (are distended), Sounds (\"crackles\") from fluid buildup in your lungs, heard through a stethoscope, Swelling of the liver or abdomen, Uneven or fast heartbeat and abnormal heart sounds . Many tests are used to \u00a0diagnose and monitor heart failure.An echocardiogram (echo) is often the best test for heart failure. Your doctor will use it to guide your treatment.Other imaging tests can look at how well your heart is able to pump blood, and how much the heart muscle is damaged.Many blood tests may also be used to:Help diagnose and monitor heart failure, Identify risks for heart disease, Look for possible causes of heart failure, or problems that may make your heart failure worse, Monitor for side effects of medicines you may be taking . ", "Causes": "Heart failure is often a long-term (chronic) condition, but it may come on suddenly. It can be caused by many different heart problems.The condition may affect only the right side or only the left side of the heart. More often, both sides of the heart are involved. Heart failure is present when:Your heart muscle cannot pump (eject) the blood out of the heart very well. This is called systolic heart failure., Your heart muscles are stiff and do not fill up with blood easily. This is called diastolic heart failure. . As the heart's pumping becomes less effective, blood may back up in other areas of the body. Fluid may build up in the lungs, liver, gastrointestinal tract, and the arms and legs. This is called congestive heart failure.The most common causes of heart failure are:Coronary artery disease (CAD), a narrowing of the small blood vessels that supply blood and oxygen to the heart. This can weaken the heart muscle over time or suddenly., High blood pressure that is not well controlled, leading to problems with stiffness, or eventually leading to muscle weakening. . Other heart problems that may cause heart failure are:Congenital heart disease, Heart attack, Heart valves that are leaky or narrowed), Infection that weakens the heart muscle, Some types of abnormal heart rhythms (arrhythmias) . Other diseases that can cause or contribute to heart failure:Amyloidosis, Emphysema, Overactive thyroid, Sarcoidosis, Severe anemia, Too much iron in the body, Underactive thyroid . ", "Prevention": "Most cases of heart failure can be prevented by living a healthy lifestyle and reducing your risk for heart disease.", "Treatment": "MONITORING AND SELF CARE\r\nIf you have heart failure, your doctor will monitor you closely. You will have follow-up appointments at least every 3 to 6 months, but sometimes much more often. You will also have tests to check your heart function.Knowing your body and the symptoms that your heart failure is getting worse will help you stay healthier and out of the hospital. At home, watch for changes in your heart rate, pulse, blood pressure, and weight.Weight gain, especially over a day or two, can be a sign that your body is holding onto extra fluid and your heart failure is getting worse. Talk to your doctor about what you should do if your weight goes up or you develop more symptoms.Limit how much salt you eat. Your doctor may also ask you to limit how much fluid you drink during the day.Other important changes to make in your lifestyle:Ask your doctor how much alcohol you may drink.\r\n , Do not smoke.\r\n , Stay active. Walk or ride a stationary bicycle. Your doctor can provide a safe and effective exercise plan for you. Do not exercise on days when your weight has gone up from fluid or you are not feeling well.\r\n , Lose weight if you are overweight.\r\n , Lower your cholesterol by changing your lifestyle.\r\n , Get enough rest, including after exercise, eating, or other activities. This allows your heart to rest too.\r\n . MEDICATIONS, SURGERY, AND DEVICES\r\nYour doctor will ask you to take medicines to treat your heart failure. Medicines treat the symptoms, prevent your heart failure from getting worse, and help you live longer. It is very important that you take your medicine as your health care team directed.These medicines:Help the heart muscle pump better\r\n , Keep your blood from clotting\r\n , Lower your cholesterol levels\r\n , Open up blood vessels or slow your heart rate so your heart doesn't have to work as hard\r\n , Reduce damage to the heart\r\n , Reduce the risk of abnormal heart rhythms\r\n , Replace potassium\r\n , Rid your body of excess fluid and salt (sodium)\r\n . It is very important that you take your medicine as your doctor and nurse directed. Do not take any other drugs or herbs without first asking your doctor or nurse about them. Drugs that may make your heart failure worse include:Ibuprofen (Advil, Motrin)\r\n , Naproxen (Aleve, Naprosyn)\r\n . The following surgeries and devices for certain patients with heart failure may be recommended:Coronary bypass surgery (CABG) or angioplasty with or without stenting may help improve blood flow to the damaged or weakened heart muscle.\r\n , Heart valve surgery may be done if changes in a heart valve are causing your heart failure.\r\n , A pacemaker can help treat slow heart rates or help both sides of your heart contract at the same time.\r\n , A defibrillator sends an electrical pulse to stop life-threatening abnormal heart rhythms.\r\n . END-STAGE HEART FAILURESevere heart failure occurs when treatments no longer work. Certain treatments may be used when a person is waiting for a heart transplant:Intra-aortic balloon pump (IABP)\r\n , Left ventricular assist device (LVAD)\r\n . At a certain point, the health care provider will decide whether it is best to keep treating heart failure aggressively. The patient, along with his or her family and doctors, may want to discuss palliative or comfort care at this time.\r\n"}, "Hyperactivity and sugar": {"description": "Hyperactivity means an\u00a0increase in\u00a0movement, impulsive actions, being easily distracted, and\u00a0shorter attention span. Some people believe that children are more likely to be hyperactive if they eat sugar, artificial sweeteners, or certain food colorings. Other experts disagree with this."}, "How to care for pressure sores": {"Symptoms": ["Stage I: A reddened, painful area on the skin that does not turn white when pressed. This is a sign that a pressure ulcer is forming. The skin may be warm or cool, firm or soft.", "Stage II: The skin blisters or forms an open sore. The area around the sore may be red and irritated.", "Stage III: The skin now develops an open, sunken hole called a crater. The tissue below the skin is damaged. You may be able to see body fat in the crater.", "Stage IV: The pressure ulcer has become so deep that there is damage to the muscle and bone, and sometimes to tendons and joints. ", "Sores covered in dead skin that is yellow, tan, green, or brown. The dead skin makes it hard to tell how deep the sore is. This type of sore is \"unstageable.\"", "Pressure sores that develop in the tissue deep below the skin. This is called a deep tissue injury. The area may be dark purple or maroon. There may be a blood-filled blister under the skin. This type of skin injury can quickly become a stage III or IV pressure sore. ", "Buttocks", "Elbow", "Hips", "Heels", "Ankles", "Shoulders", "Back", "Back of head "], "description": "A pressure sore is an area of the skin that breaks down when something keeps rubbing or pressing against the skin.", "Causes": "Pressure sores occur when there is too much pressure on the skin for too long. This reduces blood flow to the area. Without enough blood, the skin can die and a sore may form.You are more likely to get a pressure sore if you:Use a wheelchair or stay in bed for a long time, Are an older adult, Cannot move certain parts of your body without help, Have a disease that affects blood flow, including diabetes or vascular disease, Have Alzheimer's disease or another condition that affects your mental state, Have fragile skin, Can't control your bladder or bowels, Don't get enough nutrition . "}, "How to use your peak flow meter": {"description": "A peak flow meter helps you check how well your asthma is controlled. Peak flow meters are most helpful if you have moderate to severe persistent asthma."}, "HCG in urine": {"description": "Other HCG tests include:"}, "Healthy food trends -- kale": {"description": "Kale has become popular as one of the healthiest and tastiest green vegetables you can eat. Its hearty, peppery flavor can be enjoyed in many ways."}, "Hyperkalemic periodic paralysis": {"description": "It is one of a group of genetic disorders that includes hypokalemic periodic paralysis and thyrotoxic periodic paralysis.", "Possible Complications": "Kidney stones (a side effect of medicine used to treat the condition), Irregular heart beat, Difficulty breathing, speaking, or swallowing during attacks (rare), Muscle weakness that slowly continues to get worse. ", "Symptoms": ["Most commonly occurs at the shoulders and hips", "May also involve the arms and legs, but does not affect muscles of the eyes and\u00a0muscles that help\u00a0with breathing and swallowing", "Most commonly occurs while resting after activity or exercise", "May occur on awakening", "Occurs on and off", "Usually lasts 1 to 2 hours", "Eating a high carbohydrate meal", "Exercise", "Exposure to cold", "Eating potassium-rich foods or taking medicines that contain potassium "], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider may suspect hyperkalemic periodic paralysis based on a family history of the disorder. Other clues to the disorder are muscle weakness symptoms that come and go with normal or high results of a potassium test.Between attacks, a physical examination shows nothing abnormal. During and between attacks, potassium blood level can be normal or high. During an attack, muscle reflexes are decreased or absent. And\u00a0muscles go limp rather than staying stiff. Muscle groups near the body, such as the shoulders and hips, are involved more often than the arms and legs.Tests that may be done include:ECG, which may be abnormal during attacks, EMG, which is usually normal between attacks and abnormal during attacks, Muscle biopsy, which\u00a0may show abnormalities . Other tests may be ordered to rule out other causes.", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to relieve symptoms and prevent further attacks.Attacks are seldom severe enough to require emergency treatment. But weakness can become worse with repeated attacks. So treatment to prevent the attacks should occur as soon as possible.Glucose or other carbohydrates (sugars) given during an attack may reduce the severity of the symptoms. Calcium or diuretics (water pills) may need to be given through a vein to stop sudden attacks.", "Prevention": "A medicine called acetazolamide prevents attacks in many cases. Other medicines may also be prescribed. A low potassium, high carbohydrate diet may help prevent attacks. Avoiding fasting, strenuous activity, or cold temperatures also may help.", "Causes": "Hyperkalemic periodic paralysis is congenital. This means it is present at birth. In most cases, it is passed down through families (inherited) as an autosomal dominant disorder. In other words, only one parent needs to pass the gene related to this condition on to you in order for you to be affected. Occasionally, the condition may be the result of a genetic problem that is not inherited. It is believed that the disorder is related to problems with the way the body controls sodium and potassium levels in cells.Risk factors include having other family members with periodic paralysis. It affects men more often than women. "}, "Hemorrhagic disease of the newborn": {"description": "Hemorrhagic disease of the newborn (HDN)\u00a0is a bleeding disorder in babies. It most often develops shortly after a baby is born.", "Possible Complications": "Bleeding inside the skull (intracranial hemorrhage), with possible brain damage, Death, Severe bleeding. ", "Symptoms": ["A boy's penis, if he has been circumcised", "Belly button area", "Gastrointestinal tract (may result in blood in the baby's bowel movements)", "Mucus membranes (such as the lining of the nose and mouth)", "Places where there has been a needle stick", "Blood in the urine", "Bruising", "Raised lump on the baby's head (suggesting bleeding underneath one of the skull bones)"], "Exams and Tests": "Blood clotting tests will be done.The diagnosis is confirmed if a vitamin K shot stops the bleeding and blood clotting time (prothrombin time) is within normal limits.", "Treatment": "Vitamin K is given if bleeding occurs. Patients with severe bleeding may need blood transfusions.", "Prevention": "The early onset form of the disease may be prevented by giving vitamin K shots to pregnant women who take anti-seizure medications.The American Academy of Pediatrics recommends giving every baby a shot of vitamin K immediately after birth. This practice has helped prevent the classic and late-onset forms of the condition, which is now rare in the U.S.", "Causes": "A lack of vitamin K causes hemorrhagic disease of the newborn. Vitamin K plays an important role in blood clotting.Babies often have low levels of vitamin K for a variety of reasons. Vitamin K does not move easily across the placenta from the mother to the baby. As a result, a newborn does not have much vitamin K stored-up at birth. Also, there is not\u00a0much vitamin K in breast milk.Your baby may develop this condition if:A preventive vitamin K shot is not given at birth (if vitamin K is given by mouth instead of as a shot, it must be given more than once, and it may not be as effective), You take certain anti-seizure or blood thinning drugs . The condition is grouped into three categories:Early onset hemorrhagic disease of the newborn is very rare. It occurs during the first hours after birth and within 24 hours. Use of anti-seizure drugs or a blood thinner called coumadin during pregnancy is a common cause., Classic onset disease occurs between 24 hours and 7 days after birth. It may be seen in breast-fed infants who did not receive a vitamin K shot within the first week after birth. It is also rare., Late onset HDN is seen in infants\u00a0between 2 weeks and 2 months old. It is more common in children who did not receive a vitamin K shot. . Newborns and infants with the following problems involving the gastrointestinal tract are more likely to develop this disorder:Alpha1-antitrypsin deficiency, Biliary atresia, Celiac disease, Cystic fibrosis, Diarrhea, Hepatitis . "}, "Hyperglycemia - infants": {"Symptoms": [], "Exams and Tests": "A blood test will be done to check the baby's blood sugar level. This can be done with a heel or finger stick at the bedside or in a doctor's office or lab. ", "description": "This article discusses hyperglycemia in infants.", "Causes": "A healthy baby's body usually has very careful control of blood sugar level. Insulin is the main hormone in the body that regulates blood sugar. Sick babies may have poor insulin function or low amounts, which causes poor control of the blood sugar.There can be specific causes of ineffective or low insulin, such as infection, liver problems, hormone problems, and some medications. Rarely, babies may actually have diabetes, with low insulin levels that result in high blood sugar."}, "Hemoglobin C disease": {"description": "Hemoglobin C disease is a blood disorder passed down through families. It leads to a type of anemia, which occurs when red blood cells break down earlier than normal.", "Possible Complications": "Complications include anemia, gallbladder disease, and enlargement of the spleen.", "Symptoms": [], "Exams and Tests": "A physical exam may show an enlarged spleen.Tests that may be done include:Complete blood count, Hemoglobin electrophoresis, Peripheral blood smear, Blood hemoglobin. ", "Treatment": "Usually, no treatment is needed. Folic acid supplements may help your body produce normal red blood cells and improve the symptoms of the anemia.", "Prevention": "You may want to seek genetic counseling if you are at high risk for the condition and are considering having a baby. ", "Causes": "Hemoglobin C is an abnormal type of hemoglobin, the protein in red blood cells that carries oxygen. It is a type of hemoglobinopathy. The disease is caused by a problem with a gene called beta globin.The disease most often occurs in African Americans. You are more likely to have hemoglobin C disease if someone in your family has had it."}, "Home apnea monitor - infants": {"description": "Monitors are electrical instruments that can fail when the power is out, or if there is some electrical problem. There is no risk to the baby in these cases. There may be some skin irritation from the stick-on electrodes, but this is usually mild."}, "Hyperhidrosis": {"Symptoms": [], "Exams and Tests": "Visible signs of sweating may be noted during a doctor's visit. Tests may also be used to diagnose excessive sweating, including:Starch-iodine test: An iodine solution is applied to the sweaty area. After it dries, starch is sprinkled on the area. The starch-iodine combination turns a dark blue color wherever there is excess sweat. , Paper test: Special paper is placed on the affected area to absorb the sweat, and then weighed. The heavier it weights, the more sweat has accumulated. . You may be also be asked details about your sweating, such as: Location:\nDoes it occur your face, palms, or armpits, or all over the body?, Time pattern:\nDoes it occur at night? Did it begin suddenly?, Triggers:\nDoes the sweating occur when you are reminded of something that upset you (such as traumatic event)?, Other \r\n symptoms:\nWeight loss, pounding heartbeat, cold or clammy hands, fever, lack of appetite.. ", "description": "Hyperhidrosis is a medical condition in which a person sweats excessively and unpredictably. People with hyperhidrosis may sweat even when the temperature is cool or when they are at rest.", "Causes": "Sweating helps the body stay cool. In most cases, it is perfectly natural. People sweat more in warm temperatures, when they exercise, or in response to situations that make them nervous, angry, embarrassed, or afraid.Watch this video about:SweatingExcessive sweating occurs without such triggers. Persons with hyperhidrosis appear to have overactive sweat glands. The uncontrollable sweating can lead to significant discomfort, both physical and emotional.When excessive sweating affects the hands, feet, and armpits, it is called primary or focal hyperhidrosis.\u00a0In most cases,\u00a0no cause can be found. It seems to run in families.If the sweating occurs as a result of another medical condition, it is called secondary hyperhidrosis. The sweating may be all over the body or it may be in one area. Conditions that cause second hyperhidrosis include:Acromegaly, Anxiety conditions, Cancer, Carcinoid syndrome, Certain medications and substances of abuse, Glucose control disorders, Heart disease, Hyperthyroidism, Lung disease, Menopause, Parkinson disease, Pheochromocytoma, Spinal cord injury, Stroke, Tuberculosis or other infections . ", "Treatment": "Treatments may include:Antiperspirants: Excessive sweating may be controlled with strong anti-perspirants, which plug the sweat ducts. Products containing 10% to 20% aluminum chloride hexahydrate are the first line of treatment for underarm sweating. Some patients may be be prescribed a product containing a higher dose of aluminum chloride, which is applied nightly onto the affected areas. Antiperspirants can cause skin irritation, and large doses of aluminum chloride can damage clothing. Note: Deodorants do not prevent sweating, but are helpful in reducing body odor., Medication: Medicines may prevent stimulation of sweat glands. These are prescribed for certain types pf hyperhidrosis such as excessive sweating of the face. Medicines have side effects and are not right for everyone., Iontophoresis: This procedure uses electricity to temporarily turn off the sweat gland. It is most effective for sweating of the hands and feet. The hands or feet are placed into water, and then a gentle current of electricity is passed through it. The electricity is gradually increased until the patient feels a light tingling sensation. The therapy lasts about 10 to 20 minutes and requires several sessions. Side effects include skin cracking and blisters, although rare., Botox: Botulinum toxin type A (Botox) is used to treat severe underarm sweating. This\u00a0condition is called primary axillary hyperhidrosis. Botulinum toxin injected into the underarm temporarily block the nerves that stimulate sweating. Side effects include injection-site pain and flu-like symptoms. Botox used for sweating of the palms can cause mild, but temporary weakness and intense pain., Endoscopic thoracic sympathectomy (ETS): In severe cases, a minimally-invasive surgical procedure called sympathectomy may be recommended when other treatments do not work. The procedure cuts a nerve, turning off the signal that tells the body to sweat excessively. It is usually done on patients whose palms sweat much more heavily than normal. It may also be used to treat extreme sweating of the face. ETS does not work as well for those with excessive armpit sweating., Underarmsurgery: This is surgery to remove the sweat glands in the armpits. Methods used include laser, curettage (scraping), excision (cutting), or liposuction. These procedures are done using local anesthesia.. "}, "Home safety - children": {"description": "All teens and adults should learn CPR."}, "Hand lotion poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Diarrhea", "Nausea", "Possible intestinal blockage, resulting in stomach pain", "Vomiting "], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "How to breathe when you are short of breath": {"description": "Pursed lip breathing"}, "Haemophilus influenzae\u00a0Type b (Hib) vaccine - what you need to know": {"description": "Content source: National Center for Immunization and Respiratory Diseases"}, "How to make a sling": {"description": "Slings can be used for many different injuries. They are most often used when you have a broken (fractured) or dislocated arm or shoulder.", "Prevention": "Safety is the best way to avoid broken bones caused by falling. Some diseases make bones break more easily, so use caution when helping a person with fragile bones. Activities that strain the muscles or bones for long periods of time should be avoided, because these can cause weakness and falls. Use caution when walking on slippery or uneven surfaces."}, "Health screening - men - ages 18 to 39": {"description": "You should visit your health care provider regularly, even if you feel healthy. The purpose of these visits is to:"}, "Hypersensitivity pneumonitis": {"description": "Hypersensitivity pneumonitis is inflammation of the lungs due to breathing in a foreign substance, usually certain types of dust, fungus, or molds.", "Possible Complications": "The chronic form of this disease may lead to pulmonary fibrosis. This is\u00a0a scarring of the lung tissue that often is not reversible. Eventually, end-stage lung disease and respiratory failure can occur.", "Symptoms": ["Chills", "Cough", "Fever", "Malaise (feeling ill)", "Shortness of breath", "Breathlessness, especially with activity", "Cough, often dry", "Loss of appetite", "Unintentional weight loss"], "Exams and Tests": "Your doctor may hear abnormal lung sounds called crackles (rales) when listening to your chest with a stethoscope.Lung changes due to chronic hypersensitivity pneumonitis may be seen on a chest x-ray. Other tests may include:Aspergillus precipitin test, Bronchoscopy with washings, biopsy, and bronchoalveolar lavage, CBC, High-resolution CT scan of the chest, Hypersensitivity pneumonitis antibody panels, Krebs von den Lungen-6 assay (KL-6), Pulmonary function tests, Surgical lung biopsy. ", "Treatment": "First, the\u00a0offending substance must be identified. Treatment involves avoiding this substance in the future. Some people may need to change jobs if they cannot avoid the substance at work.If you have a chronic form of this disease, your doctor may recommend that you take glucocorticoids (anti-inflammatory medicines). Sometimes treatments used for asthma can help people with hypersensitivity pneumonitis.", "Prevention": "The chronic form can be prevented by avoiding the material that causes the lung inflammation.", "Causes": "Hypersensitivity pneumonitis usually occurs in people who work in places where there are high levels of organic dusts, fungus, or molds.Long-term exposure can lead to lung inflammation and acute lung disease. Over time, the acute condition turns into long-lasting (chronic) lung disease.Hypersensitivity pneumonitis may also be caused by fungi or bacteria in humidifiers, heating systems, and air conditioners found in homes and offices. Exposure to certain chemicals, such as isocyanates or acid anhydrides, can also lead to hypersensitivity pneumonitis.Examples of hypersensitivity pneumonitis include:Bird fancier's lung: This is the most common type of hypersensitivity pneumonitis. It is caused by repeated or intense exposure to proteins found in the feathers or droppings of many species of birds.Farmer's lung: This type of\u00a0 hypersensitivity pneumonitis\u00a0is caused by exposure to dust from moldy hay, straw, and grain."}, "Herpes - resources": {"description": "The following organizations are good resources for information on genital herpes:"}, "Heart transplant": {"description": "A heart transplant is surgery to remove a damaged or diseased heart and replace it with a healthy donor heart."}, "Hypertrophic cardiomyopathy": {"Symptoms": ["Chest pain", "Dizziness", "Fainting, especially during exercise", "Fatigue", "Light-headedness, especially with or after activity or exercise", "Sensation of feeling the heart beat (palpitations)", "Shortness of breath with activity or after lying down (or being asleep for a while) "], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a physical exam and listen to the heart and lungs with a stethoscope. Signs may include:Abnormal heart sounds or a heart murmur. These sounds may change with different body positions., High blood pressure . The pulse in your arms and neck will also be checked. The doctor may feel an abnormal heartbeat in the chest.Tests used to diagnose heart muscle thickness, problems with blood flow, or leaky heart valves (mitral valve regurgitation) may include:Echocardiography, ECG, \r\n  24-hour Holter monitor (heart rhythm monitor)\r\n  , Cardiac catheterization, Chest x-ray, MRI of the heart, \r\n  Transesophageal echocardiogram (TEE) \r\n  . Blood tests may be done to rule out other diseases.Close family members of people who have been diagnosed with hypertrophic cardiomyopathy may be screened for the condition.", "description": "The thickening can make it harder for blood to leave the heart, forcing the heart to work harder to pump blood. It also can make it harder for the heart to relax and fill with blood.", "Causes": "Hypertrophic cardiomyopathy is a condition that is most often passed down through families (inherited). It is thought to result from defects in the genes that control heart muscle growth.Younger people are likely to have a more severe form of hypertrophic cardiomyopathy.\u00a0However, the condition is seen in people of all ages.", "Treatment": "Always follow your doctor's advice about exercise if you have hypertrophic cardiomyopathy. You may be told to avoid strenuous exercise. Also, see your doctor for regularly scheduled checkups. If you have symptoms, you may need medicines such as beta-blockers and calcium channel blockers to help the heart contract and relax correctly. These drugs may relieve chest pain or shortness of breath when exercising. People with arrhythmias may need treatment, such as:Medicines to treat the abnormal rhythm, Blood thinners to reduce the risk of blood clots (if the arrhythmia is due to atrial fibrillation), A permanent pacemaker to control the heartbeat, An implanted defibrillator that recognizes life-threatening heart rhythms and sends an electrical pulse to stop them. Sometimes a defibrillator is placed, even if the patient has not had an arrhythmia but is at high risk for a deadly arrhythmia (for example, if the heart muscle is very sick or the patient has a relative who has died suddenly). . When blood flow out of the heart is severely blocked, symptoms can become severe. An operation called surgical myectomy may be done. In some cases, patients may be given an injection of alcohol into the arteries that feed the thickened part of the heart (alcohol septal ablation). People who have this procedure often show much\u00a0improvement. You may need surgery to repair the heart's mitral valve if it is leaking.Watch this video about:Cardiomyopathy"}, "Healthy food trends -- beans and legumes": {"description": "Beans, lentils, and peas come in many options, cost little money, and are easy to find. Soft and earthy-flavored, legumes can be eaten in many ways."}, "Hemochromatosis": {"description": "Hemochromatosis is a condition in which there is too much iron in the body. It is also called iron overload. ", "Possible Complications": "Complications include:Liver cirrhosis, Liver failure, Liver cancer. The disease may lead to the development of:Arthritis, Diabetes, Heart problems, Increased risk for certain bacterial infections, Testicular atrophy, Skin coloring changes. ", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain", "Fatigue", "Generalized darkening of skin color (often referred to as bronzing)", "Joint pain", "Lack of energy", "Loss of body hair", "Loss of sexual desire", "Weight loss", "Weakness "], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor or nurse will perform a physical exam. This may show liver and spleen swelling, and skin color changes.Blood tests may help make the diagnosis. Tests may include:Ferritin level, Iron level, Percentage of transferrin saturation (high), Genetic testing\u00a0 . Other tests may include:\r\n  Blood sugar (glucose) level\r\n  , Alpha fetoprotein, \r\n  Echocardiogram to examine the heart's function\r\n  , Electrocardiogram (ECG) to look at the electrical activity of the heart\r\n  , \r\n  Imaging tests such as CT scans, MRI, and ultrasound\r\n  , \r\n  Liver function tests \r\n  . The condition may be confirmed with a liver biopsy or phlebotomy. If a genetic defect is confirmed, other blood tests can be used to find out if other family members are at risk of iron overload.", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to remove excess iron from the body and treat any organ damage.A procedure called phlebotomy is the best method for removing excess iron from the body: One-half liter of blood is removed from the body each week until the body iron level is normal. This may take many months to do., After that, the procedure may be done less often to maintain normal iron levels. . How the procedure is needed depends on your symptoms and levels of hemoglobin and serum ferritin, and how much iron you take in your diet.In men, testosterone hormone therapy can help improve the loss of sexual desire and changes in secondary sexual characteristics. Diabetes, arthritis, liver failure, and heart failure should be treated as appropriate.If you are diagnosed with hemochromatosis, you should follow a special diet to reduce how much iron is absorbed from your digestive tract. Your doctor or nurse will recommend:Do not drink alcohol, especially if you have liver damage., Do not take iron pills or vitamins containing iron., Do not use iron cookware., Do not eat raw seafood (cooked is fine)., Do not eat foods fortified with iron, such as 100% iron-fortified breakfast cereals. . ", "Prevention": "Screening family members of a person diagnosed with hemochromatosis may detect the disease early so that treatment can be started before organ damage has occurred in other affected relatives.", "Causes": "There are two types of hemochromatosis:Primary hemochromatosis is a genetic disorder passed down through families. It occurs at birth. People with this condition absorb too much iron through their digestive tract. Iron builds up in the body, especially the liver. A person is more likely to get this disease if someone else in the family has or had the condition., Secondary (acquired) hemochromatosis is due to other blood-related disorders (such as thalassemia or certain anemias) or many blood transfusions. Sometimes it occurs in people with long-term alcoholism and other health conditions.. Hemochromatosis affects more men than women. It is common in Caucasians of western European descent. "}, "Hearing loss and music": {"description": "Over time, repeated exposure to loud noise and music can cause hearing loss."}, "Hyperparathyroidism": {"Symptoms": ["Bone pain or tenderness", "Depression and forgetfulness", "Feeling tired, ill, and weak", "Fragile bones of the limbs and spine that can break easily", "Increased amount of urine produced and need to urinate more often", "Kidney stones", "Nausea and loss of appetite"], "Exams and Tests": "Blood tests will be done to check for increased levels of parathyroid hormone (PTH), calcium, and alkaline phosphatase, and lower levels of phosphorous. A 24-hour urine collection test can help determine how much calcium is being removed from the body. \r\n Bone x-rays and bone mineral density (DXA) tests can help detect bone loss, fractures, or bone softening.X-rays, ultrasound, or CT scans of the kidneys or urinary tract may show calcium deposits or a blockage.", "description": "Hyperparathyroidism is a disorder in which the parathyroid glands in your neck produce too much parathyroid hormone (PTH).", "Causes": "The parathyroid glands are located in the neck, near or attached to the back side of the thyroid gland. They produce parathyroid hormone. This hormone controls calcium, phosphorus, and vitamin D levels in the blood and bone.When calcium levels are too low, the body responds by making more parathyroid hormone. This hormone causes calcium levels in the blood to rise, as more calcium is taken from the bone and reabsorbed by the intestines and kidney. One or more of the parathyroid glands may grow larger. This leads to too much parathyroid hormone (a condition called primary hyperparathyroidism). Most often, the cause is not known. The disease is most common in people over age 60, but it can also occur in younger adults. Hyperparathyroidism in childhood is very unusual., Women are more likely to be affected than men., Radiation to the head and neck increases the risk., Rarely, the disease is caused by parathyroid cancer. . Medical conditions that cause low blood calcium levels or increased phosphate levels can lead to secondary hyperparathyroidism. Common causes include:Conditions that make it hard for the body to remove phosphate, Kidney failure, Not enough calcium in the diet, Too much calcium lost in the urine, Vitamin D disorders (which are often seen in children who do not eat a variety of foods, and in older adults who do not get enough sunlight on their skin), Problems absorbing nutrients from food (called malabsorption) . ", "Treatment": "If you have mildly increased calcium levels from primary hyperparathyroidism and you do not have symptoms, you may choose to have regular checkups or get treated.If you decide to have treatment, it may include:Drinking more fluids to prevent kidney stones from forming, Exercising, Avoiding thiazide-type diuretics (\"water pills\"), Having surgery to remove the overactive glands (recommended for people under age 50) . If you have symptoms or your calcium level is very high, you may need surgery to remove the parathyroid gland that is overproducing the hormone.Treatment for secondary hyperparathyroidism depends on the cause. Your doctor may suggest:A special form of prescribed vitamin D, if you have low vitamin D levels . Patients whose hyperparathyroidism is caused by kidney failure may be treated with:Extra calcium and vitamin D, Avoiding phosphate in the diet, The medicine cinacalcet (Sensipar), Dialysis or a kidney transplant, Parathyroid surgery, if the parathyroid levels become uncontrollably high . "}, "How to make a splint": {"Prevention": "Safety is the best way to avoid broken bones caused by falling. Some diseases make bones break easier, so use caution when assisting a person with fragile bones.Avoid activities that strain the muscles or bones for long periods as these can cause fatigue and falls. Always use protective gear, such as proper footwear, pads, braces, and helmets.", "description": "A splint is a device used for holding a part of the body stable to decrease pain and prevent further injury.", "Causes": "Splints can be used for many different injuries. Any time there is a broken bone, stabilizing the area is important."}, "Histiocyte": {"description": "A histiocyte is a type of immune cell that\u00a0destroys foreign substances in an effort to protect the body from infection."}, "Hydrocarbon pneumonia": {"description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or a local poison control center at 1-800-222-1222.", "Possible Complications": "Pleural effusion, Pneumothorax, Secondary bacterial infections. ", "Symptoms": ["Coma", "Coughing", "Fever", "Shortness of breath", "Smell of a hydrocarbon product on the breath", "Stupor", "Vomiting"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will check the patient's vital signs, including temperature, pulse, breathing rate, and blood pressure.The following tests may be done:Blood gas monitoring, Complete blood count (CBC), Metabolic panel, Toxicology screen, X-ray of the chest. ", "Treatment": "Those with mild symptoms may need to be seen by doctors in an emergency room, but may not require a hospital stay.Persons with moderate and severe symptoms are normally admitted to the hospital, occasionally to an intensive care unit (ICU).Hospital treatment may include:Breathing tube, Oxygen. ", "Prevention": "If you have young children, be sure to identify and store materials containing hydrocarbons carefully."}, "Heart disease - resources": {"description": "The following organizations are good resources for information on heart disease:"}, "Hemorrhoid removal - discharge ": {"description": "Hemorrhoidectomy - discharge; Hemorrhoid\u00a0 - discharge"}, "Human bites - self-care": {"Symptoms": ["Skin breaks or major cuts, with or without bleeding", "Puncture wounds", "Bruising", "Crushing injuries", "Tendon or joint injuries "], "description": "A human bite can break, puncture, or tear the skin. Human bites that break the skin can be very serious because of the risk of infection. ", "Causes": "Human bites can occur in two ways:If someone bites you, If your hand comes into contact with a person's teeth and breaks the skin, such as during fist fight . Bites are very common among young children. Children often bite to express anger or other negative feelings.Human bites may be more dangerous than animal bites. Certain germs in some human mouths can cause hard-to-treat infections. You can also get certain diseases from a human bite, such as HIV or hepatitis B or C."}, "Hydroxyzine overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Shortness of breath", "Difficulty urinating", "Blurred vision", "Dry mouth, nose, and throat", "Rapid heartbeat", "Low blood pressure", "Palpitations", "Coma (decreased level of consciousness and lack of responsiveness)", "Convulsions", "Delirium", "Depression", "Disorientation", "Dizziness", "Drowsiness", "Excitation", "Hallucinations", "Nervousness", "Sleeping difficulties", "Tremor", "Uncoordinated movement", "Unsteadiness", "Flushed skin"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "HELLP syndrome": {"description": "HELLP syndrome is a group of symptoms that occur in pregnant women who have:", "Possible Complications": "There can be complications before and after the baby is delivered, including:Disseminated intravascular coagulation (DIC) -- a clotting disorder that leads to excess bleeding (hemorrhage), Fluid in the lungs (pulmonary edema), Kidney failure, Liver hemorrhage and failure, Separation of the placenta from the uterine wall (placental abruption). After the baby is born and HELLP syndrome has time to improve, most of these complications will go away.", "Symptoms": ["Fatigue or feeling unwell", "Fluid retention and excess weight gain", "Headache", "Nausea and vomiting that continues to get worse", "Pain in the upper right part of the abdomen", "Blurry vision", "Nosebleed or other bleeding that won't stop easily (rare)", "Seizures or convulsions (rare)"], "Exams and Tests": "During a physical examination, the doctor may discover:Abdominal tenderness, especially in the right upper side, Enlarged liver, High blood pressure, Swelling in the legs. Liver function tests (liver enzymes) may be high. Platelet counts may be low. A CT scan may show bleeding into the liver.Tests of the baby's health will be done. Tests include fetal non-stress test, ultrasound, among others.", "Treatment": "The main treatment is to deliver the baby as soon as possible, even if the baby is premature. Problems with the liver and other complications of HELLP syndrome can quickly get worse and be harmful to both the mother and child.Your doctor may induce labor by giving you drugs to start labor, or may perform a C-section.You may also receive:A blood transfusion if bleeding problems become severe, Corticosteroid medications to help the baby's lungs develop faster, Medications to treat high blood pressure. ", "Causes": "The\u00a0cause\u00a0of HELLP syndrome has not been found.HELLP syndrome occurs in about 1 to 2 out of 1,000 pregnancies, and in 10-20% of pregnant women with severe preeclampsia or eclampsia.Most often HELLP develops before the pregnancy is 37 weeks along. Sometimes it develops in the week after the baby is born.Many women have high blood pressure and are diagnosed with preeclampsia before they develop HELLP syndrome. In some cases, HELLP symptoms are the first warning of preeclampsia and the condition\u00a0can be\u00a0misdiagnosed as:Flu or other viral illness, Gallbladder disease, Hepatitis, Idiopathic thrombocytopenic purpura (ITP), Lupus flare, Thrombotic thrombocytopenic purpura. "}, "How to choose the best hospital for surgery": {"description": "Also see if your hospital is rated highly by state agencies or consumer or other groups. Some places to look for hospital ratings are:"}, "HPV vaccine": {"description": "The HPV virus has also been linked to other kinds of cancers, including vaginal, vulvar, penile, anal, mouth and throat cancers. "}, "Heart and vascular services": {"description": "Heart and vascular services refers to the branch of medicine that focuses on the cardiovascular system."}, "Health risks of alcohol use ": {"description": "You probably already know that drinking too much can cause many health problems. But even responsible drinking patterns can lead to health issues and other problems in your everyday life."}, "Heart attack - discharge": {"description": "You were in the hospital because you had a heart attack. A heart attack occurs when blood flow to a part of your heart is blocked long enough that part of the heart muscle is damaged or dies."}, "Hypospadias repair - discharge ": {"description": "Your child received general anesthesia before surgery to make him unconscious and unable to feel pain."}, "Hyperaldosteronism - primary and secondary": {"description": "Hyperaldosteronism can be primary or secondary.", "Possible Complications": "Impotence and gynecomastia (enlarged breasts in men) may occur with long-term\u00a0use of medicines.\u00a0But this is uncommon.", "Symptoms": ["Fatigue", "Headache", "Muscle weakness", "Numbness", "Paralysis that comes and goes"], "Exams and Tests": "Tests that may be ordered to diagnose hyperaldosteronism include:Abdominal CT scan, ECG, Plasma aldosterone level, Plasma renin activity, Serum potassium level, Urinary aldosterone. A procedure to insert a catheter into the veins of the adrenal glands may need to be done. This helps check which\u00a0of the two adrenal glands is making too much aldosterone.This disease may also affect the results of the following tests:Blood bicarbonate\u00a0\u00a0\u00a0 , Blood magnesium, Blood \u00a0sodium, Urine potassium, Urine sodium. ", "Treatment": "Primary hyperaldosteronism caused by an adrenal gland tumor is usually treated with surgery. It can sometimes be treated with medicines. Removing the adrenal tumor may control the symptoms. Even after surgery, some people still have high blood pressure and need to take medicine. But often, the number of medicines or doses can be lowered. Limiting how much salt intake and taking medicine may control the symptoms without surgery. Medicines to treat hyperaldosteronism include:Drugs that block the action of aldosterone , Diuretics (water pills), which help manage fluid buildup in the body. Secondary hyperaldosteronism is treated with medicines (as described above) and limiting salt intake.\u00a0Surgery is not used.", "Causes": "Primary hyperaldosteronism is due to a problem of the adrenal glands themselves, causing them to release too much aldosterone. In contrast, with secondary hyperaldosteronism, the adrenal glands release too much aldosterone as a result of a problem elsewhere in the body. These problems can be with genes, diet, or a medical disorder such as with the heart, liver, kidneys, or high blood pressure. Most cases of primary hyperaldosteronism are caused by a noncancerous (benign) tumor of the adrenal gland. The condition is most common in people 30 to 50 years old."}, "Hyperplasia": {"description": "It can also be due to the growth of completely normal cells. This is called physiologic hyperplasia."}, "Heimlich maneuver": {"description": "See also:"}, "HPV vaccine (human papillomavirus) Cervarix - what you need to know": {"description": "Content source: National Center for Immunization and Respiratory Diseases"}, "Health screening - women - ages 18 - 39": {"description": "You should visit\u00a0your health care provider from time to time, even if you are healthy. The purpose of these visits is to:"}, "Heart disease and intimacy": {"description": "Almost everyone with heart problems has these questions and concerns. The most helpful thing you can do is talk to your doctor, nurse, spouse, partner, or friends."}, "Hammer toe repair": {"description": "Hammer toe can occur in more than one toe.\r\n"}, "Heart failure - tests": {"description": "The diagnosis of heart failure is made largely on a patient's symptoms and a physical exam. However, there are many tests that can help give more information about the condition."}, "Healthy grocery shopping": {"description": "A key step for losing weight, keeping the weight off, and staying healthy is learning how to buy the right foods at the store."}, "Heat emergencies": {"Symptoms": ["Muscle cramps and pains, that most often occur in the legs or abdomen", "Very heavy sweating", "Fatigue", "Thirst", "Headache", "Dizziness and light-headedness", "Weakness", "Nausea and vomiting", "Cool, moist skin", "Dark urine", "Fever (temperature above 104 \u00b0F)", "Irrational behavior", "Extreme confusion", "Dry, hot, and red skin", "Rapid, shallow breathing", "Rapid, weak pulse", "Seizures", "Unconsciousness"], "Prevention": "The first step in preventing heat illnesses is thinking ahead.Find out what the temperature will be for the whole day when you will be outdoors. , Think about\u00a0how you have dealt with heat in the past., Make sure you will have plenty of fluids to drink., Find out\u00a0if there is shade available where you are going., Learn the early signs of heat illness.. To help prevent heat illnesses:Wear loose-fitting, lightweight and light-colored clothing in hot weather., Rest often and seek shade when possible., Avoid exercise or heavy physical activity outdoors during hot or humid weather., Drink plenty of fluids every day. Drink more fluids before, during, and after physical activity., Be very careful to avoid overheating if you are taking drugs that impair heat regulation, or if you are overweight or elderly., Be careful of hot cars in the summer. Allow the car to cool off before getting in., Never leave a child sitting in a car exposed to the hot sun, even after opening windows.. ", "description": "Heat emergencies or illnesses are caused by exposure to extreme heat and sun. Heat illnesses can be prevented by being careful in hot, humid weather.", "Causes": "Heat injuries can occur due to high temperatures and humidity. You are more likely to feel the effects of heat sooner if:You are not used to high temperatures or high humidity, You are a child or an older adult, You are already ill from another cause or have been injured., You are obese, You are also exercising (even a person who is in good shape can suffer heat illness if warning signs are ignored). The following make it harder for the body to regulate the temperature, and make a heat emergency more likely:Drinking alcohol before or during exposure to heat\u00a0or high\u00a0humidity, Not drinking enough fluids when you\u2019re active on warmer or hot days, Heart disease, Certain medicines: Examples are beta blockers, water pills or diuretics, some medicines used to treat depression, psychosis, or ADHD , Sweat gland problems, Wearing too much clothing. "}, "Hemolytic anemia caused by chemicals and toxins": {"description": "Hemolytic anemia caused by chemicals and toxins is a lack of red blood cells that occurs when red blood cells are excessively damaged by certain chemicals or toxins.", "Causes": "Possible substances that can cause hemolytic anemia include:Anti-malaria drugs (quinine compounds), Arsenic, Dapsone, Intravenous water infusion (not half-normal saline or normal saline), Metals (chromium/chromates, platinum salts, nickel compounds, copper, lead, cis-platinum), Nitrites, Nitrofurantoin, Penicillin, Phenazopyridine (Pyridium), Rho immune globulin (WinRho), Ribavirin, Snake bites (some snake venom contains hemolytic toxins), Sulfonamides, Sulfones . This list is not all-inclusive."}, "Hydrofluoric acid poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Can't breathe as the throat swells shut", "Fever", "Severe abdominal pain", "Severe pain in the mouth", "Severe throat pain", "Vomiting", "Bluish colored lips and fingernails", "Chills", "Choking", "Coughing", "Fever", "Tight chest", "Very painful skin burning"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or a local poison control center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Hypothalamus": {"description": "The hypothalamus is an area of the brain that produces hormones that control:"}, "Hypogonadism": {"description": "Hypogonadism\u00a0occurs when the body's sex glands produce little or no hormones. In men, these glands (gonads) are the testes. In women, these glands\u00a0are the ovaries.", "Possible Complications": "In women, hypogonadism may cause infertility. Menopause is a form of hypogonadism that occurs naturally and can cause hot flashes, vaginal dryness, and irritability as a woman's estrogen levels fall. The risk of osteoporosis and heart disease increase after menopause.Some women with hypogonadism take estrogen therapy, especially those who have early menopause (premature ovarian failure).\u00a0But there is an increased risk\u00a0of breast cancer and heart disease when hormone therapy is used long-term\u00a0to treat menopause symptoms.In men, hypogonadism results in loss of sex drive and may cause:Impotence, Infertility, Osteoporosis, Weakness. Men normally have lower testosterone as they age, but the decline is not as dramatic or steep as the decline in sex hormones that women experience.", "Symptoms": ["Hot flashes", "Loss of body hair", "Low libido", "Menstruation stops", "Breast enlargement", "Decreased beard and body hair", "Muscle loss", "Sexual problems ", "Headaches or vision loss", "Milky breast discharge (from a prolactinoma)", "Symptoms of other hormonal deficiencies (such as hypothyroidism)"], "Exams and Tests": "Tests may be done that check:Estrogen level (women), FSH level and LH level, Testosterone level (men). Other tests may include:Blood tests for anemia and iron, Genetic tests, Prolactin level (milk hormone), Sperm count, Thyroid level. Sometimes imaging tests are needed, such as a sonogram of the ovaries. If pituitary disease is suspected, an MRI or CT scan of the brain may be done.", "Treatment": "Hormone-based medicines may be prescribed.\u00a0For girls and women,\u00a0estrogen and progesterone\u00a0come in the form of a pill or skin patch. For boys and men, testosterone can be given\u00a0as a skin patch, skin gel, a solution applied to the armpit, a patch applied to the upper gum, or by injection.For women who have not had their uterus removed, combination treatment with estrogen and progesterone\u00a0may decrease the chance of developing endometrial cancer. Women with hypogonadism who have low sex drive\u00a0may also\u00a0be prescribed\u00a0low-dose testosterone.In some women, injections or pills can be used to stimulate ovulation. Injections of pituitary hormone may be used to help male patients produce sperm. Other people may need surgery and radiation therapy.", "Prevention": "Maintain normal body weight and healthy eating habits to prevent anorexia nervosa. Other causes may not be preventable.", "Causes": "The cause of hypogonadism\u00a0is primary or central. In primary hypogonadism, the ovaries or testes themselves do not function properly. Causes of primary hypogonadism include:Certain autoimmune disorders, Genetic and developmental disorders, Infection, Liver and kidney disease, Radiation, Surgery . The most common genetic disorders that cause primary hypogonadism are Turner syndrome (in women) and Klinefelter syndrome (in men).In central hypogonadism, the centers in the brain that control the gonads (hypothalamus and pituitary) do not function properly. Causes of central hypogonadism include:Bleeding, Certain medicines, including steroids and opiates, Genetic problems, Infections, Nutritional deficiencies, Iron excess (hemochromatosis), Radiation, Rapid, significant weight loss, Surgery, Trauma, Tumors . A genetic cause of central hypogonadism that also takes away the sense of smell is Kallmann syndrome in males. The most common tumors affecting the pituitary are craniopharyngioma in children and prolactinoma in adults."}, "HPV vaccine (human papillomavirus) Gardasil - what you need to know": {"description": "Content source: National Center for Immunization and Respiratory Diseases"}, "Hemolytic anemia": {"Symptoms": ["Feeling grumpy", "Feeling weak or tired more often than usual, or with exercise", "Headaches", "Problems concentrating or thinking", "Blue color to the whites of the eyes", "Brittle nails", "Light-headedness when you stand up", "Pale skin color ", "Shortness of breath", "Sore tongue"], "Exams and Tests": "A test called a complete blood count (CBC) can help diagnose anemia and offer some hints to the type and cause of the problem. Important parts of the CBC include red blood cell count (RBC), hemoglobin, and hematocrit (HCT).These tests can identify the type of hemolytic anemia:Absolute reticulocyte count, Coomb test, direct, Coomb test, indirect, Donath-Landsteiner test, Cold agglutinins, Free hemoglobin in the serum or urine, Hemosiderin in the urine, Platelet count, Protein electrophoresis - serum, Pyruvate kinase, Serum haptoglobin levels, Serum LDH, Urine and fecal urobilinogen. ", "description": "Normally, red blood cells last for about 120 days in the body. In hemolytic anemia, red blood cells in the blood are destroyed earlier than normal.", "Causes": "Hemolytic anemia occurs when the bone marrow is unable to replace the red blood cells that are being destroyed.Immune hemolytic anemia occurs when the immune system mistakenly sees your own red blood cells as foreign substances. Antibodies then develop against the red blood cells. These antibodies attack the red blood cells and cause them to break down too early.Red blood cells may be destroyed due to:Genetic defects within the red cells (such as sickle cell anemia, thalassemia, and G6PD deficiency), Exposure to certain chemicals, drugs, and toxins, Infections. Other causes are:Blood clots in small blood vessels, Transfusion of blood from a donor with a blood type that does not match yours. ", "Treatment": "Treatment depends on the type and cause of the hemolytic anemia:In emergencies, a blood transfusion may be needed., For an overactive immune system, drugs that suppress the immune system may be used., When blood cells are being destroyed at a fast pace, the body may need extra folic acid and iron supplements to replace what is being lost.. In rare cases, surgery is needed to take out the spleen. This is because the spleen acts as a filter that removes abnormal cells from the blood."}, "Headaches - danger signs": {"description": "Most people with headaches feel better by making lifestyle changes, such as\u00a0learning ways to relax. Taking medicines, such as for pain, may also help."}, "Hypogonadotropic hypogonadism": {"description": "Hypogonadotropic hypogonadism (HH) is a form of\u00a0hypogonadism that is due to a problem with the pituitary gland or hypothalamus. ", "Possible Complications": "Delayed puberty, Early menopause (in females)\u00a0, Infertility, Low bone density and fractures later in life, Low self-esteem due to late start of puberty (emotional support may be helpful), Sexual problems such as low libido. ", "Symptoms": ["In females, a lack of breasts and menstrual periods ", "In males, no development of sex characteristics, such as enlargement of the testes and penis, deepening of the voice, and facial hair", "Inability to smell (in some cases) ", "Lack of development at puberty (development may be very late or incomplete)", "Short stature (in some cases)", "Loss of sexual interest (libido) in men", "Loss of menstrual periods (amenorrhea) in women", "Decreased energy and interest", "Loss of muscle mass in men", "Weight gain\r\n  "], "Exams and Tests": "Tests that may be done include:Blood tests to measure hormone levels such as FSH, LH, and TSH, prolactin, testosterone and estradiol, LH response to GnRH, MRI of the pituitary gland/hypothalamus\u00a0(to look for a tumor or other growth), Genetic testing . ", "Treatment": "Treatment depends on the source of the problem, but may involve:Injections of testosterone, Slow-release testosterone skin patch, Testosterone gels (in males), Estrogen and progesterone pills (in females), GnRH injections . ", "Causes": "HH is caused by a lack of hormones that normally stimulate the ovaries or testes: gonadotropin-releasing hormone (GnRH), follicle stimulating hormone (FSH) and luteinizing hormone (LH).Normally: The hypothalamus in the brain releases gonadotropin-releasing hormone (GnRH). , This hormone stimulates the pituitary gland to release FSH and LH. , These hormones tell the female ovaries or the male testes to release hormones that lead to normal sexual development in puberty., Any change in this hormone release chain causes a lack of sex hormones and prevents normal sexual maturity.. There are several causes of HH:Damage to the pituitary gland or hypothalamus from surgery, injury, tumors, infections, or radiation, Genetic defects , High doses or long-term use of opioid or steroid (glucocorticoid) medications, Severe stress, Nutritional problems (both rapid weight gain or weight loss), Chronic medical diseases, including chronic inflammation or infections. Kallmann syndrome is an inherited form of HH. Some patients with Kallmann\u2019s also have anosmia (loss of the sense of smell).\u00a0\r\n"}, "Heart attack": {"Symptoms": ["DO NOT try to drive yourself to the hospital.", "DO NOT WAIT. You are at greatest risk of sudden death in the early hours of a heart attack. ", "You may feel the pain in only one part of your body OR", "Pain may move from your chest to your arms, shoulder, neck, teeth, jaw, belly area, or back ", "A tight band around the chest", "Bad indigestion", "Something heavy sitting on your chest", "Squeezing or heavy pressure ", "Anxiety", "Cough", "Fainting", "Light-headedness, dizziness", "Nausea or vomiting", "Palpitations (feeling like your heart is beating too fast or irregularly)", "Shortness of breath", "Sweating, which may be very heavy "], "Exams and Tests": "A doctor, nurse or other health care provider will perform a physical exam and listen to your chest using a stethoscope. The health care provider may hear abnormal sounds in your lungs (called crackles), a heart murmur, or other abnormal sounds., You may have a fast or uneven pulse., Your blood pressure may be normal, high, or low. . You will have an electrocardiogram (ECG) to look for heart damage. A blood test can show if you have heart tissue damage. This test can confirm that you are having a heart attack.Coronary angiography may be done right away (especially if it is thought that an artery is completely blocked) or when you are more stable. This test uses a special dye and x-rays to see how blood flows through your heart., It can help your doctor decide which treatments you need next. . Other tests to look at your heart that may be done while you are in the hospital: Echocardiography with or without stress testing, Exercise stress test, Nuclear stress test. ", "description": "The medical term for this is myocardial infarction.", "Causes": "A substance called plaque can build up in the walls of your coronary arteries. This plaque is made up of cholesterol and other cells. A heart attack may occur when:A tear in the plaque occurs. This triggers blood platelets and other substances to form a blood a clot at the site that blocks most or all of the oxygen-carrying blood from flowing to a part of the heart muscle. This is the most common cause of heart attack., A slow buildup of plaque may narrow one of the coronary arteries so that it is almost blocked. . The cause of heart attack is not always known. Heart attack may occur: When you are resting or asleep, After a sudden increase in physical activity, When you are active outside in cold weather, After sudden, severe emotional or physical stress, including an illness . Many risk factors may lead to the development of plaque buildup and a heart attack.", "Treatment": "IMMEDIATE TREATMENT You will be hooked up to a heart monitor, so the health care team can look at how your heart is beating., You will receive oxygen so that your heart doesn't have to work as hard., An intravenous line (IV) will be placed into one of your veins. Medicines and fluids pass through this IV., You may get nitroglycerin and morphine to help reduce chest pain., You may receive aspirin, unless it would not be safe for you. In that case, you will be given another medicine that prevents blood clots., Dangerous abnormal heartbeats (arrhythmias) may be treated with medicine or electric shocks. . EMERGENCY PROCEDURES Angioplasty is a procedure to open narrowed or blocked blood vessels that supply blood to the heart. Angioplasty is often the first choice of treatment. It should be done within 90 minutes after you get to the hospital, and usually no later than 12 hours after a heart attack., A stent is a small, metal mesh tube that opens up (expands) inside a coronary artery. A stent is\u00a0usually placed after or during angioplasty. It helps prevent the artery from closing up again. . You may be given drugs to break up the clot. It is best if these drugs are given within 3 hours of when you first felt the chest pain. This is called thrombolytic therapy.Some patients may also have heart bypass surgery to open narrowed or blocked blood vessels that supply blood to the heart. This procedure is also called coronary artery bypass grafting and/or open heart surgery.TREATMENT AFTER A HEART ATTACKAfter several days, you will be discharged from the hospital.You will likely need to take medicines, some for the rest of your life. Always talk to your health care provider before stopping or changing how you take any medicines. Stopping certain medications can be deadly. While under the care of your health care team, you will learn:How to take medicines to treat your heart problem and prevent more heart attacks, How to eat a heart-healthy diet, How to be active and exercise safely, What to do when you have chest pain, How to stop smoking . Strong emotions are common after a heart attack.You may feel sad, You may feel anxious and worry about being careful about everything you do . All of these feelings are normal. They go away for most people after 2 or 3 weeks.You may also feel tired when you leave the hospital to go home.Most people who have had a heart attack take part in a cardiac rehabilitation program."}, "Heimlich maneuver on self": {"description": "See also: Choking first aid"}, "Hypochromia": {"description": "The cause of hypochromia should be evaluated by your health care provider."}, "Hymenolepiasis": {"description": "Hymenolepiasis is infestation by one of two species of tapeworm: Hymenolepis nana or Hymenolepis diminuta.", "Possible Complications": "Abdominal discomfort, Dehydration from prolonged diarrhea. ", "Symptoms": ["Diarrhea", "Gastrointestinal discomfort", "Itchy anus", "Poor appetite", "Weakness"], "Exams and Tests": "Examination of the stool for eggs confirms the diagnosis.", "Treatment": "The treatment for this condition is a single dose of praziquantel, repeated in 10 days.", "Prevention": "Good hygiene, public health and sanitation programs, and elimination of rats help prevent the spread of hymenolepiasis.", "Causes": "Hymenolepis live in warm climates and are common in the southern United States. Insects eat the eggs of these worms.Humans and other animals become infected when they intentionally or unintentionally eat material contaminated by insects (including fleas associated with rats). In an infected person, it is possible for the worm's entire life cycle to be completed in the bowel, so infection can last for years.Hymenolepis nana infections are much more common than Hymenolepis diminuta infections in humans. These infections used to be common in the southeastern United States, in crowded environments and in people who were confined to institutions. However, the disease occurs throughout the world."}, "Heart failure - home monitoring": {"description": "These are signs that there is too much fluid building up in your body. You will need to learn how to limit your fluids and salt intake to prevent these things from happening."}, "Hormone levels": {"description": "Blood or urine tests can determine the levels of various hormones in the body. This includes reproductive hormones, thyroid hormones, adrenal hormones, pituitary hormones, and many others. For more information, see:"}, "Hiccups": {"description": "A hiccup is an unintentional movement (spasm) of the diaphragm, the muscle at the base of the lungs. The spasm is followed by quick closing of the vocal cords, which produces a distinctive sound.", "Causes": "Abdominal surgery, Disease or disorder that irritates the nerves that control the diaphragm (such as pleurisy or pneumonia), Hot and spicy foods or liquids, Harmful fumes, Stroke or tumor affecting the brain. There may be no obvious cause for hiccups."}, "Heartburn": {"description": "Heartburn is a painful burning feeling just below or behind the breastbone. Most of the time it comes from the esophagus. The pain often rises in your chest from your stomach and may spread to your neck or throat.", "Causes": "Almost everyone has heartburn sometimes. If you have heartburn very often, you may have gastroesophageal reflux disease (GERD).Normally when food or liquid enters your stomach, a band of muscle at the end of your esophagus closes off the esophagus. This band is called the lower esophageal sphincter (LES). If this band does not close tightly enough, food or stomach acid can back up (reflux) into the esophagus. The stomach contents can irritate the esophagus and cause heartburn and other symptoms.Watch this video about:HeartburnHeartburn is more likely if you have a hiatal hernia. A hiatal hernia is a conditions which occurs when the top part of the stomach pokes into the chest cavity. This weakens the LES so that it is easier for acid to back up from the stomach into the esophagus.Pregnancy and many medications can bring on heartburn or make it worse.Medicines that can cause heartburn include:Anticholinergics (e.g., for sea sickness), Beta-blockers for high blood pressure or heart disease, Calcium channel blockers for high blood pressure, Dopamine-like drugs for Parkinson's disease, Progestin for abnormal menstrual bleeding or birth control, Sedatives for anxiety or sleep problems (insomnia), Theophylline (for asthma or other lung diseases), Tricyclic antidepressants. Talk to your doctor if you think one of your medicines may be causing heartburn. Never change or stop taking medicine without talking to your doctor first."}, "Heel pain": {"Prevention": "Maintaining flexible and strong muscles in your calves, ankles, and feet can help prevent some types of heel pain. Always stretch and warm-up before exercising.Wear comfortable, properly fitting shoes with good arch support and cushioning. Make sure there is enough room for your toes.", "description": "Pain - heel", "Causes": "Heel pain is most often the result of overuse. Rarely, it may be caused by an injury.Your heel may become tender or swollen from:Shoes with poor support or shock absorption, Running on hard surfaces, like concrete, Running too often, Tightness in your calf muscle or the Achilles tendon, Sudden inward or outward turning of your heel, Landing hard or awkwardly on the heel . Conditions that may cause heel pain include:When the tendon that connects the back of your leg to your heel becomes swollen and painful near the bottom of the foot , Swelling of the fluid-filled sac (bursa) at the back of the heel bone under the Achilles tendon (bursitis), Bone spurs in the heel, Swelling of the thick band of tissue on the bottom of your foot (plantar fasciitis), Fracture of the heel bone that is related to landing very hard on your heel from a fall (calcaneus fracture). "}, "H2 blockers": {"description": "H2 blockers are medicines that work by reducing the amount of stomach acid secreted by glands in the lining of your stomach."}, "Helping your teen with depression": {"description": "Your teen\u2019s depression may be treated with talk therapy, anti-depression medicines, or a combination of these things.\u00a0Learn about what is available for your teen and what you can do at home to help your teen. "}, "Head lice": {"description": "Lice can be spread by close contact with other people.", "Possible Complications": "Some people will develop a skin infection from scratching. Antihistamines can help ease itching.", "Symptoms": ["Very bad itching of the scalp", "Small, red bumps on the scalp, neck, and shoulders (bumps may become crusty and ooze)", "Tiny white specks (eggs, or nits) on the bottom of each hair that are hard to get off "], "Exams and Tests": "Head lice can be hard to see. You need to look closely. Use disposable gloves and look at the person's head under a bright light. Full sun or the brightest lights in your home during daylight hours work well. A magnifying glass can help.To look for head lice:Part the hair all the way down to the scalp in very small sections, Examine the scalp and hair for moving lice and eggs (nits), Look at the whole head this way, Look closely around the top of the neck and ears (the most common locations for eggs). Both children and adults should be treated right away if any lice or eggs are found.", "Treatment": "Lotions and shampoos containing 1% permethrin (Nix) often work well. You can buy these medicines at the store without a prescription. If these products do not work, a doctor can give you a prescription for stronger medicine. Always use the medicines exactly as directed. Using them too often or in the wrong way can cause side effects.To use the medicine shampoo:Rinse and dry the hair.\r\n  , Apply the medicine to the hair and scalp.\r\n  , Wait 10 minutes, then rinse it off.\r\n  , Check for lice and nits again in 8 to 12 hours.\r\n  , If you find active lice, talk to your health care provider before doing another treatment.\r\n  . You also need to get rid of the lice eggs (nits) to keep lice from coming back.To get rid of nits:You can use products that make the nits easier to remove. Some dishwashing detergents can help dissolve the \"glue\" that makes the nits stick to the hair shaft.\r\n  , Remove the eggs with a nit comb. Before doing this, rub olive oil in the hair or run the metal comb through beeswax. This helps make the nits easier to remove.\r\n  , Metal combs with very fine teeth are stronger and work better than plastic nit combs. These metal combs are easier to find in pet stores or on the Internet.\r\n  , Comb for nits again in 7 to 10 days.\r\n  . When treating lice, wash all clothes and bed linens in hot water with detergent. This also helps prevent head lice from spreading to others during the short period when head lice can survive off the human body.Ask your health care provider if people who share bedding or clothes with the person who has head lice need to be treated as well.", "Prevention": "Never share hair brushes, combs, hair pieces, hats, bedding, towels, or clothing with someone who has head lice.If your child has lice, be sure to check policies at schools and daycare. Many places do not allow infected children to be at school until the lice have been completely treated.Some schools may have policies to make sure the environment is clear of lice. Cleaning of carpets and other surfaces often helps prevent spread of all types of infections, including head lice.", "Causes": "Head lice infect hair on the head. Tiny eggs on the hair look like flakes of dandruff. However, instead of flaking off the scalp, they stay in place.Head lice can live up to 30 days on a human. Their eggs can live for more than 2 weeks.Head lice spread easily, particularly among school children. Head lice are more common in close, overcrowded living conditions.You can get head lice if you:Come in close contact with a person who has lice, Touch the clothing or bedding of someone who has lice, Share hats, towels, brushes, or combs of someone who has lice . Having head lice causes intense itching, but does not lead to serious medical problems. Unlike body lice, head lice never carry or spread diseases.Having head lice does NOT mean the person has poor hygiene or low social status."}, "Hyperimmunization": {"description": "Hyperimmunization is the presence of a larger than normal number of antibodies to a specific antigen. This creates a state of immunity greater than normal. Immune system overactivity can cause many different diseases."}, "Heart murmurs and other sounds": {"description": "A heart murmur is a blowing, whooshing, or rasping sound heard during a heartbeat. The sound is caused by turbulent (rough) blood flow through the heart valves or near the heart.", "Causes": "Many heart murmurs are harmless. These types of murmurs are called innocent murmurs. They will not cause any symptoms or problems. Innocent murmurs do not need treatment.Other heart murmurs may indicate an abnormality in the heart. These abnormal murmurs can be caused by:Problems of the aortic valve (aortic regurgitation, aortic stenosis), Problems of the mitral valve (chronic or acute mitral regurgitation, mitral stenosis), Hypertrophic cardiomyopathy (idiopathic hypertrophic subaortic stenosis), Pulmonary regurgitation (backflow of blood into the right ventricle, caused by failure of the pulmonary valve to close completely), Pulmonary valve stenosis, Problems of the tricuspid valve (tricuspid regurgitation, tricuspid stenosis) . Significant murmurs in children are more likely to be caused by:Anomalous pulmonary venous return (an abnormal formation of the pulmonary veins), Atrial septal defect (ASD), Coarctation of the aorta, Patent ductus arteriosus (PDA), Ventricular septal defect (VSD) . Multiple murmurs may result from a combination of heart problems. Children often have murmurs as a normal part of development. These murmurs do not need treatment. They may include:Pulmonary flow murmurs, Still's murmur, Venous hum . "}, "Hemoglobin": {"description": "The hemoglobin test is a blood test that measures how much hemoglobin is your blood. Hemoglobin is a protein in red blood cells that carries oxygen. "}, "Hydrocele": {"description": "A hydrocele is a fluid-filled sack in the scrotum.", "Possible Complications": "Risks from hydrocele surgery may include:Blood clots, Infection, Injury to the scrotum. ", "Symptoms": [], "Exams and Tests": "You will have a physical exam. The health care provider will find that the scrotum is swollen but not painful to the touch. Often, the testicle cannot be felt because of the fluid around it. The size of the fluid-filled sack can sometimes be increased and decreased by putting pressure on the abdomen or the scrotum.If the size of the fluid collection changes, it is more likely to be due to an inguinal hernia.Hydroceles can be easily seen by shining a flashlight through the swollen part of the scrotum. If the scrotum is full of clear fluid, the scrotum will light up.You may need an ultrasound to confirm the diagnosis.", "Treatment": "Hydroceles are not harmful most of the time. They are treated only when they cause infection or discomfort.Hydroceles from an inguinal hernia should be fixed with surgery as soon as possible. Hydroceles that do not go away on their own after a few months may need surgery. A surgical procedure called a hydrocelectomy (removal of sac lining) is often done to correct the problem. Needle drainage does not work well because the fluid will come back. ", "Causes": "Hydroceles are common in newborn infants.During a baby\u2019s development in the womb, the testicles descend from the abdomen through tube into the scrotum. Hydroceles occur when this tube does not close. Fluid drains from the abdomen through the open tube and gets trapped in the scrotum. This causes the scrotum to swell.Most hydroceles go away a few months after birth. Sometimes, a hydrocele may occur with an inguinal hernia.Hydroceles may also be caused by:Buildup of the normal fluid around the testicle. This may occur because the body makes too much of the fluid or it does not drain well. (This type of hydrocele is more common in older men.), Inflammation or injury of the testicle or epididymis. "}, "Heart disease and diet": {"description": "A healthy diet is a major factor in reducing your risk of heart disease."}, "High blood pressure and diet": {"description": "Check with your doctor before you increase the potassium in your diet or use salt substitutes (which often contain potassium). People who have kidney problems or who take certain medicines must be careful about how much potassium they consume."}, "Hyperbaric oxygen therapy": {"description": "Hyperbaric oxygen therapy uses a special pressure chamber to increase the amount of oxygen in the blood."}, "Hypersplenism": {"Symptoms": ["Enlarged spleen", "Low level of one or more types of blood cells", "Feeling full too soon after eating", "Stomach pain on the left side"], "description": "The spleen plays a key role in helping your body fight infections. Problems with the spleen can make you more likely to develop infections.", "Causes": "Hypersplenism can be caused by:Cirrhosis, Lymphoma, Malaria, Tuberculosis, Various connective tissue and inflammatory diseases. "}, "Heart failure - surgeries and devices": {"description": "The main treatments for heart failure are making lifestyle changes and taking your medicines. However, there are procedures and surgeries that may help."}, "Healthy food trends -- flaxseeds": {"description": "Flaxseed oil comes from pressed flax seeds."}, "Hereditary elliptocytosis": {"description": "See also:", "Possible Complications": "Elliptocytosis is\u00a0often\u00a0harmless. In mild cases, fewer than 15% of red blood cells are elliptical-shaped. However, some people may have crises in which the red blood cells rupture, especially if they have a viral infection. Persons with this disease can develop anemia, jaundice, and gallstones. ", "Symptoms": ["Fatigue", "Shortness of breath", "Yellow skin and eyes (jaundice) - may continue for a long time in a newborn"], "Exams and Tests": "An exam by your health care provider may show an enlarged spleen.The following test results may help diagnose the condition:Bilirubin level may be high., Blood smear may show elliptical red blood cells., Complete blood count (CBC) may show anemia or signs of red blood cell destruction., Lactate dehydrogenase level may be high., Ultrasound of the gallbladder may show gallstones.. ", "Treatment": "There is no treatment needed for the disorder unless severe anemia or anemia symptoms occur. Surgery to remove the spleen may decrease the rate of red blood cell damage.", "Prevention": "Genetic counseling may be appropriate for persons with a family history of this disease who wish to become parents. ", "Causes": "Elliptocytosis affects about 1 in every 2,500 people of northern European heritage. It is more common in people of African and Mediterranean descent. You are more likely to develop this condition if someone in your family has had it."}, "Heart pacemaker - discharge": {"description": "You should know what type of pacemaker you have."}, "Holter monitor (24h)": {"description": "A Holter monitor is a machine that continuously records the heart's rhythms. The monitor is worn for 24 - 48 hours during normal activity."}, "Hyperemesis gravidarum": {"description": "Hyperemesis gravidarum is extreme, persistent nausea and vomiting during pregnancy. It can lead to dehydration, weight loss, and electrolyte imbalances.", "Possible Complications": "Too much vomiting is harmful because it leads to dehydration and poor weight gain during pregnancy.Social or psychological problems may be associated with this disorder of pregnancy. If these problems exist, your health care provider needs to identify and take care of them.", "Symptoms": ["Severe, persistent nausea during pregnancy, often leading to weight loss", "Light-headedness, weakness, headaches, or fainting", "Constipation "], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will do a physical exam. Your blood pressure may be low. Your pulse may be high.The following laboratory tests will be done to check for signs of dehydration:Complete blood count, Electrolytes, Urine ketones. Your provider may need to run tests to make sure you do not have liver and gastrointestinal problems.A pregnancy ultrasound will be done to see if you are carrying twins or more babies. Ultrasound also checks for a hydatidiform mole.", "Treatment": "Eating small, frequent meals and dry foods such as crackers may help relieve uncomplicated nausea.Drink plenty of fluids. Increase fluids during times of the day when you feel least nauseated. Seltzer, ginger ale, or other sparkling waters may help.Vitamin B6 (no more than 100 mg daily) has been shown to decrease nausea in early pregnancy. Ask your health care provider if this vitamin might help you. Another medicine called doxylamine (Unisom) has been shown to be very effective and safe when combined with Vitamin B6 for nausea in pregnancy. You can buy this medicine without a prescription.If your nausea and vomiting is so severe that you and your baby might be in danger, your doctor will prescribe anti-nausea medicine. If your case is very severe, you will likely be admitted to the hospital. There, you will get fluids through an IV.", "Causes": "Most women have some nausea or vomiting (morning sickness), particularly during the first 3 months of pregnancy. The cause of nausea and vomiting during pregnancy is believed to be a rapidly rising blood level of a hormone called human chorionic gonadotropin (HCG). HCG is released by the placenta.Some women have extreme nausea and vomiting during pregnancy. This can happen in any pregnancy, but is a little more likely if you are pregnant with twins (or more babies), or if you have a hydatidiform mole."}, "Hammer toe repair - discharge": {"description": "\r\n\r\n \r\nYou had surgery to repair your hammer toe."}, "Hypothalamic tumor": {"description": "A hypothalamic tumor is an abnormal growth in the hypothalamus gland, which is located in the brain.", "Possible Complications": "Complications of brain surgery may include:Bleeding, Brain damage, Death (rarely), Infection. Seizures can result from the tumor or from any surgical procedure on the brain.Hydrocephalus can occur with some tumors and can require surgery or a catheter placed in the brain to reduce spinal fluid pressure.Risks of radiation therapy include damage to healthy brain cells when tumor cells are destroyed.Common side effects from chemotherapy include loss of appetite, nausea and vomiting, and fatigue.", "Symptoms": ["Euphoric \"high\" sensations", "Failure to thrive (lack of normal growth in children)", "Headache", "Hyperactivity", "Loss of body fat and appetite (cachexia)"], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider may see signs of a hypothalamic tumor during a regular checkup. He or she will perform a brain and nervous system (neurological) exam, including tests of visual function. Blood tests for hormone imbalances may also be done.Depending on the results of the examination and blood tests, a CT scan or MRI scan can determine whether you have a hypothalamic tumor.Visual field testing may be done to check for vision loss, and to determine whether the condition is improving or getting worse.", "Treatment": "The treatment depends on how aggressive the tumor is, and whether it is a glioma or another type of cancer. Treatment may involve combinations of surgery, radiation, and chemotherapy.Special radiation treatments can be focused on the tumor. They can be as effective as surgery, with less risk to surrounding tissue. Brain swelling caused by a tumor may need to be treated with steroids.Hypothalamic tumors may produce hormones or affect hormone production, leading to imbalances that may need to be corrected. In some cases, hormones may need to be replaced or reduced.", "Causes": "The exact cause of hypothalamic tumors is not known. It is likely that they result from a combination of genetic and environmental factors.In children, most hypothalamic tumors are gliomas. Gliomas are a common type of brain tumor that results from the abnormal growth of glial cells, which support nerve cells. Gliomas can occur at any age, but they are often more aggressive in adults than in children.In adults, tumors in the hypothalamus are more likely cancer that has spread from another organ.People with neurofibromatosis (a hereditary condition) are at increased risk for this type of tumor. People who have undergone radiation therapy are at increased risk for developing tumors in general."}, "Hypothalamic dysfunction": {"description": "Hypothalamic dysfunction is a problem with part of the brain called the hypothalamus. The hypothalamus helps control the pituitary gland and regulates many body functions.", "Possible Complications": "Complications of hypothalamic dysfunction depend on the cause.Brain tumors:Permanent blindness, Problems related to the brain area where the tumor occurs, Vision disorders. Hypothyroidism:Heart problems, High cholesterol. Adrenal insufficiency:Inability to deal with stress (such as surgery or infection), which can be life-threatening by causing low blood pressure. Gonadal deficiency:Heart disease, Impotence (in men), Infertility, Thin bones (osteoporosis). Growth hormone deficiency:High cholesterol, Osteoporosis, Short stature (in children), Weakness. ", "Symptoms": ["Lowered function of sexual hormones (hypogonadism)", "Inability to smell"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will perform a physical examination and ask about your symptoms.Blood or urine tests may be ordered to determine levels of hormones such as:Cortisol, Estrogen, Growth hormone, Pituitary hormones, Prolactin, Testosterone, Thyroid. Other possible tests include:Hormone injections followed by timed blood samples, MRI or CT scans of the brain, Visual field eye exam (if there is a tumor) . ", "Treatment": "Treatment depends on the cause of the hypothalamic dysfunction:For tumors, surgery or radiation may be needed., For hormonal deficiencies, missing hormones need to be replaced by taking medicine. . ", "Prevention": "If you believe you have an eating disorder, such as anorexia or bulimia, get medical attention. These conditions can be life-threatening.If you have symptoms of a hormonal deficiency, discuss replacement therapy with your health care provider.", "Causes": "The hypothalamus helps control the pituitary gland, particularly in response to stress. The pituitary, in turn, controls the:Adrenal glands, Ovaries, Testes, Thyroid gland. The hypothalamus also helps regulate:Body temperature, Childbirth, Emotions, Growth, Milk production, Salt and water balance, Sleep, Weight and appetite. The most common causes of hypothalamic dysfunction are surgery, trauma (injury), tumors, and radiation.Other causes include:Anorexia nervosa or bulimia, Bleeding, Genetic disorders that cause iron buildup in the body, Head trauma, Infections and swelling (inflammation), Malnutrition. "}, "His bundle electrography": {"description": "His bundle electrography is a test that measures electrical activity in a part of the heart that carries the signals that control the time between heartbeats (contractions)."}, "Haptoglobin blood test": {"description": "Haptoglobin is a protein produced by the liver. It attaches to a certain type of hemoglobin in the blood."}, "Heart failure - medicines": {"description": "Most people who have heart failure need to take medicines. Some of these medicines are used to treat your symptoms. Others may help prevent your heart failure from becoming worse and let you live longer."}, "Hypertensive heart disease": {"Prevention": "Because there are often no symptoms with high blood pressure, people can have the condition without knowing it. Symptoms most often occur after many years of poor blood pressure control.\u00a0Symptoms may also\u00a0occur if blood pressure suddenly rises to an extreme level. Diagnosing high blood pressure early can help prevent heart disease, stroke, eye problems, and chronic kidney disease.The 2007 United States Preventive Services Task Force (USPSTF) guidelines on screening for high blood pressure recommend that all adults be screened:Every 2 years, if blood pressure was less than 120/80 mmHg at the most recent reading, Once a year if blood pressure was 120 - 139/80 - 89 mmHg . Your doctor may recommend more frequent screenings based on your blood pressure levels and other health conditions.If your blood pressure is high, you need to lower it and keep it under control.Do not stop or change high blood pressure medicines without talking to your doctor., Carefully control diabetes and high cholesterol. . ", "description": "Hypertensive heart disease refers to heart problems that occur because of high blood pressure. These problems include: ", "Causes": "High blood pressure means the pressure inside the blood vessels (called arteries) is too high. As the heart pumps against this pressure, it must work harder. Over time, this causes the heart muscle to thicken.Without treatment, symptoms of heart failure may develop. Sometimes, the muscle can be so thick that it does not get enough oxygen. This can cause angina (chest pain).High blood pressure also leads to thickening of the blood vessel walls. When combined with cholesterol deposits in the blood vessels, the risk of heart attack and stroke increases.Hypertensive heart disease is the leading cause of illness and death from high blood pressure."}, "Hormonal effects in newborns": {"description": "Hormonal effects in newborns occur because, while they are in the womb, babies are exposed to many chemicals (hormones) present in the mother's bloodstream. After birth, the infants are no longer exposed to these hormones. This exposure may cause temporary conditions in a newborn."}, "Hair bleach poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain", "Blurred vision", "Breathing difficulty", "Burning pain in the throat", "Burns to the eye", "Collapse", "Coma (decreased level of consciousness and lack of responsiveness)", "Diarrhea (watery, bloody)", "Low blood pressure", "Inability to walk in a normal manner", "No urine output", "Rash", "Slurred speech", "Stupor", "Vomiting"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Huntington disease": {"description": "Huntington disease is a disorder in which nerve cells in certain parts of the brain waste away, or degenerate. The disease is passed down through families.", "Symptoms": ["Behavioral disturbances", "Hallucinations", "Irritability", "Moodiness", "Restlessness or fidgeting", "Paranoia", "Psychosis", "Facial movements, including grimaces", "Head turning to shift eye position", "Quick, sudden, sometimes wild jerking movements of the arms, legs, face, and other body parts", "Slow, uncontrolled movements", "Unsteady gait", "Disorientation or confusion", "Loss of judgment", "Loss of memory", "Personality changes", "Speech changes", "Anxiety, stress, and tension", " \r\n Difficulty swallowing \r\n ", "Speech impairment", "Rigidity", "Slow movements", "Tremor"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will perform a physical exam and may ask about the patient's family history and symptoms. An exam of the nervous system will also be done. The doctor may see signs of:Dementia, Abnormal movements, Abnormal reflexes, \"Prancing\" and wide walk, Hesitant speech or poor enunciation. Other tests that may show signs of Huntington disease include:\r\n  Psychological testing, Head CT or MRI scan\r\n  , PET (isotope) scan of the brain. Genetic testing\u00a0is available to determine whether a person carries the gene for Huntington disease.", "Causes": "Huntington disease is caused by a genetic defect on chromosome 4. The defect causes a part of DNA, called a CAG repeat, to occur many more times than it is supposed to. Normally, this section of DNA is repeated 10 to 28 times. But in persons with Huntington disease, it is repeated 36 to 120 times.As the gene is passed down through families, the number of repeats tend to get larger. The larger the number of repeats, the\u00a0higher your chance of developing symptoms at an earlier age. Therefore, as the disease is passed along in families, symptoms develop at younger and younger ages.There are two forms of Huntington disease.Adult-onset Huntington disease is the most common. Persons with this form usually develop symptoms in their mid 30s and 40s., Early-onset Huntington disease affects a small number of cases and begins in childhood or the teens.. If one of your parents has Huntington disease, you have a 50% chance of getting the gene. If you get the gene from your parents, you can also pass it on to your children, who will also have a 50% change of getting the gene.\u00a0If you do not get the gene from your parents, you cannot pass the gene on to your children.\u00a0", "Prevention": "Genetic counseling is advised if there is a family history of Huntington disease. Experts also recommend genetic counseling for couples with a family history of this disease who are considering having children.", "Treatment": "There is no cure for Huntington disease. There is no known way to stop the disease from getting worse. The goal of treatment is to slow the symptoms and help the person function for as long as possible.Medicines can be prescribed, depending on the symptoms.Dopamine blockers may help reduce abnormal behaviors and movements., Drugs such as amantadine and tetrabenazine are used to try to control extra movements.. Depression and suicide are common among persons with Huntington disease. It is important for caregivers\u00a0to monitor for symptoms and seek medical help for\u00a0the person right away.As the disease progresses, the person will need assistance and supervision, and may eventually need 24-hour care."}, "Hysterectomy - vaginal - discharge ": {"description": "Part or all of your uterus was removed. Your fallopian tubes or ovaries may have also been removed. You probably spent 1 - 2 nights in the hospital."}, "Hurler syndrome": {"description": "See also:", "Symptoms": ["Abnormal bones in the spine", "Claw hand", "Cloudy corneas", "Deafness", "Halted growth", "Heart valve problems", "Joint disease, including stiffness", "Intellectual disability that gets worse over time", "Thick, coarse facial features with low nasal bridge"], "Exams and Tests": "EKG, Genetic testing for\u00a0changes (mutations) to the alpha-L-iduronidase (IDUA) gene, Urine tests for extra mucopolysaccharides, X-ray of the spine. ", "Causes": "Persons with Hurler syndrome do not make a substance called lysosomal alpha-L-iduronidase. This substance, called an enzyme, helps break down long chains of sugar molecules called glycosaminoglycans (formerly called mucopolysaccharides). These molecules are found throughout the body, often in mucus and in fluid around the joints.Without the enzyme, glycosaminoglycans build up and damage organs, including the heart. Symptoms can range from mild to severe.Hurler syndrome is inherited, which means that your parents must pass the disease on to you. If both parents carry the defective gene related to this condition, each of their children has a 25% chance of developing the disease.Hurler syndrome is a type of mucopolysaccharidosis called MPS I. Hurler syndrome is the most severe type. It is categorized as MPS I H.The other subtypes of MPS I are:MPS I H-S (Hurler-Scheie syndrome), MPS I S (Scheie syndrome). ", "Prevention": "Experts recommend genetic counseling and testing for couples with a family history of Hurler syndrome who are considering having children. Prenatal testing is available.", "Treatment": "Enzyme replacement therapy for Hurler syndrome adds a working form of the missing enzyme to the body.\u00a0The medication, called laronidase (Aldurazyme), is given through a vein (intravenously). Talk to your doctor for more information.Bone marrow transplant has been used in several patients with this condition. The treatment has had mixed results.Other treatments depend on the organs that are affected."}, "Heroin overdose": {"Symptoms": ["No breathing", "Shallow breathing", "Slow and difficult breathing", "Dry mouth", "Extremely small pupils, sometimes as small as the head of a pin (\"pinpoint pupils\")", "Tongue discoloration", "Low blood pressure", "Weak pulse", "Bluish-colored nails and lips", "Constipation", "Spasms of the stomach and intestinal tract", "Coma", "Delirium", "Disorientation", "Drowsiness", "Muscle spasticity"], "description": "This is for information only, and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Histoplasma complement fixation": {"description": "Histoplasma complement fixation is a blood test that checks for infection due to a fungus called Histoplasma capsulatum (H. capsulatum), which\u00a0causes the\u00a0disease histoplasmosis."}, "Hemorrhagic": {"description": "See also:"}, "Hyphema": {"description": "Hyphema is blood in the front area (anterior chamber) of the eye. The blood collects behind the cornea and in front of the iris.", "Possible Complications": "Acute glaucoma, Impaired vision, Recurring bleeding. ", "Symptoms": ["Bleeding in the anterior chamber of the eye", "Eye pain", "Light sensitivity", "Vision abnormalities"], "Exams and Tests": "Eye exam, Intraocular pressure measurement (tonometry), Ultrasound testing. ", "Treatment": "Treatment may not be needed in mild cases. The blood is absorbed in a few days.If bleeding comes back (usually in 3 - 5 days), the likely outcome of\u00a0the condition will be much worse. The health care provider may recommend the following to cut down the chance that there will be more bleeding:Bed rest, Eye patching, Sedating medicines. You may need to use eye drops to decrease the inflammation or lower the pressure in your eye.\u00a0The eye doctor may need to remove the blood, especially if pressure in the eye is very high\u00a0the blood is slow to absorb again. You may need to stay in a hospital.", "Prevention": "Many eye injuries can be prevented by wearing safety goggles or other protective eye wear. Always wear eye protection while playing sports such as racquetball, or contact sports such as basketball.", "Causes": "Hyphema is usually caused by trauma to the eye. Other causes of bleeding in the front chamber of the eye include:Blood vessel abnormality, Cancer of the eye, Severe inflammation of the iris, Advanced diabetes, Blood\u00a0disorders\u00a0such as sickle cell anemia. "}, "Heart pacemaker": {"description": "A pacemaker is a small, battery-operated device that senses when your heart is beating irregularly or too slowly. It sends a signal to your heart that makes your heart beat at the correct pace."}, "Hydramnios": {"description": "\r\n\r\n \r\nHydramniosis a condition that occurs when too much amniotic fluid builds up during pregnancy. It is also called amniotic fluid disorder, or polyhydramnios.\r\n"}, "Hip joint replacement": {"description": "Hip joint replacement is surgery to replace all or part of the hip joint with a man-made joint. The artificial joint is called a prosthesis."}, "Hyponatremia": {"description": "Hyponatremia is a\u00a0condition in which the amount of sodium (salt) in the\u00a0blood is lower than normal.\u00a0", "Possible Complications": "\r\n \r\nIn severe cases, hyponatremia can lead to:Decreased consciousness, hallucinations or coma, Brain herniation, Death. ", "Symptoms": ["Confusion", "Convulsions", "Fatigue", "Headache", "Irritability", "Loss of appetite", "Muscle spasms or cramps", "Muscle weakness", "Nausea", "Restlessness", "Vomiting"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a complete physical examination to help determine the cause of your symptoms. Blood and urine tests will be done.The following laboratory tests can confirm and help diagnose hyponatremia:Comprehensive metabolic panel (includes blood sodium), Osmolality blood test, Urine osmolality, Urine sodium. ", "Treatment": "The cause of hyponatremia must be diagnosed and treated. If cancer\u00a0is the\u00a0cause of the condition, radiation, chemotherapy, or surgery to remove the tumor may correct the sodium imbalance.Other treatments depend on the specific type of hyponatremia.Treatments may include:Fluids through a vein (IV), Medication to relieve symptoms, Water restriction. ", "Prevention": "Treating the condition that is causing hyponatremia can help. If you play sports, drink fluids such as sports drinks\u00a0that contain electrolytes. Drinking only water while you\u00a0are active\u00a0can lead to acute hyponatremia.", "Causes": " \r\n Sodium is found mostly in the body fluids outside the cells. It is very important for maintaining blood pressure. Sodium is also needed for nerves, muscles, and other body tissues\u00a0to work properly.When the amount of sodium in fluids outside cells drops, water moves into the cells to balance the levels. This causes the cells to swell with too much water. Brain cells are especially sensitive to swelling, and this causes\u00a0many of the symptoms of hyponatremia.In hyponatremia, the imbalance of water to salt is caused by one of three conditions:Euvolemic hyponatremia -- total body water increases, but the body's sodium content stays the same, Hypervolemic hyponatremia -- both sodium and water content in the body increase, but the water gain is greater, Hypovolemic hyponatremia -- water and sodium are both lost from the body, but the sodium loss is greater. Hyponatremia can be caused by:Burns that affect a large area of the body\r\n \u00a0\u00a0\u00a0\u00a0\u00a0\u00a0\u00a0 , Diarrhea, Diuretic medicines, which increase urine output, Heart failure, Kidney diseases, Liver cirrhosis, Syndrome of inappropriate antidiuretic hormone secretion (SIADH), Sweating, Vomiting. "}, "Hair loss": {"description": "Partial or complete loss of hair is called alopecia.", "Causes": "HeredityBoth men and women tend to lose hair thickness and amount as they age. This type of baldness is not usually caused by a disease. It is related to aging, heredity, and changes in the hormone testosterone. Inherited, or pattern baldness, affects many more men than women. Those with inherited hair loss show signs of hair loss before age 40. About half of all men show signs of hair loss by age 50.Physical or Emotional StressPhysical or emotional stress may cause one-half to three-quarters of scalp hair to shed. This kind of hair loss is\u00a0called Telogen effluvium. Hair tends to come out in handfuls while you shampoo, comb, or run your hands through your hair. You may not notice this for weeks to months after the episode of stress. Hair shedding decreases over 6\u00a0to 8 months. Telogen effluvium is usually temporary. But it can become long-term (chronic).Causes of this type of hair loss are:High fever or severe infection, Childbirth, Major surgery, major illness, sudden blood loss, Severe emotional stress, Crash diets, especially those that do not contain enough protein, Medications, including retinoids, birth control pills, beta-blockers, calcium channel blockers, certain antidepressants, NSAIDs (including ibuprofen). . Some women ages 30\u00a0to 60 may notice a thinning of the hair that affects the entire scalp. The hair loss may be heavier at first, and then gradually slow or stop. There is no known cause for this type of telogen effluvium.Others CausesOther causes of hair loss, especially if it is in an unusual pattern, include:Alopecia areata\u00a0(bald patches on the scalp, beard, and, possibly, eyebrows; eyelashes may fall out)., Anemia, Autoimmune conditions such as lupus, Burns, Certain infectious diseases such as syphilis, Excessive shampooing and blow-drying, Hormone changes, Thyroid diseases, Nervous habits such as continual hair pulling or scalp rubbing, Radiation therapy, Tinea capitis (ringworm of the scalp), Tumor of the ovary or adrenal glands. "}, "Hemophilia - resources": {"description": "The following organizations provide further information on hemophilia:"}, "Hepatitis A": {"description": "Hepatitis A is inflammation (irritation and swelling) of the liver from the hepatitis A virus.", "Symptoms": ["Dark urine", "Fatigue", "Itching", "Loss of appetite", "Low-grade fever", "Nausea and vomiting", "Pale or clay-colored stools", "Yellow skin (jaundice) "], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a physical exam, which may show that your liver is enlarged and tender.Blood tests may show:Raised IgM and IgG antibodies to hepatitis A (IgM is usually positive before IgG), Elevated liver enzymes (liver function tests), especially transaminase enzyme levels . ", "Causes": "The hepatitis A virus is found mostly in the stools and blood of an infected person. The virus is present about 15 to 45 days before symptoms occur and during the first week of illness.You can catch hepatitis A if:You eat or drink food or water that has been contaminated by stools (feces) containing the hepatitis A virus. Fruits, vegetables, shellfish, ice, and water are common sources of the disease., You come in contact with the stool or blood of a person who currently has the disease., A person with hepatitis A passes the virus to an object or food due to poor hand-washing after using the bathroom., You take part in sexual practices that involve oral-anal contact. . Not everyone has symptoms with hepatitis A infection. Therefore, many more people are infected than are diagnosed or reported. Risk factors include: Overseas travel, especially to Asia or South or Central America, IV drug use, Living in a nursing home center, Working in a health care, food, or sewage industry . Other common hepatitis virus infections include hepatitis B and hepatitis C. Hepatitis A is the least serious and mildest of these diseases.", "Prevention": "The following tips can help reduce your risk of spreading or catching the virus:Always wash your hands well after using the restroom, and when you come in contact with an infected person's blood, stools, or other bodily fluid., Avoid unclean food and water. . The virus may spread more rapidly through day care centers and other places where people are in close contact. Thorough hand washing before and after each diaper change, before serving food, and after using the restroom may help prevent such outbreaks.Ask your provider about getting either immune globulin or the hepatitis A vaccine if you are exposed to the disease and have not had hepatitis A or the hepatitis A vaccine.Common reasons for getting one or both of these treatments include:You live with someone who has hepatitis A., You recently had sexual contact with someone who has hepatitis A., You recently shared illegal drugs, either injected or noninjected, with someone who has hepatitis A., You have had close personal contact over a period of time with someone who has hepatitis A., You have eaten in a restaurant where food or food handlers were found to be infected or contaminated with hepatitis . Vaccines that protect against hepatitis A infection are available. The vaccine begins to protect 4 weeks after you get the first dose. You will need to get a booster shot 6 to 12 months later for long-term protection.Travelers should take the following steps to protect against getting the disease:Avoid dairy products., Avoid raw or undercooked meat and fish., Beware of sliced fruit that may have been washed in unclean water. Travelers should peel all fresh fruits and vegetables themselves., DO NOT buy food from street vendors., Get vaccinated against hepatitis A (and possibly hepatitis B) if traveling to countries where outbreaks of the disease occur., Use only carbonated bottled water for brushing teeth and drinking. (Remember that ice cubes can carry infection.), If bottled water is not available, boiling water is the best way to get rid of hepatitis A. Bring the water to a full boil for at least 1 minute to make it safe to drink., Heated food should be hot to the touch and eaten right away. . ", "Treatment": "There is no specific treatment for hepatitis A.You should rest when the symptoms are the worst. , People with acute hepatitis should avoid alcohol and drugs that are toxic to the liver, including acetaminophen (Tylenol)., Fatty foods may cause vomiting and are best avoided during the acute phase of the illness.. "}, "Health care agents": {"description": "Durable power of attorney for health care; Health care proxy"}, "Heart bypass surgery - discharge": {"description": "Your surgery was done through an incision (cut) in your chest. If the surgeon went through your breastbone, the surgeon repaired it with wire and a metal plate, and your skin was closed with stitches. You also had an incision made in your leg or arm, where the vein was taken to be used for the bypass. "}, "Hip or knee replacement - before - what to ask your doctor ": {"description": "Below are some questions you may want to ask your doctor or nurse to help you prepare for your hip or knee replacement."}, "High blood sugar": {"description": "High blood sugar is also called high blood glucose or hyperglycemia."}, "Healthy food trends -- chia seeds": {"description": "You can eat this nutty-flavored seed in many ways."}, "Heart CT scan": {"description": "A computed tomography (CT) scan of the heart is an imaging method that uses x-rays to create detailed pictures of the heart and its blood vessels."}, "Heart attack - what to ask your doctor": {"description": "Below are some questions you may want to ask your doctor or nurse to help you take care of yourself after a\u00a0recent heart attack."}, "Heart disease - risk factors": {"description": "A risk factor is something about you that increases your chance of getting a disease or having a certain health condition. Some risk factors for heart disease you cannot change, but some you can. Changing the risk factors that you have control over\u00a0may help you live a longer, healthier life."}, "Hemoglobin electrophoresis": {"description": "This lab test measures the levels of the different types of the oxygen-carrying protein (hemoglobin) in the blood."}, "Hip fracture - discharge ": {"description": "You should have received physical therapy while you were in the hospital or at a rehabilitation center before going home from the hospital."}, "High blood pressure - infants": {"description": "High blood pressure (hypertension) is an increase in the force of blood against the arteries in the body. This article focuses on high blood pressure in infants.", "Possible Complications": "Heart or kidney failure, Organ damage, Seizures. ", "Symptoms": ["Bluish skin", "Failure to grow and gain weight", "Frequent urinary tract infections", "Pale skin (pallor)", "Rapid breathing", "Irritability", "Seizures", "Trouble breathing", "Vomiting"], "Exams and Tests": "In most cases, the only sign of high blood pressure is the blood pressure measurement itself.Signs of very high blood pressure include:Heart failure, Kidney failure, Rapid pulse . Blood pressure in infants is measured with an automatic device.If coarctation of the aorta is the cause, there may be decreased pulses in the legs. A click may be heard if a bicuspid aortic valve occurs with the coarctation.Other tests in infants with high blood pressure will try to find the cause of the problem. Such tests may include:A special type of x-ray that uses a dye to look at blood vessels (angiography), Laboratory tests, including blood and urine tests, X-rays of the chest or abdomen, Ultrasounds, including an ultrasound of the working heart (echocardiogram) and of the kidneys, Using magnets to create images of the heart and\u00a0blood vessels (MRI) . ", "Treatment": "The treatment depends on the cause of high blood pressure in the infant. Treatment can include:Dialysis, Medications, Surgery (including transplantation surgery or repair of the coarctation). ", "Prevention": "There is no way to prevent conditions that cause high blood pressure in infants. However, there are some things you can do that may reduce the baby's risk of developing such problems.Some causes of high blood pressure run in families. Talk to your health care provider before you get pregnant if you have a family history of:Congenital heart disease, High blood pressure, Kidney disease . If you have any medical condition and take medicines for it, talk to your health care provider before becoming pregnant. Exposure to certain drugs in the womb may increase your baby's risk of developing problems that can lead to high blood pressure. ", "Causes": "Blood pressure measures how hard the heart is working, and how healthy the arteries are. There are two numbers in each blood pressure measurement:The first (top) number is the systolic blood pressure, which measures the force of blood released when the heart beats., The second (bottom) number is the diastolic pressure, which measures the pressure in the arteries when the heart is at rest. . Blood pressure measurements are written this way: 120/80. One or both of these numbers can be too high.Several factors affect blood pressure, including:Hormones, The health of the heart and blood vessels, The health of the kidneys . High blood pressure in infants may be due to kidney or heart disease that is present at birth (congenital). Common examples include:Coarctation of the aorta, Patent ductus arteriosus, Bronchopulmonary dysplasia, Renal artery stenosis . In newborn babies, high blood pressure is often caused\u00a0by a blood clot in a kidney blood vessel, a complication of having an umbilical catheter.Other causes of high blood pressure in infants may include:Certain medicines, Exposure to illegal drugs such as cocaine, Certain tumors, Inherited conditions (problems that run in families), Thyroid problems . Blood pressure rises as the baby grows. The average blood pressure in a newborn is 64/41. The average blood pressure in a child ages 1 month - 2 years is 95/58. Some variations in these numbers are normal and are not cause for concern."}, "Heart valve surgery": {"description": "The aortic valve is the most common valve to be replaced because it cannot be repaired. The mitral valve is the most common valve to be repaired. Only rarely is the tricuspid valve or the pulmonic valve repaired or replaced."}, "Hyperthyroidism": {"description": "Hyperthyroidism is a condition in which the thyroid gland makes too much thyroid hormone. The condition is often\u00a0called overactive thyroid.", "Possible Complications": "Thyroid crisis (storm) is a sudden worsening of hyperthyroidism symptoms that may occur with infection or stress. Fever, decreased alertness, and abdominal pain may occur. Patients need to be treated in the hospital.Other complications of hyperthyroidism include:Heart problems such as fast heart rate, abnormal heart rhythm, and heart failure, Osteoporosis . Surgery-related complications, including: Scarring of the neck, Hoarseness due to nerve damage to the voice box, Low calcium level due to damage to the parathyroid glands (located near the thyroid gland), Hypothyroidism (underactive thyroid)\u00a0 . ", "Symptoms": ["Difficulty concentrating", "Fatigue", "Frequent bowel movements", "Goiter (visibly enlarged thyroid gland) or thyroid nodules", "Hand tremor\u00a0", "Heat intolerance", "Increased appetite", "Increased sweating", "Irregular menstrual periods in women", "Nervousness", "Restlessness", "Sleep problems", "Weight loss (or weight gain, in\u00a0some cases) ", "Breast development in men", "Clammy skin", "Diarrhea", "Hair loss \u00a0\u00a0\u00a0\u00a0\u00a0\u00a0\u00a0", "High blood pressure", "Itchy or irritated eyes", "Itchy skin\u00a0", "Lack of, or irregular menstrual periods in women", "Nausea and vomiting", "Protruding eyes (exophthalmos)", "Rapid, forceful, or irregular heartbeat (palpitations)", "Skin blushing or flushing\u00a0\u00a0\u00a0", "Weakness of the hips and shoulders"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will do a physical exam. The exam may find the following:High systolic blood pressure (the first number in a blood pressure reading), Increased heart rate, Enlarged thyroid gland, Shaking of the hands, Swelling or inflammation around the eyes. Blood tests are also\u00a0ordered to measure your thyroid hormones TSH, T3, and T4.You may also have blood tests to check:\u00a0Cholesterol levels, Glucose\u00a0\u00a0\u00a0 , Radioactive iodine uptake. ", "Treatment": "Treatment\u00a0depends on the cause and severity of symptoms. Hyperthyroidism is usually treated with one or more of the following:Antithyroid medications, Radioactive iodine to destroy the thyroid gland and stop the excess production of hormones, Surgery to remove the thyroid. If\u00a0your thyroid is removed with surgery or destroyed with radioactive iodine, you must take thyroid hormone replacement pills for the rest of your life.Medicines called beta-blockers\u00a0may be prescribed to treat symptoms such as\u00a0fast heart rate, sweating, and anxiety until the hyperthyroidism can be controlled.", "Causes": "The thyroid gland is an important organ of the endocrine system. It is located\u00a0at\u00a0the front of the neck just above where your collarbones meet. The gland\u00a0makes the hormones that control the way every cell in the body uses energy. This process is called metabolism.Many diseases and conditions can cause hyperthyroidism, including:Eating too much of foods\u00a0that contain\u00a0iodine, Graves disease (most\u00a0common cause\u00a0of hyperthyroidism), Inflammation (thyroiditis) of the thyroid due to viral infections, some medicines, or after pregnancy, Noncancerous growths of the thyroid gland or pituitary gland, Some tumors of the testes or ovaries, Taking\u00a0too much\u00a0thyroid hormone, Getting medical imaging tests\u00a0with contrast dye that has iodine . "}, "Hip replacement - discharge ": {"description": "You had a hip joint replacement surgery to replace all or part of your hip joint with an artificial joint. This artificial joint is called a prosthesis."}, "Hereditary angioedema": {"description": "Hereditary angioedema is a rare but serious problem with the immune system. The problem is passed down through families. It causes swelling, particularly of the face and airways, and abdominal cramping.", "Possible Complications": "Swelling of the airways may be deadly.", "Symptoms": ["Airway blockage -- involves throat swelling and sudden hoarseness", "Repeat episodes of abdominal cramping without obvious cause", "Swelling in the arms, legs, lips, eyes, tongue, or throat", "Swelling of the intestines -- can be severe and lead to abdominal cramping, vomiting, dehydration, diarrhea, pain, and occasionally shock"], "Exams and Tests": "Blood tests (ideally done during an episode):C1 inhibitor function, C1 inhibitor level, Complement components C4 and C2. ", "Treatment": "Antihistamines and other treatments used for angioedema do not work well\u00a0for HAE. Epinephrine should be used in life-threatening reactions.The most effective treatment is a C1 inhibitor concentrate, but this may not be available. A newer medicine called ecallantide may be used instead.Fresh frozen plasma contains C1 inhibitor and will help an episode. In rare cases, the swelling can become worse with this treatment.Androgen medications, such as danazol, can reduce the frequency and severity of attacks. These medicines help the body make more C1 inhibitor.Once an attack occurs, treatment includes pain relief and fluids given through a vein by an intravenous (IV) line.Helicobacter pylori, a type of bacteria found in the stomach, can trigger abdominal attacks. Antibiotics to treat the bacteria help decrease abdominal attacks.", "Prevention": "Genetic counseling may be helpful for prospective parents with a family history of hereditary angioedema.", "Causes": "Angioedema is swelling that is similar to hives, but the swelling is under the skin instead of on the surface. Hereditary angioedema (HAE) is caused by a low level or improper function of a protein called the C1 inhibitor. With HAE the blood vessels are affected. An HAE attack can result in rapid swelling of the hands, feet, limbs, face, intestinal tract, larynx (voicebox), or trachea (windpipe).Attacks of swelling can become more severe in late childhood and adolescence.There is usually a family history of the condition. But relatives may be unaware of previous cases, which may have been reported as an unexpected, sudden, and premature death of a parent, aunt, uncle, or grandparent.Dental procedures, sickness (including colds and the flu), and surgery may trigger HAE attacks."}, "Hemangioma": {"description": "A hemangioma is an abnormal\u00a0buildup of blood vessels in the skin or internal organs.", "Possible Complications": "These complications can occur from a hemangioma:Bleeding (especially if the hemangioma is injured), Problems with breathing and eating, Psychological problems, from skin appearance, Secondary infections and sores, Visible changes in the skin, Vision problems . ", "Symptoms": ["A red to reddish-purple, raised sore (lesion) on the skin", "A massive, raised, tumor with blood vessels "], "Exams and Tests": "Your\u00a0health care provider will do a physical exam to diagnose\u00a0a hemangioma. If the build-up of blood vessels\u00a0is deep\u00a0inside the body,\u00a0a\u00a0CT or MRI scan may be needed.\u00a0A\u00a0hemangioma may occur with other rare conditions. Other tests to check for related problems may be done.\u00a0", "Treatment": "The majority of small or uncomplicated hemangiomas may not need treatment.\u00a0They often go away on their own and\u00a0the appearance of the skin returns to normal.\u00a0Sometimes, a laser may be used to remove the small blood vessels.Cavernous hemangiomas that involve the eyelid and block vision can be treated with lasers or steroid injections to shrink them. This allows vision to\u00a0develop normally. Large cavernous hemangiomas or mixed hemangiomas may be treated with steroids,\u00a0taken by mouth\u00a0or injected\u00a0into\u00a0the hemangioma.Taking beta-blocker medicines may also help reduce the size of\u00a0a hemangioma.", "Prevention": "There is no known way to prevent hemangiomas.", "Causes": "About\u00a0one third of\u00a0hemangiomas are present at birth. The rest appear in the first several months of life.The hemangioma may be: In the top skin layers (capillary hemangioma), Deeper in the skin (cavernous hemangioma), A mixture of both. "}, "Hepatitis B": {"description": "Other types of viral hepatitis include:", "Symptoms": ["You may have no symptoms", "You may feel sick for a period of days or weeks", "You may become very ill very quickly\u00a0(called fulminant hepatitis)", "Appetite loss", "Fatigue", "Low fever", "Muscle and joint aches", "Nausea and vomiting", "Yellow skin and dark urine "], "Exams and Tests": "A series of blood tests called the hepatitis viral panel is done to help diagnose the condition.The following tests are done to\u00a0look for liver damage if you have chronic hepatitis B:Albumin level, Liver function tests, Prothrombin time. You will also have a test to measure the level of HBV in your blood (viral load). This lets your doctors know how your treatment is working.", "Causes": "Hepatitis B infection is caused by the hepatitis B virus (HBV).You can catch hepatitis B through contact with the blood or body fluids (such as semen, vaginal fluids, and saliva) of a person who has the virus.\r\nExposure may occur:After a needle stick or sharps injury, If any blood or other body fluid touches your skin, eyes or mouth. People who may be at risk of hepatitis B are those who:Have unprotected sex with an infected partner, Receive blood transfusions (not common in the United States), Have contact with blood at work (such as health care workers), Have been on long-term kidney dialysis, Get a\u00a0tattoo or acupuncture with unclean needles, Share needles during drug use, Share personal items (such as toothbrush, razor, and nail clippers) with a person who has the virus, Were born to a hepatitis-B infected mother. ", "Prevention": "Children and people at high risk for hepatitis B should get the hepatitis B vaccine.Babies should get a first dose of the hepatitis B vaccine at birth. They should have all three shots in the series by age 6 months., Children younger than age 19 who have not had the vaccine should get \"catch-up\" doses., Health care workers and those who live with someone who has hepatitis B should get the vaccine., Infants born to mothers who have acute hepatitis B or have had the infection in the past should get a special hepatitis B vaccine within 12 hours of birth.. All blood used for blood transfusions\u00a0is screened, so the chance of getting the virus in this way is very small.The hepatitis B vaccine or a hepatitis immune globulin (HBIG) shot may help prevent infection if you receive it within 24 hours of contact with the virus.Measures to avoid contact with blood and body fluids\u00a0can help prevent the spread of hepatitis B from person-to-person.\u00a0 \r\n", "Treatment": "Acute hepatitis, unless severe, needs no treatment. Liver and other body functions are watched using blood tests. You should get plenty of bed rest, drink plenty of fluids, and eat healthy foods.\r\nSome patients with chronic hepatitis may be treated with antiviral drugs. These medicines can decrease or remove hepatitis B from the blood. They also help to reduce the risk of cirrhosis and liver cancer. \r\nIt is not always clear which patients with chronic hepatitis B should receive drug therapy and when drug therapy should be started. You are more likely to receive these medicines if:\r\nYour liver function is quickly becoming worse\r\n , You develop symptoms of long-term liver damage\r\n , You have high levels of the hepatitis B virus in your blood\r\n . For these medicines to work best, you need to take them as instructed by your health care provider. Ask what side effects you can expect and what to do if you have them. Not everybody who needs to take these medicines responds well.\r\nIf you develop liver failure, you may receive a liver transplant. A liver transplant is the only cure in some cases of liver failure.\r\nOther steps you can take:\r\nAvoid alcohol.\r\n , Check with your doctor or nurse before taking any over-the-counter medications or herbal supplements. This includes medications such as acetaminophen, aspirin, or ibuprofen.\r\n . Severe liver damage, or cirrhosis, can be caused by hepatitis B.\r\n"}, "Hypercalcemia": {"description": "Hypercalcemia is too much calcium in the blood.", "Possible Complications": "Gastrointestinal:Pancreatitis, Peptic ulcer disease. Kidney:Calcium deposits in the kidney (nephrocalcinosis), Dehydration, High blood pressure, Kidney failure, Kidney stones. Psychological:Depression, Difficulty concentrating or thinking. Skeletal:Bone cysts, Fractures, Osteoporosis. These complications of long-term hypercalcemia are uncommon today.", "Symptoms": ["Constipation", "Nausea", "Pain", "Poor appetite", "Vomiting", "Flank pain", "Frequent thirst", "Frequent urination", "Muscle twitches", "Weakness", "Apathy", "Dementia", "Depression", "Irritability", "Memory loss", "Bone pain", "Bowing of the shoulders", "Fractures due to disease (pathological fractures)", "Loss of height", "Spinal column curvature"], "Exams and Tests": "An accurate diagnosis is needed in hypercalcemia. Patients with kidney stones should have tests to evaluate for hypercalcemia.Serum calcium, Serum PTH, Serum PTHrP (PTH-related protein), Serum vitamin D level, Urine calcium. ", "Treatment": "Treatment is aimed at the cause of hypercalcemia whenever possible. People with primary hyperparathyroidism (PHPT) may need surgery to remove the abnormal parathyroid gland. This will cure the hypercalcemia.People with mild hypercalcemia may be able to monitor the condition closely over time.Severe hypercalcemia that causes symptoms and requires a hospital stay may be treated with the following:Calcitonin, Dialysis, Diuretic medication, such as furosemide, Drugs that stop bone breakdown and absorption by the body, such as pamidronate or etidronate (bisphosphonates), Fluids through a vein (intravenous fluids)\u00a0- this is the most important therapy, Glucocorticoids (steroids) . ", "Prevention": "Most causes of hypercalcemia cannot be prevented. Women over age 50 should see their health care provider regularly and have their blood calcium level checked if they have symptoms of hypercalcemia.Talk to your health care provider about the correct dose for calcium and vitamin D supplements if you are taking these medicines. ", "Causes": "Calcium is important to many body functions, including:Bone formation, Hormone release, Muscle contraction, Nerve and brain function . Parathyroid hormone (PTH) and Vitamin D help manage calcium balance in the body. PTH is made by the parathyroid glands, which are\u00a0four small glands located in the neck behind the thyroid gland. Vitamin D is obtained when the skin is exposed to sunlight, and from dietary sources such as:Egg yolks, Fish, Fortified cereals, Fortified dairy products . Primary hyperparathyroidism is the most common cause of hypercalcemia. It is due to excess PTH release by the parathyroid glands. This excess occurs due to an enlargement of one or more of the parathyroid glands, or a growth on one of the glands. (Most of the time, these growths are not cancerous).Other conditions can also cause hypercalcemia:An inherited condition that affects the body's ability to regulate calcium (familial hypocalciuric hypercalcemia), Being bed-bound (or not being able to move) for a long period of time (this occurs most often in young people), Calcium excess in the diet. This is called milk-alkali syndrome. It is most often due to at least 2,000 milligrams of calcium per day. Taking too much vitamin D may add to the problem., Hyperthyroidism, Kidney failure, Medications such as lithium and thiazide diuretics (water pills), Some cancerous tumors (for example, lung cancers, breast cancer), Some infectious and inflammatory diseases such as tuberculosis, Paget's disease and sarcoidosis . Hypercalcemia affects fewer than 1 in 100 people. The condition is most often diagnosed at an early stage, so most patients have no symptoms.Women over age 50 (after menopause) are most likely to have hypercalcemia. In most cases, this is due to primary hyperparathyroidism."}, "Hyperviscosity - newborn": {"description": "Hyperviscosity of the newborn is the slowing and blockage of blood flow. It occurs when there are too many red blood cells in an infant's blood.", "Possible Complications": "Complications may include:Death of intestinal tissue (necrotizing enterocolitis), Decreased fine motor control, Kidney failure, Seizures, Strokes. ", "Symptoms": ["Extreme sleepiness", "Feeding problems", "Seizures", "Red skin color "], "Exams and Tests": "There may be signs of breathing problems, kidney failure, and newborn jaundice.If the baby has symptoms of hyperviscosity, a blood test to count the number of red blood cells will be done. This test is called a hematocrit.Other tests may include:Blood gases to check oxygen level in the blood, Blood sugar (glucose) to check for low blood sugar, Blood urea nitrogen (BUN), a substance that forms when protein breaks down, Creatinine, Urinalysis . ", "Treatment": "The baby will be monitored for complications of hyperviscosity. An exchange transfusion may be needed. This is done to lower the amount of red blood cells that are moving through the baby's blood vessels.Other treatment may include increasing body fluids. ", "Causes": "Hyperviscosity can occur when the percentage of red blood cells (RBCs) in the infant's blood called the \"hematocrit,\" is greater than 65%. The problem can occur as a result of conditions that develop before birth. These may include: Birth defects, Delay in clamping the umbilical cord, Diabetes in the baby's birth mother, Inherited diseases, Not enough oxygen reaching body tissues (hypoxia), Twin-twin transfusion syndrome\u00a0(occurs when blood moves from one twin to the other) . The extra RBCs can block the flow of blood in the smallest blood vessels. This may lead to tissue death from lack of oxygen. This blocked blood flow can affect all organs, including the kidneys, lungs, and brain."}, "Heart valve surgery - discharge ": {"description": "Most people spend 3 - 7 days in the hospital. You may have been in the intensive care unit some of the time, in the hospital, you may have begun learning exercises to help you recover more quickly."}, "Hiatal hernia": {"description": "Hiatal hernia is a condition in which part of the stomach extends through an opening the diaphragm into the chest. The diaphragm is the sheet of muscle that divides the chest from the abdomen. ", "Possible Complications": "Pulmonary (lung) aspiration, Slow bleeding and iron deficiency anemia (due to a large hernia), Strangulation (closing off) of the hernia. ", "Symptoms": ["Chest pain", "Heartburn, worse when bending over or lying down", "Swallowing difficulty "], "Exams and Tests": "Barium swallow x-ray, Esophagogastroduodenoscopy (EGD). ", "Treatment": "The goals of treatment are to relieve symptoms and prevent complications. Treatments may include:Medicines to control stomach, Medicine to strengthen the muscles in the lower esophagus that keeps stomach contents from backing up, Surgery to repair the hiatal hernia. Other measures to reduce symptoms include:Avoiding large or heavy meals, Not lying down or bending over right after a meal, Reducing weight and not smoking, Raising the head of the bed 4 to 6 inches . If medicines and lifestyle measures do not help control symptoms, you may need surgery. ", "Prevention": "Controlling risk factors such as obesity may help prevent hiatal hernia.", "Causes": "The exact cause of hiatal hernias is unknown. The condition may be due to a weakening of the supporting tissue. Your risk for the problem goes up with age, obesity, and smoking. Hiatal hernias are very common. The problem occurs often in people over 50 years old.This condition may cause reflux (backflow) of gastric acid from the stomach into the esophagus.Children with this condition are usually born with it (congenital). It often occurs with gastroesophageal reflux in infants."}, "Hemoglobinuria test": {"description": "This article focuses on the urine test done to diagnose hemoglobinuria. There are two different types: "}, "Help prevent hospital errors": {"description": "Learn what you can do to prevent medical errors when you are in the hospital. "}, "Hemoglobinopathy": {"description": "Such disorders include hemoglobin C disease, hemoglobin S-C disease, sickle cell anemia, and various types of thalassemia."}, "Histocompatibility antigen test": {"description": "A histocompatibility antigen blood test looks at proteins called human leukocyte antigens (HLAs). These are found on the surface of almost all cells in the human body. HLAs are found in large amounts on the surface of white blood cells. They help the immune system tell the difference between body tissue and substances that are not from your own body."}, "Hepatitis C": {"description": "Other types of viral hepatitis include:", "Symptoms": [" \r\n Pain in the right upper abdomen", "Abdominal swelling due to fluid (ascites)", "Clay-colored or pale stools", "Dark urine", "Fatigue", "Fever", "Itching", "Jaundice", "Loss of appetite", " \r\n Nausea and vomiting"], "Exams and Tests": "Blood tests are done to check for hepatitis C:EIA assay to detect hepatitis C antibody\r\n , Hepatitis C RNA assays to measure virus levels (viral load)\r\n . Everyone born from 1945 - 1965 (the \u201cbaby boom\u201d generation) should get a one-time test for hepatitis C.\r\nGenetic testing is done to check for the type of hepatitis C (genotype). There are six types of the virus (genotypes 1 through 6). Test results can help your doctor choose treatment that is best for you.\r\nThe following tests are done to identify and monitor liver damage from hepatitis C:\r\nAlbumin level\r\n , Liver function tests\r\n , Prothrombin time\r\n , Liver biopsy\r\n . ", "Causes": "Hepatitis C infection is caused by the hepatitis C virus (HCV). You can catch hepatitis C if the blood of someone who has hepatitis C enters your body. Exposure may occur:After a needle stick or sharps injury, If blood from someone who has hepatitis C\u00a0contacts a cut on your skin or contacts your eyes or mouth . People at risk of hepatitis C are those who:Inject street drugs or share a needle with someone who has hepatitis C, Have been on long-term kidney dialysis, Have regular contact with blood at work (such as a health care worker), Have unprotected sexual contact with a person who has hepatitis C, Were born to a mother who had hepatitis C, Received a tattoo or acupuncture with needles that were not disinfected properly after being used on another person (risk is very low with practitioners who have a tattoo license or permit or an acupuncture license), Received an organ transplant\u00a0from a donor who has hepatitis C, Share personal items, such as toothbrushes and razors, with someone who has hepatitis C (less common), Received a blood transfusion (rare in the U.S. since blood screening became available in 1992) . ", "Prevention": "Things that can be done to prevent the spread of hepatitis C from one person to another include:Health care workers should follow precautions when handling blood., Do not share needles with anyone., Do not get tattoos or body piercings or receive acupuncture from someone who does not have a permit or license., Do not share personal items such as razors and toothbrushes., Practice safer sex.. If you or your partner is infected with hepatitis C and you have been in a stable and monogamous (no other partners) relationship, the risk of giving the virus to, or getting the virus from, the other person is low.Hepatitis C virus cannot be spread by casual contact, such as holding hands, kissing, coughing or sneezing, breastfeeding, sharing eating utensils or drinking glasses.Currently there is no vaccine for hepatitis C.", "Treatment": "Common medicines used include\u00a0peginterferon\u00a0and antiviral drugs. These medicines are aimed at:Helping the body get rid of the virus., Reducing the risk of cirrhosis and liver cancer, which can result from long-term HCV infection.. For these medicines to work best, you need to take them as instructed by your health care provider. Ask what side effects you can expect and what to do if you have them.A\u00a0liver transplant\u00a0may be recommended for persons who develop cirrhosis and liver cancer. Your health care provider can tell you more about liver transplant.If you have\u00a0hepatitis C:Do not take\u00a0over-the-counter medicines that you have not taken before\u00a0without asking your health care provider. Also ask about vitamins and other supplements., Do not use alcohol or street drugs. Alcohol can speed up the damage to your liver. It can also reduce how well medicines work., Ask your health care provider whether you need the hepatitis A and hepatitis\u00a0B vaccines. . "}, "Hypermobile joints": {"description": "Hypermobile joints are joints that move beyond the normal range with little effort. Joints most commonly affected are the elbows, wrists, fingers, and knees.", "Causes": "Hypermobile joints often occur in otherwise healthy and normal children. This is called benign hypermobility syndrome.Rare medical conditions associated with hypermobile joints include:Cleidocranial dysostosis, Down syndrome, Ehlers-Danlos syndrome, Marfan syndrome, Morquio syndrome. "}, "Head MRI": {"description": "It does not use radiation."}, "Hemolytic-uremic syndrome": {"description": "Shiga-like toxin producing E. coli hemolytic-uremic syndrome (STEC-HUS) is a disorder that usually occurs when an infection in the digestive system produces toxic substances that destroy red blood cells, causing kidney injury.", "Possible Complications": "Blood clotting problems, Hemolytic anemia, Kidney failure, Nervous system problems, Too few platelets (thrombocytopenia), Uremia. ", "Symptoms": ["Blood in the stools", "Irritability", "Fever", "Lethargy", "Vomiting and diarrhea", "Weakness", "Bruising", "Decreased consciousness", "Low urine output", "No urine output", "Pallor", "Seizures -- rare", "Skin rash that looks like fine red spots (petechiae)", "Yellow skin (jaundice) "], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a physical exam. This may show:Liver or spleen swelling, Nervous system changes. Laboratory tests will show signs of hemolytic anemia and acute renal failure. Tests may include:Blood clotting tests (PT and PTT), Comprehensive metabolic panel may show increased levels of BUN and creatinine, Complete blood count (CBC) may show increased white blood cell count and decreased red blood cell count, Platelet count is usually reduced, Urinalysis may reveal blood and protein in the urine, Urine protein test can show the amount of protein in the urine . Other tests:Kidney biopsy, Stool culture may be positive for a certain type of E. coli bacteria or other bacteria . ", "Treatment": "Treatment may involve:Dialysis, Medications such as corticosteroids, Transfusions of packed red blood cells and platelets. ", "Prevention": "You can prevent the known cause, E. coli, by cooking hamburger and other meats well and by avoiding contact with unclean water.", "Causes": "Hemolytic-uremic syndrome (HUS) often occurs after a gastrointestinal infection with E. coli bacteria (Escherichia coli O157:H7). However, the condition has also been linked to other gastrointestinal infections, including shigella and salmonella, as well as nongastrointestinal infections.HUS is most common in children. It is the most common cause of acute kidney failure in children. Several large outbreaks in 1992 and 1993 were linked to undercooked hamburger meat contaminated with E. coli.STEC-HUS is not to be confused with atypical HUS (aHUS) which is not infection-related and is similar to another disease called thrombotic thrombocytopenic purpura (TTP)."}, "Hyperactivity and children": {"description": "However, if the behaviors below have been present for a while or are becoming worse, the first step is to see your child's health care provider:"}, "Homocystinuria": {"description": "Homocystinuria is an inherited disorder that affects the metabolism of the amino acid methionine.", "Possible Complications": "Most serious complications result from blood clots. These episodes can be life threatening.Dislocated lenses of the eyes can seriously damage vision. Lens replacement surgery should be considered.Intellectual disability is a serious consequence of the disease. However, it can be\u00a0reduced if diagnosed early.", "Symptoms": ["Chest deformities (pectus carinatum, pectus excavatum)", "Flush across the cheeks", "High arches of the feet", "Intellectual disability", "Knock knees", "Long limbs", "Mental disorders\u00a0\r\n ", "Nearsightedness", "Spidery fingers (arachnodactyly)", "Tall, thin build"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider may notice that the child is tall and\u00a0thin.Other signs include:Curved spine (scoliosis), Deformity of the chest, Dislocated lens of the eye . If there is poor or double vision, an ophthalmologist should perform a dilated eye exam to look for dislocation of the lens or nearsightedness.There may be a history of blood clots. Intellectual disability, slightly low IQ, or mental illness are common.Tests:Amino acid screen of blood and urine, Genetic testing, Liver biopsy and enzyme assay, Skeletal x-ray, Skin biopsy with a fibroblast culture, Standard ophthalmic exam. ", "Treatment": "There is no cure for homocystinuria. However,\u00a0just under half of\u00a0people respond to high doses of vitamin B6 (also known as pyridoxine). Those who do respond will need to take vitamin B6 supplements for the rest of their lives. Those who do not respond will need to eat a low-methionine diet. Most will need to be treated with trimethylglycine (a medication also known as betaine).Neither a low-methionine diet nor medication will improve existing intellectual disability. Medication and diet should be closely supervised by a physician\u00a0who has\u00a0experience treating homocystinuria.Taking a\u00a0folic acid supplement and adding cysteine (an amino acid)\u00a0to the diet are helpful.", "Prevention": "Genetic counseling is recommended for people with a family history of homocystinuria who want to have children. Intrauterine diagnosis of homocystinuria is available. This involves culturing amniotic cells or chorionic villi to test for cystathionine synthase (the enzyme that is missing in homocystinuria).If there are known gene mutations in the parents or family, samples from chorionic villus sampling or amniocentesis can be used to test for these mutations.", "Causes": "Homocystinuria is inherited in families as an autosomal recessive trait. This means that the child must inherit the non-working gene from both parents to be seriously affected.Homocystinuria has several features in common with Marfan syndrome, including joint and eye changes."}, "Hereditary fructose intolerance": {"description": "Hereditary fructose intolerance is a disorder in which a person lacks the protein needed to break down fructose. Fructose is a fruit sugar that naturally occurs in the body. Man-made fructose is used as a sweetener in many foods, including baby food and drinks.", "Possible Complications": "Avoidance of fructose-containing foods due to their effects, Bleeding, Death, Gout, Illness from eating foods containing fructose or sucrose, Liver failure, Low blood sugar (hypoglycemia), Seizures. ", "Symptoms": ["Convulsions", "Excessive sleepiness", "Irritability", "Jaundice", "Poor feeding as a baby", "Problems after eating fruits and fructose/sucrose-containing foods", "Vomiting"], "Exams and Tests": "Physical examination may show:Enlarged liver and spleen (hepatosplenomegaly), Yellow skin or eyes. Tests that confirm the diagnosis include:Blood clotting tests, Blood sugar test, Enzyme studies, Genetic testing, Kidney function tests, Liver function tests, Liver biopsy, Uric acid blood test, Urinalysis. Blood sugar will be low, especially after receiving fructose or sucrose. Uric acid levels will be high.", "Treatment": "Removing fructose and sucrose from the diet is an effective treatment for most patients. Complications are treated. For example, some patients can take medication to lower the level of uric acid in their blood and decrease their risk for gout.", "Prevention": "Couples with a family history of fructose intolerance who wish to have a baby may consider genetic counseling.Most of the damaging effects of the disease can be prevented by sticking to a fructose-free diet.", "Causes": "This condition occurs when the body is missing an enzyme called aldolase B. This substance is needed to break down fructose.If a person without this substance eats fructose and sucrose (cane or beet sugar, table sugar), complicated chemical changes occur in the body. The body cannot change its energy storage material, glycogen, into glucose. As a result, the blood sugar falls and dangerous substances build up in the liver.Hereditary fructose intolerance is inherited, which means it is possible to be passed down through families. If both parents carry an abnormal adolase B gene, each of their children has a 25% chance of being affected. The condition may be as common as 1 in 20,000 people in some European countries."}, "Hypovolemic shock": {"description": "Hypovolemic shock is an emergency condition in which severe blood and fluid loss make the heart unable to pump enough blood to the body. This type of shock can cause many organs to stop working.", "Possible Complications": "Kidney damage, Brain damage, Gangrene of arms or legs, sometimes leading to amputation, Heart attack, Other organ damage, Death. ", "Symptoms": ["Anxiety or agitation", "Cool, clammy skin", "Confusion", "Decreased or no urine output", "General weakness", "Pale skin color (pallor)", "Rapid breathing", "Sweating, moist skin", "Unconsciousness"], "Exams and Tests": "A physical\u00a0exam will\u00a0show signs of shock, including:Low blood pressure, Low body temperature, Rapid pulse, often weak and thready. Tests that may be done include:Blood chemistry, including kidney function tests and those tests\u00a0looking for evidence of heart muscle damage, Complete blood count (CBC), CT scan, ultrasound, or x-ray of suspected areas, Echocardiogram (sound wave test of heart structure and function), Endoscopy (tube placed in the mouth to the stomach (upper endoscopy) and/or colonoscopy (tube place through the anus to the large bowel), Right heart (Swan-Ganz) catheterization, Urinary catheterization (tube placed into the bladder to measure urine output) . In some cases, other tests may be done as well.", "Treatment": "Get immediate medical help. In the meantime, follow these steps:Keep the person comfortable and warm (to avoid hypothermia)., Have the person lie flat with the feet lifted about 12 inches to increase circulation. However, if the person has a head, neck, back, or leg injury, do not change the person's position unless he or she is in immediate danger., Do not give fluids by mouth., If person is having an allergic reaction, treat the allergic reaction, if you know how., If the person must be carried, try to keep him or her flat, with the head down and feet lifted. Stabilize the head and neck before moving a person with a suspected spinal injury. . The goal of hospital treatment is to replace blood and fluids. An intravenous (IV) line will be put into the person's arm to allow blood or blood products to be given.Medicines such as dopamine, dobutamine, epinephrine, and norepinephrine may be needed to increase blood pressure and the amount of blood pumped out of the heart (cardiac output).", "Prevention": "Preventing shock is easier than trying to treat it once it happens. Quickly treating the cause will reduce the risk of developing severe shock. Early first aid can help control shock.", "Causes": "Losing about a fifth or more of the normal amount of blood in your body causes hypovolemic shock.Blood loss can be due to:Bleeding from cuts, Bleeding from other injuries, Internal bleeding, such as in the gastrointestinal tract. The amount of circulating blood in your body may drop when you lose too many other body fluids. This can be due to:Burns, Diarrhea, Excessive perspiration, Vomiting. "}, "Hydrocodone/oxycodone overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Extreme sleepiness", "Breathing problems", "Small pupils -- the black circle in the colored part of your eye"], "description": "\r\n This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or a poison control center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Hepatorenal syndrome": {"description": "Hepatorenal syndrome is a condition in which there is progressive kidney failure. It occurs in a person with cirrhosis of the liver. It is a serious complication that can lead to death. ", "Possible Complications": "Bleeding, Damage to, and failure of, many organ systems, End-stage kidney disease, Fluid overload with congestive heart failure or pulmonary edema, Hepatic coma, Secondary infections. ", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal swelling due to fluid (called ascites, a symptom of liver disease)", "Mental confusion", "Muscle jerks", "Dark-colored urine (a symptom of liver disease)", "Decreased urine production", "Nausea and vomiting", "Weight gain", "Yellow skin (jaundice, a symptom of liver disease) "], "Exams and Tests": "This condition is diagnosed after testing to rule out other causes of kidney failure. A physical exam does not detect kidney failure directly. However, the exam will very often show signs of chronic liver disease, such as:Confusion (often due to hepatic encephalopathy), Excess fluid in the abdomen (ascites), Jaundice, Other signs of liver failure . Other signs include:Abnormal reflexes, Smaller testicle, Dull sound in the belly area when tapped with the tips of the fingers, Increased breast tissue (gynecomastia), Sores (lesions) on the skin . The following may be signs of kidney failure:Very little or no urine output, Fluid retention in the abdomen or extremities, Increased BUN and creatinine blood levels, Increased urine specific gravity and osmolality, Low blood sodium, Very low urine sodium concentration . The following may be signs of liver failure:Abnormal prothrombin time (PT), Increased blood ammonia levels, Low blood albumin, Paracentesis shows ascites, Signs of hepatic encephalopathy (an EEG may be done) . ", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to help the liver work better and to make sure the heart is able to pump enough blood to the body. Treatment is about the same as for kidney failure from any cause. It includes:Stopping all unnecessary medicines, especially ibuprofen and other NSAIDs, the antibiotic neomycin or gentamicin, and diuretics (\"water pills\"), Having dialysis to improve symptoms, Taking medicines such as octreotide plus midodrine, albumin, norepinephrine, or dopamine to improve blood pressure and help your kidneys work better, Placing a nonsurgical shunt (known as TIPS) to relieve the symptoms of ascites (this may also help kidney function,\u00a0but the procedure can be risky), Surgery to place a shunt (called a peritoneovenous shunt) from the abdominal space (peritoneum) to the jugular vein to relieve some symptoms of kidney failure (this procedure is risky and is rarely done). ", "Causes": "Hepatorenal syndrome occurs when the kidneys stop working well in people with serious liver problems. Less urine is removed from the body, so waste products that contain nitrogen build up in the bloodstream (azotemia).The disorder occurs in up to 1 in 10 patients who are in the hospital with liver failure. It leads to kidney failure in people with:Acute liver failure, Alcoholic hepatitis, Cirrhosis. Risk factors include:Blood pressure that falls when a person rises or suddenly changes position (orthostatic hypotension), Use of medicines called diuretics (\"water pills\"), Gastrointestinal bleeding, Infection, Recent abdominal fluid tap (paracentesis) . "}, "Health screening - men - ages 40 to 64": {"description": "You should visit your health care provider regularly, even if you feel healthy. The purpose of these visits is to:"}, "Heart PET scan": {"description": "A heart PET scan can tell your doctor whether areas of your heart muscle are receiving enough blood, if there is heart damage or scar tissue in the heart, or if there is a build up of abnormal substances in the heart muscle."}, "Hydatidiform mole": {"description": "Hydatidiform mole is a rare mass or growth that forms inside the womb (uterus) at the beginning of a pregnancy. It is a type of gestational trophoblastic disease (GTD). A cancerous form of GTD is called\r\nchoriocarcinoma.", "Possible Complications": "Lung problems may occur after a D and C if the mother's\u00a0uterus is\u00a0larger than 16 weeks gestational size.Complications of molar pregnancy include:Preeclampsia, Thyroid problems, Molar pregnancy that continues or comes back. Complications related to the surgery to remove a molar pregnancy include:Excessive bleeding, Side effects of anesthesia. ", "Symptoms": ["Abnormal growth of the womb (uterus)  \r\n\r\nExcessive growth in about half of cases, Smaller-than-expected growth in about a third of cases. ", "Excessive growth in about half of cases", "Smaller-than-expected growth in about a third of cases", "Nausea and vomiting that may be severe enough to require a hospital stay", "Vaginal bleeding in pregnancy during the first 3 months of pregnancy", "Symptoms of hyperthyroidismHeat intolerance, Loose stools, Rapid heart rate, Restlessness, nervousness, Skin warmer and more moist than usual, Trembling hands, Unexplained weight loss. ", "Heat intolerance", "Loose stools", "Rapid heart rate", "Restlessness, nervousness", "Skin warmer and more moist than usual", "Trembling hands", "Unexplained weight loss", "Symptoms similar to preeclampsia that occur in the 1st trimester or early 2nd trimester -- this is almost always a sign of a hydatidiform mole, because preeclampsia is extremely rare this early in a normal pregnancy \r\n\r\nHigh blood pressure, Swelling in feet, ankles, legs. ", "High blood pressure", "Swelling in feet, ankles, legs"], "Exams and Tests": "A pelvic examination may show signs similar to a normal pregnancy, but the size of the womb may be abnormal and the baby's heart sounds are absent. There may be some vaginal bleeding.A pregnancy ultrasound will show an abnormal placenta with or without some development of a baby.Tests may include:HCG blood test, Chest x-ray, CT or MRI of the abdomen, Complete blood count, Blood clotting tests, Kidney and liver function tests. ", "Treatment": "If your doctor suspects a molar pregnancy, a suction curettage (D and C) may be performed.A hysterectomy may be an option for older women who do not wish to become pregnant in the future.After treatment, serum HCG level will be followed. It is important to avoid pregnancy and to use a reliable contraceptive for 6 - 12 months after treatment for a molar pregnancy. This allows for accurate testing to be sure that the abnormal tissue does not grow back. Women who get pregnant too soon after a molar pregnancy have a\u00a0high risk of having another molar pregnancy.", "Causes": "Hydatidiform mole, or molar pregnancy, results from over-production of the tissue that is supposed to develop into the placenta. The placenta feeds\u00a0the fetus during pregnancy. With a molar pregnancy, the tissues develop into an abnormal growth, called a mass.There are two types:Partial molar pregnancy: There is an abnormal placenta and some fetal development., Complete molar pregnancy: There is an abnormal placenta but no fetus.. Both forms are due to problems during fertilization. The exact cause of fertilization problems\u00a0is unknown. A diet low in protein, animal fat, and vitamin A may play a role."}, "Hairy cell leukemia": {"description": "Hairy cell leukemia (HCL) is an unusual cancer of the blood. It affects B cells, a type of white blood cell (lymphocyte).", "Possible Complications": "The low blood counts caused by hairy cell leukemia can lead to infections, fatigue, and excessive bleeding.", "Symptoms": ["Easy bruising or bleeding", "Excessive sweating (especially at night)", "Fatigue", "Feeling full after eating only a small amount", "Recurrent infections and fevers", "Pain or fullness in the upper left belly", "Swollen lymph glands", "Weakness", "Weight loss "], "Exams and Tests": "During a physical exam, the doctor may be able to feel a swollen spleen or liver. An abdominal CT scan or ultrasound may be done to evaluate this swelling.A complete blood count usually shows low levels of white and red blood cells, as well as platelets.Blood tests and a bone marrow biopsy can detect hairy cells.", "Treatment": "Treatment may not be needed for the early stages of this disease. Some patients may need an occasional blood transfusion.If treatment is needed because of very low blood counts, chemotherapy drugs can be used. In most cases, chemotherapy can relieve the symptoms for many years. (When the signs and symptoms go away, you are said to be in remission.) Removing the spleen may improve blood counts, but is unlikely to cure the disease. Antibiotics can be used to treat infections. People with low blood counts will receive growth factors and, possibly, transfusions.", "Prevention": "There is no known way to prevent this disease.", "Causes": "HCL is caused by the abnormal growth of B cells. The cells look \"hairy\" under the microscope because they have fine projections extending from their surface.HCL usually leads to a low number of normal blood cells.The cause of this disease is unknown, although certain genetic changes (mutations) in the cancer cells have been found. It affects men more often than women. The average age of diagnosis is 55."}, "High potassium level": {"Symptoms": ["Nausea", "Slow, weak, or irregular pulse", "Sudden collapse, when the heartbeat gets too slow or even stops"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will perform a physical exam and ask about your symptoms.Tests that may be ordered include:Electrocardiogram (ECG) Potassium level . Your doctor will likely check your blood potassium level and do kidney blood tests on a regular basis if you:Have been prescribed extra potassium, Have chronic kidney disease, Take medications to treat heart disease or high blood pressure, Use salt substitutes . ", "description": "High potassium level is a problem in which the amount of potassium in the blood is higher than normal. The medical name of this condition is hyperkalemia.", "Causes": "Potassium is needed for cells to function properly. You get potassium through food. The kidneys remove excess potassium in the urine to keep a proper balance of this mineral in the body.If your kidneys are not working well, they may not be able to remove the proper amount of potassium. As a result, potassium can build up in the blood. This buildup can be due to: Addison's disease, Burns over large areas of the body, Certain medicines such as water pills (diuretics) or blood pressure drugs, Damage to muscle and other cells from certain street drugs, alcohol abuse, untreated seizures, surgery, crush injuries and falls, certain chemotherapy, or certain infections, Disorders that cause blood cells to burst (hemolytic anemia), Severe bleeding from the stomach or intestines, Taking extra potassium, such as salt substitutes or supplements, Tumors . ", "Treatment": "You will need emergency treatment if your potassium level is very high, or if you have danger signs, such as changes in an ECG.Emergency treatment may include:Calcium given into your veins (IV) to treat the muscle and heart effects of high potassium levels, Glucose and insulin given into your veins (IV) to help lower potassium levels long enough to correct the cause, Kidney dialysis if your kidney function is poor, Medications that help remove potassium from the intestines before it is absorbed, Sodium bicarbonate if the problem is caused by acidosis, Water pills (diuretics) to decrease total potassium . Changes in your diet can help both prevent and treat high potassium levels. You may be asked to:Limit or avoid asparagus, avocados, potatoes, tomatoes or tomato sauce, winter squash, pumpkin, and cooked spinach, Limit or avoid oranges and orange juice, nectarines, Kiwis, raisins, or other dried fruit, bananas, cantaloupe, honeydew, prunes, and nectarines, Avoid taking salt substitutes if you are asked to eat a low-salt diet. Your doctor may make the following changes to your medicines:Reduce or stop potassium supplements, Stop or change the doses of medicines you are taking, such as ones for heart disease and high blood pressure, Take a certain type of water pill to reduce potassium and fluid levels if you have chronic kidney failure . Follow your health care provider's directions when taking your medicines:Do not stop or start taking medicines without first talking to your health care provider, Take your medicines on time, Always tell your health care provider about any other medicines, vitamins, or supplements you are taking . "}, "Hangover treatment": {"description": "If you have a hangover, consider the following for relief:"}, "Henoch-Schonlein purpura": {"description": "Henoch-Schonlein purpura is a disease that involves purple spots on the skin, joint pain, gastrointestinal problems, and glomerulonephritis (a type of kidney disorder).", "Possible Complications": "Bleeding inside the body, Kidney problems (in rare cases). ", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain", "Joint pain", "Purple spots on the skin (purpura), usually over the buttocks, lower legs, and elbows", "Bloody diarrhea", "Hives or angioedema", "Nausea", "Diarrhea", "Painful menstruation", "Vomiting "], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will look at your body and look at your skin. The physical exam will show skin sores (purpura, lesions) and joint tenderness.Tests may include:Skin biopsy, Urinalysis. ", "Treatment": "There is no specific treatment. Most cases go away on their own. If symptoms do not go away, your doctor may\u00a0prescribe corticosteroid medicine such as prednisone.", "Causes": "Henoch-Schonlein is caused by an abnormal response of the immune system. It is unclear why this occurs.The syndrome is\u00a0mostly seen in children, but it may affect people of any age. It is more common in boys than in girls. Many people who develop this disease had an upper respiratory infection in the weeks before."}, "Heart bypass surgery - minimally invasive": {"description": "Minimally invasive coronary (heart) artery bypass can be done without stopping the heart. Therefore, you do not need to be put on a heart-lung machine for this procedure."}, "High arch": {"description": "High arch is the opposite of flat feet.", "Possible Complications": "Chronic pain\r\n, Difficulty walking. ", "Symptoms": ["Shortened foot length", "Difficulty fitting shoes", "Foot pain with walking, standing, and running (not everyone has this symptom)"], "Exams and Tests": "When the person stands on the foot, the instep looks hollow and most of the weight is on the back and balls of the foot (metatarsals head).Your health care provider will check to see if the high arch is flexible, meaning it can be moved around.Tests that may be done include:Electromyography, MRI of the spine, Nerve conduction studies, X-ray of the feet, X-ray of the spine. ", "Treatment": "High arches -- especially ones that are flexible or well cared for -- may not need any treatment.Corrective shoes may help relieve pain and improve walking. This includes changes to the shoes, such as an arch insert and a support insole.Surgery to flatten the foot is sometimes needed in severe cases. Any nerve problems that exist must be treated by specialists.", "Prevention": "People with highly arched feet should be checked for nerve and bone conditions. Identifying these other conditions may help prevent or reduce arch problems.", "Causes": "High foot arches are much less common than flat feet. They are more likely to be caused by a bone (orthopedic) or nerve (neurological) condition.Unlike flat feet, highly arched feet tend to be painful because more stress is placed on the section of the foot between the ankle and toes (metatarsals). This condition can make it difficult to fit into shoes. People who have high arches usually need foot support. A high arch may cause disability."}, "Home health care ": {"description": "You should probably be able to go home once you are able to:"}, "Hives": {"description": "\r\nHives are raised, often itchy, red bumps (welts) on the surface of the skin. They are usually an allergic reaction to food or medicine.", "Possible Complications": "Anaphylaxis (a life-threatening, whole-body allergic reaction that causes breathing difficulty), Swelling in the throat can lead to life-threatening airway blockage. ", "Symptoms": ["Itching", "Swelling of the surface of the skin into red- or skin-colored welts (called wheals) with clearly defined edges.", "Wheals\u00a0may get bigger, spread, and join together to form larger areas of flat, raised skin.\u00a0", "Wheals\u00a0can also change shape, disappear, and reappear within minutes or hours.You know you have hives when you press the center of a wheal, it turns white. This is called blanching."], "Exams and Tests": "Your doctor can tell if you have hives by looking at your skin.If you have a history of an allergy, then the diagnosis is even more obvious.Sometimes,\u00a0a skin biopsy\u00a0or blood tests are done to confirm that you had an allergic reaction, and to test for the substance that caused the allergic response.", "Treatment": "Treatment may not be needed if the hives are mild. They may disappear on their own. To reduce itching and swelling:Do not take\u00a0hot baths or showers., Do not wear tight-fitting\u00a0clothing, which can irritate the area., Your health care provider may suggest that you take an antihistamine such as diphenhydramine (Benadryl).\u00a0Follow your provider's instructions or package instructions about how\u00a0to take the medicine.. If your reaction is severe, especially if the swelling involves your throat, you may require an emergency shot of epinephrine (adrenaline) or a steroid. Hives in the throat can block your airway, making it difficult to breathe.", "Prevention": "Avoid exposure to substances that give you allergic reactions.\r\n , Do not wear tight-fitting clothing and\u00a0do not take\u00a0hot baths or showers just after having hives. These can cause hives to return.. ", "Causes": "When you have an allergic reaction to a substance, your body releases histamine and other chemicals into\u00a0the blood. This causes itching, swelling, and other symptoms. Hives are a common reaction. Persons with other allergies, such as hay fever, often get hives.When swelling or welts occur around the face, especially the lips and eyes, it is called angioedema. Swelling can also occur around your hands, feet, and throat.Many substances can trigger hives, including:Animal dander (especially cats), Insect bites, Medicines, Pollen, Shellfish, fish, nuts, eggs, milk, and other foods. Hives may also develop as a result of:Emotional stress, Extreme cold or sun exposure, Excessive perspiration, Illness, including lupus, other autoimmune diseases, and leukemia, Infections such as mononucleosis, Exercise\u00a0\r\n  . "}, "Hardening of the arteries": {"description": "Hardening of the arteries is a common disorder.", "Possible Complications": "In some cases, the plaque is part of a process that causes a weakening of the wall of an artery. This can lead to a bulge in an artery called an aneurysm. Aneurysms can break open (rupture). This causes bleeding that can be life threatening.", "Symptoms": [], "Exams and Tests": "A health care provider will perform a physical exam and listen to the heart and lungs with a stethoscope. Hardening of the arteries can create a whooshing or blowing sound (\"bruit\") over an artery.The 2008 United States Preventive Services Task Force (USPSTF) guidelines on screening for lipid disorders in adults recommend:Beginning screening at age 20 if you are at increased risk for atherosclerosis, Getting a first screening test by age 35 in men, and age 45 in women if you are not at increased risk . Note: This guideline is being updated.A number of imaging tests may be used to see how well blood moves through your arteries.Doppler tests that use ultrasound or sound waves, Magnetic resonance arteriography (MRA)\u00a0-- a special type of MRI scan, Special CT scans called CT angiography, Arteriograms or angiography that use x-rays to see inside the arteries . ", "Treatment": "Lifestyle changes will reduce your risk of hardening of the arteries. Thing you can do include:Quit smoking. This is the single most important change you can make to reduce your risk of heart disease and stroke., Avoid fatty foods. Eat well-balanced meals that are low in fat and cholesterol. Include several daily servings of fruits and vegetables. Adding fish to your diet at least twice a week may be helpful. However, do not eat fried fish., Limit how much alcohol you drink. Recommended limits are one drink a day for women, two a day for men., Get regular physical activity. Exercise with moderate intensity (e.g., brisk walking) 5 days a week for 30 minutes a day if you are at a healthy weight. For weight loss, exercise for 60 - 90 minutes a day. Talk to your doctor before starting a new exercise plan, especially if you have been diagnosed with heart disease or you have ever had a heart attack. . The 2007 United States Preventive Services Task Force (USPSTF) guidelines on screening for high blood pressure recommend screening for all adults: Every 2 years, if their blood pressure was less than 120/80 mmHg at their most recent reading, Once a year if their blood pressure was 120 - 139/80 - 89 mmHg . Notes: This guideline is currently being updated.If your blood pressure is high, it is important for you to lower it and keep it under control.Most people should keep their blood pressure below 140/90 mmHg. However, you doctor may recommend a different target depending on your age and other health conditions., If you have diabetes, kidney disease, or have had a stroke or heart attack, your blood pressure may need to be lower. Ask your doctor what your blood pressure should be. . Your doctor may want you to take medicine for abnormal cholesterol levels or for high blood pressure if lifestyle changes do not work. This will depend on:Your age, Whether you have heart disease or other blood flow problems, Whether you smoke or are overweight, Whether you have diabetes or other heart disease risk factors . Your doctor may suggest taking aspirin or another medicine to help prevent blood clots from forming in your arteries. These medicines are called antiplatelet drugs. DO NOT take aspirin without first talking to your doctor.Losing weight if you are overweight and reducing blood sugar if you have diabetes or pre-diabetes can help reduce the risk of developing atherosclerosis.", "Causes": "Watch this video about:AtherosclerosisHardening of the arteries often occurs with aging. As you grow older, plaque buildup narrows your arteries and makes them stiffer. These changes make it harder for blood to flow through them.Clots may form in these narrowed arteries and block blood flow. Pieces of plaque can also break off and move to smaller blood vessels, blocking them.These blockages starve tissues of blood and oxygen. This can result in damage or tissue death.\u00a0It is a common cause of heart attack and stroke. High blood cholesterol levels can cause hardening of the arteries at a younger age. For many people, high cholesterol levels are due to a diet that is too high in saturated and trans fats. Other risk factors are heavy alcohol use, lack of exercise, and being overweight.Other factors that can contribute to\u00a0hardening of the arteries include:Diabetes, Family history of hardening of the arteries, High blood pressure, Smoking . "}, "Hip flexor strain - aftercare": {"description": "A hip flexor strain occurs when one or more of the hip flexor muscles becomes stretched or torn."}, "Hot tub folliculitis": {"description": "Hot tub folliculitis is an infection of the skin around the lower part of the hair shaft\u00a0(hair\u00a0follicles). It occurs when you come into contact with certain bacteria that live in warm and wet areas.", "Possible Complications": "Discomfort and abscess formation can rarely occur. ", "Symptoms": ["Turn into dark red tender nodules", "Have bumps that fill with pus", "Look like acne", "Be thicker under swimsuit areas where the water was in contact with the skin for longer "], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider can\u00a0often make this diagnosis based on looking at the rash and knowing that you have\u00a0been in a hot tub. Testing is usually not needed.", "Treatment": "Treatment may not be needed. The\u00a0mild form of the disease often clears on its own. Anti-itch medicines may be used to ease discomfort.In severe cases, your health care provider may prescribe an antibiotic.", "Prevention": "Controlling the acid levels and chlorine content of the hot tub may help prevent the problem.", "Causes": "Hot tub folliculitis is caused by bacteria that survives in hot tubs, especially tubs made of wood. "}, "Hypotonia": {"description": "Hypotonia means decreased muscle tone.", "Causes": "\r\n\r\nMuscle tone and movement involve the brain, spinal cord, nerves, and muscles. Hypotonia may be a sign of a problem anywhere along the pathway that controls muscle movement. Causes may include:Brain damage or encephalopathy, due to lack of oxygen before or right after birth, or problems with brain formation, Disorders of the muscles, such as muscular dystrophy, Disorders that affect the nerves that supply muscles, Disorders that affect the ability of nerves to send messages to the muscles , Rare genetic disorders, in which the body cannot properly turn food into energy, Infections. Genetic or chromosomal disorders, or defects that may cause brain and nerve damage include:Down syndrome, Prader-Willi syndrome, Tay-Sachs disease, Trisomy 13. Other disorders that can lead to the condition include:Achondroplasia, Congenital hypothyroidism, Congenital cerebellar ataxia, Marfan syndrome, Poisons or toxins, Spinal cord injuries that occur around the time of birth . "}, "Hemolysis": {"description": "See also: Hemolytic anemia"}, "Histiocytosis": {"description": "This article focuses only on Langerhans cell histiocytosis (histiocytosis X).", "Possible Complications": "Complications may include:Diffuse interstitial pulmonary fibrosis\u00a0(deep lung tissues that become inflamed and then damaged)\u00a0\r\n , Spontaneous collapsed lung. Children may also develop:Anemia caused by spreading of the tumors to the bone marrow, Diabetes insipidus\u00a0(a rare form of diabetes)\u00a0\r\n , Lung problems that lead to lung failure, Problems with the pituitary gland that lead to growth failure. ", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain", "Bone pain (possibly)", "Delayed puberty", "Dizziness", "Ear drainage that continues long-term", "Eyes that appear to stick out more and more", "Irritability", "Failure to thrive", "Fever", "Frequent urination", "Headache", "Jaundice", "Limping", "Mental decline", "Rash ", "Seborrheic dermatitis of the scalp", "Seizures", "Short stature", "Swollen lymph glands", "Thirst", "Vomiting", "Weight loss", "Bone pain", "Chest pain", "Cough", "Fever", "General discomfort, uneasiness, or ill feeling", "Increased amount of urine", "Rash", "Shortness of breath", "Thirst and increased drinking of fluids", "Weight loss"], "Exams and Tests": "The tumors produce a \"punched-out\" look on a bone x-ray. Specific tests vary depending on the age of the patient.Tests in children may include:Biopsy of skin to check for Langerhans cells, Bone marrow biopsy to check for Langerhans cells, Complete blood count (CBC), X-rays of all the bones in the body to find out how many bones are affected. Tests in adults may include:Bronchoscopy with biopsy, Chest x-ray, Pulmonary function tests. Histiocytosis X is sometimes\u00a0linked to\u00a0cancer. CT scans and biopsy should be done to rule out possible cancer.", "Treatment": "This disorder is treated with corticosteroids, which suppress immune function (including the dangerous cells). Smoking may worsen the response to treatment and should be stopped.Children may be given other medications depending on their outlook (prognosis). Such medications may include:Cyclophosphamide, Etoposide, Methotrexate, Vinblastine. Radiation therapy or surgery may also be used to treat bone lesions.Other treatments may include:Antibiotics to fight infections, Breathing support (with a breathing machine), Hormone replacement therapy, Physical therapy, Special shampoos for scalp problems, Supportive care (also called comfort care) to relieve symptoms. ", "Prevention": "Avoid smoking. Quitting smoking can improve the outcome in people with histiocytosis X that affects the lungs.There is no known prevention for the childhood forms of this disease.", "Causes": "\r\n\r\nHistiocytosis X has typically been thought of as a cancer-like condition. But more recently, researchers have begun to think it may be an autoimmune disorder. In this type of disorder, a person's immune cells mistakenly attack the body, rather than help the body fight infections. The extra immune cells the body makes may form tumors, which can affect various parts of the body, including the bones, skull, and other areas.Some forms of the disorder are genetic, which means they are inherited.Histiocytosis X is thought to affect roughly 1 in 200,000 people each year. It is most often seen in children ages 1 - 15, with the highest rate among children ages 5 - 10.Pulmonary histiocytosis X is a specific type of histiocytosis X that involves swelling of the small airways and small blood vessels in the lungs. This inflammation leads to lung stiffening and damage. It is most common in 30 - 40 year old adults, usually cigarette smokers. The cause is unknown."}, "Hip fracture surgery": {"description": "See also: Hip pain"}, "High blood pressure": {"description": "If you have heart or kidney problems, or you had a stroke, your doctor may want your blood pressure to be even lower than that of people who do not have these conditions.", "Symptoms": ["Severe headache", "Nausea or vomiting", "Confusion", "Vision changes", "Nosebleeds "], "Exams and Tests": "Your doctor will measure your blood pressure many times before diagnosing you with high blood pressure. It is normal for your blood pressure to be different based on the time of day.All adults should have their blood pressure checked every 1 to 2 years if their blood pressure was less than 120/80 mmHg at their most recent reading., If you have high blood pressure, diabetes, heart disease, kidney problems, or certain other conditions, have your blood pressure checked more often -- at least once every year. . Blood pressure readings taken at home may be a better measure of your current blood pressure than those taken at your health care provider's office. Make sure you get a good quality, well-fitting home blood pressure monitor. It should have the proper sized cuff and a digital readout., Practice with your doctor or nurse to make sure you are taking your blood pressure correctly., Bring your home monitor to your appointments so your doctor can make sure it is working correctly. . Your health care provider will do a physical exam to look for signs of heart disease, damage to the eyes, and other changes in your body.Tests may also be done to look for:High cholesterol level, Heart disease, using tests such as an echocardiogram or electrocardiogram, Kidney disease, using tests such as a basic metabolic panel and urinalysis or ultrasound of the kidneys . ", "Causes": "Many factors can affect blood pressure, including:The amount of water and salt you have in your body, The condition of your kidneys, nervous system, or blood vessels, Your hormone levels . You are more likely to be told your blood pressure is too high as you get older. This is because your blood vessels become stiffer as you age. When that happens, your blood pressure goes up. High blood pressure increases your chance of having a stroke, heart attack, heart failure, kidney disease, or early death.You have a higher risk of high blood pressure if:You are African American, You are obese, You are often stressed or anxious, You drink too much alcohol (more than 1 drink per day for women and more than 2 drinks per day for men), You eat too much salt, You have a family history of high blood pressure, You have diabetes, You smoke . Most of the time, no cause of high blood pressure is found. This is called essential hypertension.High blood pressure that is caused by another medical condition or medicine you are taking is called secondary hypertension. Secondary hypertension may be due to:Chronic kidney disease, Disorders of the adrenal gland (such as pheochromocytoma or Cushing syndrome), Hyperparathyroidism, Pregnancy or preeclampsia, Medications such as birth control pills, diet pills, some cold medicines, and migraine medicines, Narrowed artery that supplies blood to the kidney (renal artery stenosis) . ", "Prevention": "Most people can prevent high blood pressure from occurring by following lifestyle changes designed to bring blood pressure down. ", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to reduce your blood pressure so that you have a lower risk of complications. You and your health care provider should set a blood pressure goal for you.If you have pre-hypertension, your health care provider will recommend lifestyle changes to bring your blood pressure down to a normal range. Medicines are rarely used for pre-hypertension.You can do many things to help control your blood pressure at home, including:Eat a heart-healthy diet, including potassium and fiber., Drink plenty of water. , Exercise regularly for at least 30 minutes of aerobic exercise a day., If you smoke, quit., Limit how much alcohol you drink to 1 drink a day for women, and 2 a day for men., Limit the amount of sodium (salt) you eat -- aim for less than 1,500 mg per day., Reduce stress. Try to avoid things that cause you stress, and try meditation or yoga to de-stress., Stay at a healthy body weight. . Your health care provider can help you find programs for losing weight, stopping smoking, and exercising.You can also get a referral from your health care provider to a dietitian, who can help you plan a diet that is healthy for you.How low your blood pressure should be and at what level you need to start treatment is individualized, based on your age and any medical problems you have.There are many different medicines to treat high blood pressure.Often, a single blood pressure drug may not be enough to control your blood pressure, and you may need to take two or more drugs., It is very important that you take the medicines prescribed to you., If you have side effects, your doctor can substitute a different medicine. . "}, "Hepatic encephalopathy": {"description": "Hepatic encephalopathy is the loss of brain function that occurs when the liver is unable to remove toxins from the blood. ", "Possible Complications": "Brain herniation, Brain swelling, Increased risk of heart, kidney, and breathing problems, Increased risk of body-wide infection, Permanent nervous system damage, Coma that continues to get worse, Side effects of medicines. ", "Symptoms": ["Breath with a musty or sweet odor", "Change in sleep patterns", "Changes in thinking", "Confusion that is mild", "Forgetfulness", "Mental fogginess", "Personality or mood changes", "Poor concentration", "Poor judgment", "Worsening of handwriting or loss of other small hand movements ", "Abnormal movements or shaking of hands or arms", "Agitation, excitement, or seizures (occur rarely)", "Disorientation", "Drowsiness or confusion", "Strange\u00a0behavior or severe personality changes", "Slurred speech", "Slowed or sluggish movement "], "Exams and Tests": "Signs of nervous system changes may include:Shaking of the hands (\"flapping\") when trying to hold arms in front of the body and lift the hands, Problems with thinking and doing mental tasks, Signs of liver disease, such as yellow skin and eyes (jaundice) and fluid collection in the abdomen (ascites), Musty odor to the breath and urine. Tests may include:Complete blood count or hematocrit to check for anemia, CT scan of the head or MRI, EEG, Liver function tests, Prothrombin time, Serum ammonia levels, Sodium level in the blood, Potassium level in the blood, BUN and creatinine to see how the kidneys are working . ", "Treatment": "Hepatic encephalopathy can be a medical emergency that requires a hospital stay.The first step is to identify and treat any factors that may have caused hepatic encephalopathy.Gastrointestinal bleeding must be stopped. The intestines must be emptied of blood. Infections, kidney failure, and electrolyte abnormalities (especially potassium) need to be treated.Life support may be necessary to help with breathing or blood circulation, particularly if the person is in a coma. The brain may swell, which can be life-threatening.If the problem is very bad, you may need to cut down the protein in your diet. However, too little protein can cause malnutrition, so you should talk to a dietitian about how to change your diet. People who are very ill may need intravenous or tube feedings.You may be given lactulose to prevent intestinal bacteria from creating ammonia and to remove blood from the intestines. You may also get neomycin to reduce ammonia production by intestinal bacteria. Rifaximin, a new antibiotic, is also effective in hepatic encephalopathy.You may need to avoid sedatives, tranquilizers, and any other medicines that are broken down by the liver. Medicines containing ammonium (including certain antacids) should also be avoided. Your doctor may suggest other medicines and treatments. These may have varying results.", "Prevention": "Treating liver problems may prevent hepatic encephalopathy. Avoiding heavy drinking and intravenous drug use can prevent many liver disorders.", "Causes": "The exact cause of hepatic encephalopathy is unknown. Hepatic encephalopathy is brought on by disorders that affect the liver. These include:Conditions that reduce liver function (such as cirrhosis or hepatitis), Conditions in which blood circulation does not enter the liver . An important job of the liver is to make toxic substances in the body harmless. These can include substances made by the body as well things that you take in (such as medicines). However, when the liver is damaged, these \"poisons\" can build up in the bloodstream. Ammonia, which is produced by the body when proteins are digested, is one of the substances normally made harmless by the liver. Other toxins may also build up. These things can cause damage to the nervous system.When liver damage occurs, hepatic encephalopathy may occur suddenly, even in people who have not had liver problems in the past. More often, the problem develops in people with chronic liver disease.Hepatic encephalopathy may be triggered by:Dehydration, Eating too much protein, Electrolyte abnormalities (especially a decrease in potassium) from vomiting, or from treatments such as paracentesis or taking diuretics (\"water pills\"), Bleeding from the intestines, stomach, or esophagus, Infections, Kidney problems, Low oxygen levels in the body, Shunt placement or complications, Surgery, Medicines that suppress the central nervous system (such as barbiturates or benzodiazepine tranquilizers). Disorders that can appear similar to hepatic encephalopathy include:Alcohol intoxication, Complicated alcohol withdrawal, Meningitis, Metabolic abnormalities such as low blood glucose, Sedative overdose, Subdural hematoma (bleeding under the skull), Wernicke-Korsakoff syndrome. In some cases, hepatic encephalopathy is a short-term problem that can be corrected. It may also occur as part of a chronic problem from liver disease that gets worse over time. "}}